WEBSITE TERMS AND CONDITIONS
Please read these Terms and Conditions carefully before using this Website and registering as a Member. If you have any questions relating to this Website or the Terms and Conditions, please check our
FAQs
, or contact our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
). By using this Website you indicate your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions set out below.
You should also read our Privacy Policy, which can be found
here
.
These Terms and Conditions were last updated on 29th January 2025, and supersede any previous terms and conditions.
KEY TERMS
You should read these Terms and Conditions in their entirety before using this Website and registering as a Member, but we would like to draw your attention specifically to the following clauses:
Malfunctions
: From time to time, technical malfunctions or human errors may occur which affect a Game, the Website, and/or a Group Website. We refer to such events in these Terms and Conditions as “Malfunctions” (see some examples of Malfunctions in section 5.12). Malfunctions may not always be apparent or detectable by you/us. Any Wager affected by a Malfunction will not count, and any winnings and/or Rewards attributed to you as a result of a Malfunction will not be payable to you, as set out in section 5.12.
Our Liability to You
: There are certain losses for which we do not limit or exclude our liability (including your rights under law), as set out in sections 17.2, 17.3 and 17.4. Our responsibility to you for certain other losses is excluded. We are not responsible for failures of any telecommunications or other data transmission systems, losses caused by Events Beyond Our Control, and third party interception or misuse of Members’ payment details, as set out in section 17.5. Nor are we responsible to you for losses that are not a reasonably foreseeable consequence of our breach, as set out in section 17.6. Our liability to you for other types of losses is limited, depending on the type of loss, as set out in section 17.7.
Membership Requirements
: To register and use the Website you must be: (a) 18 years of age or older; (b) in a territory from which we currently accept users; and (c) register in your own name and for your sole benefit. See section 4.1 for further membership requirements. We may ask you for certain information to verify your identity, as set out in section 4. We may temporarily suspend your account, and withhold payment of your deposit balance and winnings until verification has been completed (section 5.6.1).
Duplicate Accounts
: A requirement of your membership with us is that you only hold a single account with us (section 4.7). If we suspect you may have more than one account with us, we have the right to immediately close all your accounts, void all winnings from duplicate accounts and recover any amounts from your original account if necessary.
Serious Breach
: If we find that you have seriously breached these Terms and Conditions, we may take certain actions against you, as set out in sections 5.12.2, 8.10, 10.5 and 14.2. Such action includes closing your Member account, withholding payments of your deposit balance and winnings, disqualifying you from Games in progress, holding/voiding rewards, Games tickets and complimentary payments, restricting you from opening further accounts, and rendering your entry to competitions or promotions as void. In addition to these, we may temporarily suspend or permanently close your Member account at any time, as set out in section 8.1. If we do so we will refund you your entire withdrawable account balance (other than where stated in section 5.6). If we identify you as playing illegally, we will declare any Wager and winnings made or received whilst playing illegally, as void, as set out in section 5.3. If we suspect any fraudulent payments or any other fraudulent activity, we may suspend or close your account, reverse any withdrawal made and recover any winnings, as set out in section 5.5.
Withholding Payment
: In addition to those examples set out above, we may withhold payments of your deposit balance and winnings in certain other circumstances. This includes where we are required to do so by law (as set out in section 5.6.3).
Member Conduct
: Certain conduct in respect of the Games and Website are prohibited, such as Collusion, as further set out in sections 8 and 15. This includes any forms of collusion or fraud, automatic playing of Games by software and the use of any other technical means to manipulate the outcome of Games, accounts and/or data.
Payment Transactions
: You must not make or attempt to make any chargebacks, and/or deny or reverse any payment and will reimburse us for any chargebacks, denial or reversal of payments and any resulting loss suffered by us, as set out in section 5.5. Other than where you request to withdraw your entire balance, all withdrawals are subject to minimum and maximum limits per transaction, as set out in section 5.7.
Our Decision and Server Results are Final
: We and our records shall be the final authority in determining the terms of any Games you play, any Wagers you place and the circumstances in which such Wagers were placed, as set out in section 15.3. If there is a discrepancy between either the numbers that you believe you have entered or the graphic display of the Game and those in our database, the numbers in the database are final, as set out in section 16.1. For Progressive Jackpot values, it is the value on the server that is used when the Progressive Jackpot is paid out, as set out in section 13.7.
Progressive Jackpots
: We may remove progressive jackpots from time to time; how we will re-distribute contributions in such cases is set out in section 13.5.2.
Major prize winners
: We are obliged to publish certain information in respect of major prize winners, as set out in section 13.8 and 14.5.
Responsible Gambling
: If we have concerns over your level of gambling, we may, in compliance with all relevant regulations and set out in section 10.5: suspend your account; require that you impose a deposit limit or frequency control of your choice; impose a deposit limit or frequency control of our choice; exclude you from receiving or participating in Rewards, Reward schemes, competitions and/or promotions (in certain circumstances, this may include preventing you from completing a Reward scheme, competition or promotion that you have already opted into, or winning/receiving any Reward/prize); stop sending you marketing communications; limiting your ability to play certain Games (including bonus Games); and/or close your account and refund any deposit balance and winnings (if any) to you.
INTRODUCTION
This Website (as defined below) is operated by
Gamesys Operations Limited
(which we will refer to as "
us
", "
we
" and "
our
"), which is a limited company registered in Gibraltar with company number 103854. Our principal place of business is at Suite 2, Floor 4, Waterport Place, Gibraltar. Gamesys Operations Limited is part of a group of companies (which we will refer to as the “
Gamesys Group
”).
In these Terms and Conditions, we will refer to you as "
you
" and "
your
".
These Terms and Conditions form a legally binding agreement between you and us.
These Terms and Conditions apply when you use the Website and supersede any previous agreements in relation to your use of the Website.
We may change these Terms and Conditions from time to time for any reason, for example: (a) to reflect changes to the products and services that we offer; (b) to reflect changes in law or regulation and our compliance with these; (c) for security purposes; and/or (d) to reflect changes in our business practices or operations. We recommend that you revisit and read these Terms and Conditions regularly, as they govern your use of the Website. Our gambling licence requires us to notify you if we make material changes to these Terms and Conditions. When we make material changes to these Terms and Conditions we will either: (i) initiate a re-acceptance process; or (ii) post a notice on the Website and such changes will only come into force fourteen (14) days after the date of such notification. If you do not agree to those changes, please do not continue to use the Website. You are free to close your Member account at any time, including within such fourteen (14) day period.
Your continued use of the Website constitutes ongoing acceptance of these Terms and Conditions and the documents referred to in these Terms and Conditions as they are updated from time to time.
Not all of the legal terms and conditions that apply between you and us are contained within these Terms and Conditions. Some of them are contained in separate sections and cross referred to, to make them easier to read and understand. They are still important terms and form part of the agreement between you and us and you should read them in full. These important terms which form part of the agreement include Sportsbook Rules and Virtual Sports Rules (which can be found
here
. In the event of a conflict between the Sportsbook Rules and the Terms and Conditions, the Sportsbook Rules will prevail.
THE MEANING OF WORDS AND PHRASES USED IN THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS
In these Terms and Conditions, where we use capitalised words they will have the meanings set out below:
Chip Dumping
: means the circumstances where Members and/or Network Users use tables in multiplayer poker Games and tournaments to pass chips to other Members and/or Network Users by deliberately folding hands in a ‘heads up situation’, deliberately losing chips for the benefit of another Member and/or Network User or any other situation that enables intentional passing of funds from one Member to another Member and/or Network User.
Collusion
: means the circumstances where two or more Members and/or Network Users (including where a Member and a Network User may be the same user) work together to cheat by creating an unfair advantage over the other Members and/or Network Users playing a Game, sometimes through: (i) manipulating Wager patterns; (ii) sharing (or attempting to share) information about other Members and/or Network Users playing; and/or (iii) in the case of multiplayer poker Games and tournaments: (a) sharing information about card hands; (b) increasing the size of the pot for the benefit of another Member and/or Network User holding a strong hand; and/or (c) not playing a hand to its full potential with the express intention of helping another Member or Network User advance further in such multiplayer poker Game or tournament.
Complaint
: means any complaint about any Game or our services.
Event Beyond Our Control
: means an event beyond our reasonable control which prevents us from providing all or part of the Website and/or the Games or fulfilling any of our obligations under these Terms and Conditions. Such events may include but are not limited to an act of God, an outbreak of hostilities, riot, civil disturbance, acts of terrorism, the act of any government or authority (including, but not limited to, any refusal or revocation of any licence or consent), fire, explosion, flood, theft, malicious damage, strike, lock-out, or industrial action of any kind.
Gambling Law
: means either:
(a) if you are in the UK, the Gambling Act 2005 (as amended from time to time) and related licence conditions and codes of practice; (b) if you are in Ireland, the Betting Act 1931, the Betting (Amendment) Act 2015 and the Gibraltar Gambling Act 2005 (as amended from time to time (the “GGA”); or (c) if you are outside the UK and Ireland, the GGA and related licence conditions and codes of practice, as applicable.
Game
: means any bingo, casino, slot and/or simulated scratch card games, multiplayer poker games and tournaments, Linked Games and/or any games or betting products (including sportsbook betting) played for real money or any demonstration play via the Website at any time.
Group Website
: means any website (other than the Website) operated and controlled by or on behalf of the Gamesys Group and any mobile or device specific version and any related applications of such website.
Intellectual Property Rights
: means all intellectual property rights, including, but not limited to: copyright, patents, trade marks, design rights, moral rights, domain names, and confidential information and any similar rights (whether registered or unregistered).
Linked Game
: means any Game that can be played between Members and Network Users from time to time.
Malfunction
: has the meaning given in section 5.12.
Member
: means a user of the Website who successfully registers and holds an account on the Website.
Network User
: means users who are registered with a website or service owned and/or operated by a Group Website (other than the Website).
Progressive Jackpot
: means a jackpot for a Game where the payout total is incrementally increased every time such Game is played for real money (unless and until such jackpot is paid out).
Regulators
: means either: (a) the Gambling Commission of Great Britain, who is appointed under the provisions of the Gambling Act 2005 (or any relevant subsequent legislation); (b) the Gibraltar Gambling Commissioner, who is appointed under the provisions of Gibraltar Gambling Act 2005 (or any relevant subsequent legislation), or (c) the Revenue Commissioners of the Republic of Ireland, who are appointed under the provisions of the Betting Act 1931 (as amended), as applicable. Each Regulator is granted powers under the applicable Gambling Law to ensure that their licensees conduct their operations in accordance with their licences.
Rewards
has the meaning given in section
11.1
.
Wager
: means money wagered or otherwise used to participate in or play a Game.
Website
: means the website operated and controlled by or on behalf of us and located at the principle URL
www.monopolycasino.com
and any mobile or device specific version and any related applications of such website.
OPERATING AND REGULATORY INFORMATION
This Website is licensed and regulated: (a) by the Gambling Commission of Great Britain pursuant to applicable Gambling Law (Licence number 38905); (b) by the Government of Gibraltar under remote gaming licence numbers 46 and 153 and regulated under such licence by the Gibraltar Gambling Commission pursuant to applicable Gambling Law; and (c) by the Revenue Commissioners of the Republic of Ireland under an Irish Bookmaker’s Licence pursuant to applicable Gambling law.
If we cannot offer our licensed gaming services from Gibraltar due to an Event Beyond Our Control the services may be offered by another subsidiary of the Gamesys Group.
OPENING YOUR ACCOUNT
Membership Requirements
: To register as a Member, play Games for real money, use the Game console chat functionality, use the sportsbook functionality and/or use any of the other products and services we may make available to Members from time to time, you must:
be 18 years of age or older. We may ask for additional information to confirm your age at any time;
reside in a territory from which we accept users from time to time. Further details can be found
here
. Where you access our Website from an accepted territory that uses EUR (€) instead of GBP (£), all references to GBP (£) across our website and communications with you (including but not limited to (a) these Terms and Conditions, (b) any promotional terms, (c) Games, (d) emails you receive from us) should be treated as meaning EUR (€) and will be converted on a like for like basis (e.g. GBP £1 equates to EUR €1);
register in your own name, for your sole benefit and not register or play on behalf of anyone else;
have a valid bank account, payment card or alternative payment method that corresponds with the name on your account, is a payment method approved by, and is registered to an address in a territory from which we accept users from time to time. We are entitled to assume you are authorised to use your chosen payment method, you do not use corporate or business, cards or accounts, and are using your own funds; we accept no liability where that is not the case. Where we have reasonable grounds to believe that you have used third party funds, we will void any winnings arising from the relevant deposit(s) and we reserve the right to refund any deposit(s) made and to close your account;
not allow anyone to deposit money into your account or to use your account. You may not deposit money given to you by someone else to circumvent restrictions or suspension placed on their account. We will withhold payment of any winnings to you if we suspect such payment is for the benefit of someone else and we reserve the right to refund any deposit(s) made and to close your account;
fully and accurately complete the required information on the registration form; and
comply with these Terms and Conditions at all times in relation to your use of the Website
Age and Identity Verification
:
When considering your Member registration application and certain deposit and withdrawal transactions, we may use independent credit reference agencies to verify your age, identity or any other information that you provide to us. In performing these checks, the credit reference agencies may keep a record of your information. A credit check is not performed and your credit rating will be unaffected. These checks enable your account to be opened, reduce the need to obtain age and identification documents and assist us with our age and identity verification licensing obligations and our crime and fraud prevention policies.
If we cannot satisfactorily complete our age and identity verification process, we may ask you to provide personal identification documents to further confirm and validate your age and identity. Such documents may include (but may not be limited to): a passport or driving licence, a current utility bill or a bank or card statement.
We may suspend your Member account until you have satisfactorily completed these checks. We will communicate all requests to you via the Website and/or by email, phone, SMS or post.
If age and identity verification cannot be completed upon applying to register a Member account, your Member account will not be opened until you have been verified.
The Website and all of the content thereon (including all marketing materials) is intended only for persons aged over 18 years of age. If at any time you are found by us to be under 18 years of age, you will have your Member account suspended, your deposits will be refunded and any winnings will be null and void or may be paid to the appropriate Regulator. No claim may be made against us in these circumstances.
Registration Acceptance and Personal Accounts
: Upon acceptance of your registration as a Member, you will be sent confirmation of your registration by email. You cannot use the full functionality of your account (including, but not limited to, processing any withdrawals) until you have confirmed your email address by clicking on the link in your registration confirmation email. If you have provided an incorrect email address, you can update your details in the My Account section of the Website.
Declined Applications
: We may decline acceptance of a Member account application at any time and for any reason.
Transfer of Accounts and Funds Between Accounts
: You must not sell, transfer or acquire Member accounts to or from other Members or attempt to do so. No funds (including, but not limited to, any winnings) or rewards may be transferred between Member accounts.
Anti-Money Laundering
:
In addition to the age and identity verification requirements described in section
4.2
and as part of our compliance with EU anti-money laundering directives, we may at any time (including, but not limited to, certain stages of your Member account registration) ask you to for additional details including documentation which may be needed to verify your identity and address as well as to confirm proof of ownership for any payment methods and funds used to deposit or withdraw funds. We may suspend transactions on your account until such verification checks are passed.
It is unlawful to deposit, or attempt to deposit, funds obtained from criminal, illegal or fraudulent activities into your Member account.
We are required to monitor any unusual or suspicious transactions of any size and report suspicious transactions and fraudulent activity to the appropriate Regulator, and we may report such activity to the police or relevant authorities.
Duplicate Accounts
: each Member may only have a single account at any one time. If we have reason to believe that you may have opened or may be associated with more than one account, such additional accounts will be classified as “Duplicate Account(s)”. Examples of being associated with more than one account include but are not limited to: using someone else’s account; using someone else’s account details; and/or having multiple accounts under the same address, email, or IP address. We reserve the right, in respect of each Duplicate Account:
In addition to the age and identity verification requirements described in section
4.2
to close each Duplicate Account immediately, leaving you only with your original Member account;
to close all your Member accounts, including both original and Duplicate Account(s) if we believe you may have acted deliberately or fraudulently;
to treat all Rewards, bonuses and/or free bets using the Duplicate Account(s), and all Winnings accrued from any such Rewards, bonuses and/or free bets, as void; and/or
to void all future bets and Wagers on the Duplicate Account (and all winnings accrued from such bets and Wagers).
To the extent that we are not able to fully recover amounts (including but not limited to Rewards and winnings) we have paid out to your Duplicate Account(s), we may recover any such amounts directly from your original Member account and/or from any other Duplicate Account held by you or on your behalf.
ACCOUNT PAYMENTS, WITHDRAWALS AND MALFUNCTIONS
Transaction Charges:
We do not charge you to deposit to or withdraw from your Member account. We accept no responsibility for any currency exchange conversions, charges or fees levied by your card issuer, bank or financial institution.
Minimum and Maximum Deposits:
All deposits are subject to minimum and maximum limits per transaction. These limits may vary depending on the payment method used. Full details can be found in our
FAQs
. We may limit any Member’s deposits on any single day.
Illegal Wagering is Void
: We do not accept liability for any breach by you of the applicable laws of your country of residence, including but not limited to, adjustment of a VPN (virtual private network) in an attempt to appear to reside in a territory from which we accept users, the creation of end user accounts using fraudulent and/or stolen user details or the attempted use of the Website as a means of depositing funds obtained from criminal, illegal or fraudulent activities. If we, on reasonable evidence, identify you as playing illegally, we will declare any Wager and winnings made or received whilst playing illegally, as void.
Interest on Member Account Funds:
We are not a financial institution. Interest will not be payable on monies held in your accounts as these are merely advance payments for intended wagering.
Payment Transactions and Fraudulent and Suspicious Transactions:
You must not make or attempt to make any chargebacks, and/or deny or reverse any payment that you have made and you will reimburse us for any chargebacks, denial or reversal of payments you make and any resulting loss suffered by us. If we are notified of, or become aware of, any fraudulent payment that you have made (including, but not limited to, use of any stolen payment card) or any other fraudulent activity that you have undertaken (including, but not limited to, any chargeback or other reversal of a payment), we may undertake an investigation of such activity. If we do so and have reasonable grounds to suspect any fraudulent payment or fraudulent activity, we may suspend your account whilst the investigation is ongoing and reverse any withdrawal request that you have made. During such time, you will be unable to withdraw funds from, or access, your account. Following such investigation, if you are found to have made any fraudulent payment or undertaken any fraudulent activity we may close your account, retain your balance, void any outstanding winnings, and recover any winnings already paid to you.
Withholding payment
: Subject to our rights to withhold your deposit balance and/or winnings as set out in sections 4.2, 5.3, 5.5, 5.12.2 and 5.12.3, and this 5.6, your deposit balance and winnings (if any) are withdrawable at any time.
We may temporarily withhold payment of your deposit balance and winnings (if any) until verification in accordance with our legal and regulatory obligations (including in respect of age and identity verification and anti-money Laundering, and verification of your financial circumstances and source of funds) has been completed. Upon verification being completed, we will process the payment of the withheld amount to you.
If (based on reasonable evidence) we believe that winnings have been attributed to you due to a Malfunction, we may temporarily suspend the payment of such winnings to you whilst we investigate the Malfunction. If we find that such winnings were not attributed as a result of a Malfunction, we will process the payment of the withheld amounts. Winnings attributed to you as a result of a Malfunction shall be void.
If (based on reasonable evidence) we find that you have seriously breached these Terms and Conditions (including as set out in clause 8.10) we may withhold payment of your deposit balance and winnings (if any) up to any amount proportionate to our loss as a result of such breach.
We may also withhold payments of your deposit balance and winnings (if any) to the extent we are required to do so by law and/or instructed to do so by a Regulator.
Minimum and Maximum Transaction Values:
Other than where you request to withdraw the entire balance of your Member account, all withdrawals are subject to minimum limits per transaction, and such limits may vary depending on the payment method used. All withdrawals are also subject to maximum limits per transaction, and such limits may vary depending on the payment method used. Full details can be found in our
FAQs
. These maximum limits only apply per transaction, and we do not impose any restriction on the maximum amount that you may withdraw in any one time period.
Confirmation of Withdrawal Requests:
Once you have submitted a request to make a withdrawal, you will see a confirmation message that the transfer has been actioned and your balance will immediately clear to the balance of the amount not withdrawn.
Withdrawal Authorisation and Payment
: We aim to authorise your withdrawal request within twenty four (24) hours of our receipt of your request. For security reasons, Members making withdrawals may have to provide some additional information to ensure stringent safeguards are maintained (see sections
4.2
and
4.6
). We are not responsible for any delays in processing your withdrawal requests if you do not receive or respond to our requests for information. Once your withdrawal has been approved, we are not responsible for any third party financial clearing process that delays your payment being received.
Incorrect Account Information:
It is your responsibility to submit the correct bank account details for payment of withdrawals. We cannot repay payments made by us to another account due to incorrect account details provided by you. If a payment is unsuccessful and returned to us by our bank payment processor, we will investigate such payment, notify you and request corrected bank account details. Such unsuccessful payments will only be credited to your corrected account details once we have been notified by our bank payment processor that the payment has been successfully retrieved.
Protection of Customer Funds
: We are responsible for the protection and management of your account balance. We safeguard all Member account balances (including, but not limited to, winnings) in a separate bank account (a client account) that is independent from all of our corporate and operating accounts. Consequently, in the event of our insolvency, while protection of your funds is not absolutely guaranteed, you would be entitled to claim monies from this account. Such protection is classified as “medium protection” under the ratings system set out by the Gambling Commission of Great Britain as detailed here:
https://www.gamblingcommission.gov.uk/public-and-players/guide/page/if-your-money-has-medium-protection
. For further information on your rights in respect of your funds, please visit:
https://www.gamblingcommission.gov.uk/public-and-players/money-and-rights
.
Malfunctions
:
From time to time, technical malfunctions or human errors may occur which affect a Game, pricing data, the Website, and/or a Group Website (“
Malfunctions
”). In some cases, Malfunctions may not be apparent or detectable by you and/or us until our verification checks have been completed. Malfunctions include (but are not limited to):
a)  malfunctions and/or errors relating to the underlying mechanics and maths of Games, including but not limited to where a Game operates other than in accordance with its published ‘return to player’ percentage (being the rate at which winnings are paid out as published in the relevant game rules) or published game rules, or where a bet is accepted at a price materially different from the market or at a clearly incorrect price; and/or
b)  errors in the calculation and/or distribution of winnings (for example if winnings are attributed or distributed to you which you are not due).
If there is a Malfunction: (a) any Wager affected by the Malfunction will be void; and (b) any winnings and/or Rewards awarded to you which you would not have otherwise been awarded but for the Malfunction occurring (“Erroneous Winnings”) will be void. This means that your Wager will not count and any Erroneous Winnings will not be payable to you. This will be the case whether the Erroneous Winnings are credited to your account or not.
If (based on reasonable evidence) we believe that any winnings and/or Rewards have been attributed to you that are Erroneous Winnings, we may temporarily suspend the payment of such winnings and/or Rewards to you whilst we investigate the Malfunction. If we find that such winnings and/or Rewards are not Erroneous Winnings, we will process the payment/credit of the applicable winnings and/or Rewards.
If you are for any reason able to withdraw any Erroneous Winnings, you will be liable to repay the Erroneous Winnings to us or we may deduct the amount of the Erroneous Winnings from any other sums that we may owe you. You should inform us of any Malfunctions as soon as possible and you should not seek to exploit a Malfunction to generate winnings and/or Erroneous Winnings.
Please see section 16 for details of how Game sessions and Wagers are treated if you are disconnected whilst playing a Game or placing a Wager.
To the extent there is a conflict between any third party content as part of a Game such as (but not limited to) in the Game ‘How to Play Rules’ (and/or on the Website) and these Terms and Conditions, these Terms and Conditions will prevail.
Any data made available to you on the Website may contain errors or be interrupted at any time; your reliance on any data found on the Website is entirely at your own risk and should only be for your personal use.
MANAGING YOUR ACCOUNT AND SECURITY
Up to date details
: It is your responsibility to ensure that your personal details are kept up to date. If necessary in connection with the management and operation of your Member account, we may contact you by email, telephone, text message or letter via the contact details you provide to us.
Keeping Password and Member Details Secure
: Your Member account username, password and personal question details are for your personal use and should be kept private and confidential at all times. You should change your password on a regular basis. Where correct security information is provided, we are entitled to assume that all payment and gaming transactions made through your Member account are made by you. You agree to notify us immediately if you become aware or suspect any unauthorised use of your username or password.
Responsible Account Management
: We take no responsibility for any third party access to your Member account and under no circumstances shall we be liable for any losses incurred by you as a result of misuse of your username or password by any person or for any unauthorised access to your Member account (unless this is due to our negligence). All transactions where your username and password have been entered correctly by a third party will be regarded as valid, whether or not authorised by you, except where our negligence or deliberate act has resulted in such party obtaining your username and password. You must monitor your Member account to prevent its use by another person.
CLOSING ACCOUNTS
Account Closure
: We may temporarily suspend or permanently close your Member account at any time. We will take reasonable steps to notify you in advance of any such closure, other than where you have seriously breached these Terms and Conditions (in which case such closure may take effect without notice). If we close your Member account we will refund you your entire withdrawable account balance (other than where stated otherwise in section 5.6 of these Terms and Conditions).
How to Close your Account
: You can close your Member account and request payment of outstanding funds at any time by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
) with the username or registered email details of your Member account. Such closure will occur within seven (7) calendar days after our receipt of your request and we will confirm the closure of your Member account by email. You remain responsible for any activity on your Member account between your request and the closure of your Member account by us.
Dormant Accounts
: If no transaction has been recorded on your Member account for thirty (30) months (and such account has not been self-excluded in accordance with section 10 below), we may choose to close the Member account and remit any balance to you using your last known payment details. Free to play accounts or accounts that have never been funded that have been inactive for a period of twelve (12) months or longer may also be closed by us at any time on 7 days’ notice by email.
Subject to our rights to withhold payments as set out in section 5, on closure of your account your outstanding funds, as recorded on our systems less any active rewards will be transferred to your payment card, bank account or returned by another payment method used by us and you. Closure of your Member account will automatically render any open Games, pre-registration in (or tickets for) multiplayer poker Games and tournaments, Rewards and entries in any Reward schemes, promotions or competitions void. We cannot reinstate these if the Member account is subsequently reopened. We will use reasonable efforts to ensure that you are removed from our marketing lists within two (2) days of your Member account being closed.
Re-Opening your Account
: You may request to re-open a closed Member account by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
) with the details of the Member account you wish to re-open. We will review all requests to re-open a closed Member account. Member accounts closed as part of our self-exclusion or cool off policy cannot be re-opened for any reason until the self-exclusion or cool off time period has expired (see section 10 below).
MEMBER CONDUCT
You must not use the Website:
for any unlawful purpose or in any way that is illegal in the territory from which you are accessing the Website (for example by using or attempting to use the Website to launder the proceeds of crime);
to make any statements or submitting any material that is abusive, defamatory or discriminatory;
to infringe our Intellectual Property Rights (for example by web-scraping);
in an unfair manner, to deliberately cheat in Games, to collude with other Members or Network Users, to exploit loopholes in Games or promotions or otherwise manipulate the Website, or to take unfair advantage of us or our Members or Network Users, such as by making multiple Member accounts for the purposes of obtaining multiple entries into any Games;
to make multiple Member accounts for the purposes of obtaining multiple entries into promotions and Rewards schemes;
for any commercial purpose;
in a way that impairs, interrupts or damages the Website or its efficiency;
to advertise or promote your own or any third party’s products or services;
to distribute any unsolicited communications, including, but not limited to, spam;
in any way other than for your personal use;
from a territory in which the use of this Website is illegal . For further information, see
here
; or
in breach of these Terms and Conditions.
Malicious Code
: You must not use (or upload to the Website or our systems) any form of malware (including, but not limited to, viruses, worms, Trojan horses and spyware) or any other code that may be deemed malicious.
Automatic Game Playing / Manipulation of Software / Software Tools
: To ensure a secure and fair playing environment, automatic playing of Games by software (including, but not limited to, so called “bots”, Trojans, worms, logic-bots, auto-folders, AI-software and any software used for opponent-profiling and automatic betting) or the use of any other technical means to manipulate the outcome of the Games or your/another Member’s/a Network User’s account and/or data is not permitted. This will include, but is not limited to, using programmes to make decisions or take actions on yours or other Members’ or Network Users’ behalf and any form of hacking. To ensure a fair playing environment for all Members and Network Users, certain poker software tools and "advantage software" are also not permitted during play. These include, but are not limited to, hand history databases, so called "HUDs" (heads-up displays of statistical information), tools offering advice on game strategy, accessing services for specific Member information, poker calculators, or any other form of software that could confer a competitive advantage over Members or Network Users not using such software. Members are expected to make all decisions during Games, including poker, themselves, without external assistance of any kind.
Use of such software, programmes, behaviour or activity may (without affecting our other rights and remedies) result in closure of your Member/Network User account, and other associated Member account(s), and the cancellation of any outstanding winnings and deposits. Members that breach this section will not be eligible for reinstatement under different usernames and, in such event, any outstanding winnings and/or deposits in relevant accounts may also be cancelled.
In some circumstances, breaching this section 8.3 may cause you to have committed a criminal offence under the Computer Misuse Act 1990. We may report any such breach to the relevant law enforcement authorities and cooperate with those authorities by disclosing your identity to them.
If you suspect another Member or Network User of breaching this section, please contact our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
).
Employee and Contractor Playing Restrictions
: Except as set out in section 15.4, neither: (a) our employees and contractors; nor (b) the employees and contractors of our service providers (such as, but not limited to, our licensors, software suppliers, partners or developers) may register as Members, play the Games or make transactions on the Website unless authorised to do so by one of our legally entitled officials for test purposes only. No funds or winnings in Member accounts used in this manner may be withdrawn.
Site Activity Monitoring
: Use of the Website may be monitored to ensure that you are not using the Website with a frequency or in a manner which might suggest you are using it for bookmaking or other illicit purposes. We may withhold any monies and/or suspend and/or close your Member account if we consider that the Website is being used by you for bookmaking or other illicit purposes.
Chip Dumping in Multiplayer Poker Games and Tournaments
: Using the Website or a Group Website for Chip Dumping is prohibited. For security reasons we investigate all incidents of Chip Dumping and we may suspend your Member account if we suspect you of being involved in Chip Dumping and if we find (based on reasonable evidence) that such activity has taken place, we may withhold payment of your deposit balance and winnings (if any) up to an amount equal to the funds that have been the subject of the Chip Dumping and close your Member account.
Collusion and Suspicious Activity
: We maintain a zero tolerance policy towards Collusion and all other forms of cheating that might occur on the Website and, in the case of Linked Games, across Group Websites. We have built several systems to ensure the highest levels of fairness and integrity in our poker Games, including algorithms for the automatic detection of Collusion and Chip Dumping. We have also developed advanced software for more detailed investigation of specific cases. Among other things, we monitor: (i) which Members and Network Users play with each other; (ii) hand types and situations arising in multiplayer poker Games and tournaments; and (iii) unusual Wagering patterns. Our Collusion detection systems are there to protect our Members and Network Users and if you feel that you or another Member or Network User has been a victim of Collusion, please notify out security team by emailing
frisk@gamesys.gi
. Please provide as much information as possible about the Collusion and, if the suspicious behaviour occurred during a multiplayer poker Game or tournament, include the table name and on-screen hand number. If we determine (based on reasonable evidence) that a transaction you are connected with is fraudulent, suspicious (including, but not limited to, there being Collusion between Members and/or Network Users whether using our systems or other systems), or involves or may involve an attempt to launder the proceeds of crime, or involves or may involve any other financial crime, or breaches any of our policies, we may retain the amount of that transaction (and any resulting winnings, which shall be null and void) and any other transaction made by you (which may include a connected deposit and any resulting winnings, which shall be null and void).
Fraud or Gaming System Malfunction
: We may withhold winnings and void Wagers, and related Rewards if you are a Member or Network User and: you manipulate or another Member or Network User manipulates the Games in a fraudulent manner; there is Collusion (or suspected Collusion) between Members and/or Network Users; we suspect you of taking unfair advantage of other Members or Network Users; or the gaming system itself Malfunctions. Any such winnings, Wagers, and Rewards shall be null and void.
Compliance with Rules
: You must comply with:
all Game-specific rules; and
any other rules and policies relating to the Website,
that we may publish on the Website from time to time.
Serious Breach
: We may restrict or prevent your use of the Website or close your Member account at any time if we, on reasonable evidence, believe that you have seriously breached any of these Terms and Conditions (including where you do not satisfy any of the requirements set out in section 4.1) and we may disqualify you from Games in progress (whilst we so believe you to be in breach), hold or void Rewards or Games tickets that would have accrued to you during the period of any such breach, suspend your participation in a Reward scheme, competition or promotion that you have already opted into, and restrict you from opening further Member accounts.
Confiscated Funds
: If we suspect you of breaching this section 8 in the course of playing a multi-player game or tournament, and exercise our rights to confiscate funds as set out in these Terms and Conditions, we will use the confiscated funds to compensate those affected by such fraud or cheating. For example, in cases where Members and/or Network Users playing poker have incurred losses as a direct result of cheating (such as Collusion), the confiscated funds are distributed to the Members and Network Users affected in proportion to the damage caused, up to a 100% refund for all Games they have lost. In some cases of payment card fraud or bonus fraud, the confiscated funds may be kept by the Gamesys Group as partial compensation for the losses incurred. This distribution is done by the fairest practical means available, and can vary on a case by case basis; and the Games in question are considered to be null and void, and any prizes that might have theoretically been won are not considered. In cases where both Members and/or Network Users and the Gamesys Group have been adversely affected, the applicable Members and/or Network Users are compensated first.
CHAT FACILITY
Chat Content Standards
: We may provide you with a chat facility to enable you to communicate with other Members, Network Users and our chat hosts on the Website. We may review and keep a record of all content on our chat facility. As a condition of your use of the chat facility, you agree to comply with the
chat rules
(as they are updated from time to time) (“
Chat Rules
”) and the following terms:
you must not make any statements or submit any material that is sexually explicit or offensive, including, but not limited to, messages that are expressions of bigotry, racism, hatred, prejudice or profanity;
you must not make statements or submit any material that is abusive, defamatory or harassing or insulting to other Members or Network Users;
you must not distribute viruses, malware or any other technology that may harm the Website or otherwise disrupt our systems or the systems of other Members or Network Users;
you must not make statements or submit any material that advertises, promotes or otherwise relates to any other websites or online or offline ventures, discusses illegal activities, or post personal details;
you must not make statements or submit any material about us or the Website or any other website or service connected to us that is untrue and/or malicious and/or damaging to us;
you must not hold us responsible for the publication of any Member content in the chat facility or on the Website; and
you must not post any content that you do not have the right to post.
Chat Suspension
: If we consider that content you post on the chat facility is unsuitable, we may restrict or suspend your ability to use the chat facility or close your Member account at our sole discretion and your activity may be reported to your Internet Service Provider (ISP) or the relevant authorities.
Open Forum
: You acknowledge and accept that your communications on the chat facility are not private or confidential, and may be viewed and used by others accessing the Website. You also acknowledge and accept that the chat facility is in use across Group Websites operated by the Gamesys Group. Your communications may therefore be viewed and used by members of those Group Websites. If any communications or content posted on the chat facility makes you feel threatened or abused, or you believe that such communications or content is offensive or otherwise breaches these Terms and Conditions or the Chat Rules, please do contact our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
).
Member Content
: You grant us the right (with the right to sub-license such right) to edit, distribute and exploit the content that you submit via the chat facility, in all media (for example, but not limited to, print, television and internet), which media may be in more than one country. Subject to section 14.5 of these Terms and Conditions, we shall not use any content that you submit for promotional purposes.
Confirmation of Your Rights
: You confirm that you have the right to grant us the rights set out in this section 9.
Moral Rights
: You hereby waive all “moral rights” in any content that you submit via the chat facility, and give to us all the consents that we need to exploit your content in any media as far as possible in perpetuity.
RESPONSIBLE GAMING
Responsible Gaming
: As part of our commitment to Responsible Gaming we provide you with the ability to control and limit your spending, options to temporarily cool off access to your Member account and an option to self-exclude and close your Member account for a set period of time. For more details on how you can control your gambling please visit the Responsible Gaming link in the My Account section of the Website.
Cool Off
: You may temporarily exclude yourself from the Website for a period from twenty four (24) hours up to six (6) weeks by accessing the Responsible Gaming section in the My Account section of the Website, and selecting your required cool off period. On confirming the cool off period your Member account will be immediately suspended and it will not be possible to login to your Member account until the selected duration has expired. Please note that when you select a cool off period it will only apply to the Member account that you are logged into at the time, and will not apply to accounts on other websites or, if you have more than one account in breach of these Terms and Conditions, any other account for this Website. It is not possible for us to override or remove any cool off period once set. Any balances and any advance Wagers (including, but not limited to, pre-purchased bingo tickets, and multiplayer poker Games and tournaments) that you have placed will remain and any winnings will be credited to your Member account. You can only access your winnings after the cool off period has expired. Where you have confirmed the cool off, all future Wagers, stage saved Games, pre-purchased bingo tickets, pre-registration in (or tickets for) multiplayer poker games and tournaments, Rewards and entries in any Reward schemes, promotions and competitions cannot be cancelled but you will not be able to access them during the cool off period. It is possible that rewards may expire during the cool off period, in accordance with the
Reward Rules
, and tickets for multiplayer poker Games and tournaments may also expire. We cannot reinstate any expired bingo tickets, multiplayer poker Games and tournaments, and rewards if the Member account is reopened after the cool off period. We will take all reasonable precautions to ensure you are not able to gamble during the cool off period but, provided we have taken all reasonable precautions, we are not liable to you if you circumvent our procedures.
Deposit Limit and Frequency Control
: You can set a maximum deposit limit and frequency control on your Member account by accessing the Responsible Gaming section in the My Account section of the Website. You can set or decrease such limits at any time with immediate effect. Please note that when you select a deposit limit or frequency control it will only apply to the Member account that you are logged into at the time, and will not apply to accounts on other websites or, if you have more than one account in breach of these Terms and Conditions, any other account for this Website. All requests to increase set limits can take up to seven (7) days to become active. We will take all reasonable precautions to ensure your deposit amount and/or deposit frequency limits are observed but, provided we have taken all reasonable precautions, we are not liable to you if you circumvent our procedures and/or deposit funds into your Member account that exceeds your limits.
Self-Exclusion
: We provide a self-exclusion facility. On request, we will suspend access to your Member account (by way of self-exclusion) for a minimum period of six (6) months and up to five (5) years, during which time it will not be possible for the Member account to be accessed by you for any reason. You can also request to close your Member account at any time by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support (their contact details can be found
here
) with the username or registered email details of the Member account you wish to close. Please ensure you quote the reference ‘Self-Exclusion’ in all correspondence to ensure your Member account is closed for the correct reason.
Upon self-exclusion, all future Wagers, stage saved Games, pre-purchased bingo tickets, pre-registration in (or tickets for) multiplayer poker Games and tournaments, rewards and entries in any reward schemes and competitions cannot be cancelled but you will not be able to access them during the period of self-exclusion. It is possible that pre-purchased bingo tickets or rewards may expire during the period of self-exclusion, in accordance with the Reward Rules. We cannot reinstate any expired rewards if the Member account is reopened after the self-exclusion period. All remaining balances less any active rewards will be transferred to your bank card, bank account or transferred to you through any other third party payment method which we make available.
Member accounts suspended due to self-exclusion cannot be re-opened for any reason until the self-exclusion time period has expired. Upon expiry of the self-exclusion period you may request to re-open a suspended Member account by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support team (their contact details can be found
here
) with the details of the Member account you wish to re-open. Any request to re-open a Member account previously closed due to self-exclusion will be subject to our approval and a 24 hour review period. You may withdraw your request to re-open your Member account at any time during such 24 hour review period. If we approve your request after such 24 hour review period, you will be provided access to your Member account.
You acknowledge that if you elect to self-exclude you are not permitted to open or use a Member account that is operated by any company in the Gamesys Group. If you circumvent the measures that we have in place to exclude you and deposit into a Member account after having elected to self-exclude, all Wagers and winnings made during such time will be void and, subject to our other rights and obligations under these Terms and Conditions, we may refund any amounts that you have deposited during such time to you. You acknowledge that we will not pay out any winnings generated from deposits originating from a payment method we reasonably believe to belong to a person who is self-excluded from websites belonging to the Gamesys Group (or to a person who has otherwise self-excluded through another self-exclusion service). Any such wagers and winnings made during such time will be void and, subject to our other rights and obligations under these Terms and Conditions, we may refund any amounts that you have deposited during such time to you.
Responsible Gaming and Interactions:
We take responsible gaming very seriously and may, in addition to the above, take one or more of the following actions at any time if we have concerns regarding the level of your gambling: suspend your account; require that you impose a deposit limit or frequency control of your choice; impose a deposit limit or frequency control of our choice; exclude you from receiving or participating in Rewards, Reward schemes, competitions and/or promotions (in certain circumstances, this may include preventing you from completing a Reward scheme, competition or promotion that you have already opted into, or winning/receiving any Reward/prize); stopping sending you marketing communications; limiting your ability to play certain Games (including bonus Games); and/or closing your account and refunding any deposit balance and winnings (if any) to you. We may take any of the actions in respect of your account both on this Website and any Group Website. We may contact you from time to time to ask you about your level of gambling (for example via the chat facility, email or phone). You acknowledge the need to respond to any such communications truthfully, and that any failure to respond could result in us taking one or more of the actions listed above.
GAMSTOP
: In addition to the Responsible Gambling tools we make available to you, the national online self-exclusion scheme GAMSTOP allows you to put controls in place to restrict your online gambling activities. By using GAMSTOP (
www.gamstop.co.uk
) you will be prevented from using gambling websites and apps run by companies licensed in Great Britain for a period of your choosing. You acknowledge that your self-exclusion using GAMSTOP is only effective if you do not circumvent the exclusion measures we or GAMSTOP have in place (including by registering additional accounts or accounts with substantially the same registration information albeit inputted in a different way) and, provided we have taken reasonable steps to ensure that whilst you are registered with GAMSTOP you cannot access our products and services, and complied with our regulatory obligations in this regard, we shall not be liable to you in respect of such circumvention
REWARDS
We may offer certain promotional rewards, which may include, but are not limited to the reward types as set out in the Reward Rules such as bonus money and free spins (“
Rewards
”), from time to time. All Rewards are subject to these Terms and Conditions as well as the Reward Rules (and any other specific terms relating to the relevant Reward that we publish. Failure to comply with the Reward Rules will render the applicable Reward and winnings from such Reward as void.
Closure of your Member account will render all Rewards, and your entry into and participation in the applicable Reward scheme, void.
Rewards are not transferable between Member accounts.
We may withdraw, amend or cancel any Reward scheme at our discretion at any time and without notice. If we do so, any Rewards that you have opted in for or otherwise accrued, will still be valid in accordance with the terms that applied at the time of their grant or we will take such other measures as may reasonably be required to ensure that you are not otherwise disadvantaged. Other than in exceptional circumstances, we will provide notice of any withdrawal, amendment or cancellation of a Reward scheme.
We may choose to provide additional complimentary payments to Members, either applied directly to their Member account or through mechanisms such as (but not limited to) offering the facility for Members to participate in bonus Games, schemes, via the chat facility (including, but not limited to, through interaction on chat and chat games) and through other types of games and competitions. The application of any complimentary payment to a Member’s account or the offering of bonus Games or other types of games and competitions does not place any obligation on us to make any similar payment or rewards to any other Member. Where we (on reasonable evidence) consider you to be in serious breach of these Terms and Conditions, or where required to fulfil our regulatory obligations, we may withhold, withdraw, amend or cancel any complimentary payment that we may have applied directly to your Member account.
ACCEPTANCE AND VALIDATION OF WAGERING
Confirmed Wagers
: A Wager is only placed when you receive confirmation from us, by way of on screen display of a transaction ID, that the Wager has been accepted. At that time, the amount of the Wager will be charged against your Member account. All Wagers (including, but not limited to, any payments for using pre-purchased bingo tickets and for pre-registration in (or tickets for) multiplayer poker Games and tournaments) are final. We cannot cancel or refund Wagers once they have been confirmed by us unless the Wager is declared void for any reason outlined in these Terms and Conditions.
Minimum Wager
: A minimum Wager amount applies to each Game, unless otherwise specified. The minimum amount will be shown before you participate in the relevant Game.
Deduction of Wagers / Unresolved Wagers
: The cost of a Wager will be deducted from your Member account at the time of placing your Wager, no matter when the result is determined. Except in the case of pre-registration in multiplayer poker Games and tournaments, where in some cases you may be able to cancel your entry before the multiplayer poker Game or tournament has started and you will be refunded your cost of entry, we cannot refund Wagers purchased for future plays that have not yet been settled. Any winnings related to such Wagers will be credited to your Member account once the play has been settled.
Our right to Cancel / Terminate Games
: We may cancel, amend, remove or terminate any Game at any time without notice. If a Game is cancelled, amended, removed or terminated in a way that means it is not possible to resolve a Wager that you placed, then that Game shall be deemed null and void and the Wager will be credited back to your Member account.
Cancellation of Multiplayer Poker Games and Tournaments
: In the unlikely event that a multiplayer poker game or tournament is cancelled, Members remaining in the multiplayer poker game or tournament will be compensated according to the Poker Cancellation Policy, which you can find
here
.
Our right to Postpone Games
: We may postpone or pause any Game at our sole discretion. In this case, any Wagers for the postponed Game shall still stand and the Game will be executed at the new time set by us.
PAYMENT OF WINNINGS
Crediting Winnings
: Winnings due on Wagers placed through your Member account will be credited to your current deposit balance automatically. This update of your Member account is not ‘proof of win’. If upon manual review there is evidence of fraud, Malfunction or that you have cheated or done anything to enable or assist any other person to cheat, including by exploiting or manipulating loopholes in Game software or the Website, we may void certain Wagers and winnings and amend Member accounts accordingly.
Rounding of Winnings
: We use a Wager multiplier to calculate and accumulate gaming odds and it is therefore possible that for certain Games, winnings payouts can be displayed for presentational clarity having been rounded down to two decimal places to the nearest currency unit (for example, pence (GBP) or cents (EUR) (or currency equivalent, if applicable)). However, our (and/or any of our third party Game and/or service providers’) servers calculate and record the exact decimal value of the accumulated winnings payouts and Members’ balances.
Our Decision is Final
: You agree that we and our records (and/or the records of any of our third party Game and/or service providers) shall be the final authority in determining the terms of any Games you play, any Wagers you place and the circumstances in which such Wagers were placed, subject to your rights under section 19.1 of these Terms and Conditions.
Taxation on Winnings
: Any applicable taxes and fees in connection with any winnings awarded to you are your sole responsibility.
Progressive Jackpots
:
We may choose to make available to Members pooled Progressive Jackpots across networks and services owned and operated by the Gamesys Group and third parties.
We may remove (or ‘decommission’) Progressive Jackpots at any time (including before the Progressive Jackpot has been won). Where we do so and a live Progressive Jackpot contains player contributions, we will always re-distribute such contributions fairly according to the circumstances.
Progressive Jackpot Winnings
: All Progressive Jackpot winnings will be subject to our confirmation. Our decision will be final and no correspondence will be entered into, subject to your rights under section 20.1 of these Terms and Conditions.
Progressive Jackpot Accuracy
: We use reasonable endeavours to ensure that the Progressive Jackpot value displayed in a Game matches the value on the Game server. However, it is the Progressive Jackpot value on the server that is used when the Progressive Jackpot is paid out. A small discrepancy may arise due to the delay between the initial Progressive Jackpot being displayed to you and the Progressive Jackpot that is actually won and paid out. Although unlikely, it is theoretically possible for the Progressive Jackpot to appear to be won by more than one Member during the delay period mentioned above. If more than one Member appears to win a Progressive Jackpot simultaneously then the Member recorded on our servers and/or our Game or service providers’ servers as having won the Progressive Jackpot first shall be the recipient and the subsequent Member(s) shall win the value of the Progressive Jackpot when reset. In the extremely unlikely event of the server recording a win truly simultaneously, we may share the Progressive Jackpot equally between the winning Members.
Publication of Winnings
: For winnings greater than £/€100, your first name, initial letter of your surname and county may be published if we receive a request from an individual pursuant to rule 8.28.5 of the UK Code of Non-broadcast Advertising & Direct and Promotional Marketing.
COMPETITIONS AND PROMOTIONS
From time to time we may offer you the chance to enter competitions and promotions. We will provide the specific terms and conditions for such competitions and promotions at the relevant time. You should therefore read these Terms and Conditions in combination with the applicable specific terms for any competition or promotion you wish to enter. Where such specific terms conflict with these Terms and Conditions, the specific terms will take precedence.
Serious failure to comply with these Terms and Conditions and/or failure to comply with the applicable specific terms for a competition or promotion will automatically render your entry to such competition or promotion as void.
Closure of your Member account during a competition or promotion in which you have participated will render your entry into and participation in such competition or promotion void, and you will not be able to receive a prize.
We may withdraw or amend any competition or promotion at any time. Any such withdrawal or amendment will not impact any player who has already opted into the competition or promotion, or otherwise accrued any prizes in relation to such competition or promotion, prior to the withdrawal or amendment coming into effect (unless any such withdrawal or amendment is necessary to prevent fraud or similar unlawful behaviour).
Publication of Winners
: We are required to publish or make available information that indicates a valid award took place in connection with competitions and promotions that we run. To comply with this obligation, we may publish information about major prize winners on the Website or at such other location as may be specified in the specific terms and conditions for the relevant competition or promotion. Alternatively, if this information is not published, it will be made available on request by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support team
here
. Unless otherwise stated in the specific terms and conditions for the relevant competition or promotion, the information we typically publish or make available is: surname, county and, where applicable, the winning entry. We consider a major prize winner to be a winner of a prize worth more than £/€100. If you object to information about you being published or made available in this manner, please inform us by contacting our 24/7 Customer Support team
here
or by using the contact method set out in the specific terms and conditions of the relevant competition or promotion. In such circumstances, we are still required to provide this information to the Advertising Standards Authority on request.
REGULATION OF RESULTS
Our Server Evidenced Results
: If there is a discrepancy between either the numbers that you believe that you have entered or the graphic display of the Game you have played and those in our (or any of our third party Game or service providers’) database, the numbers in the database are considered valid and no correspondence disputing such issues will be entered into by us.
Random Number Generator
: You accept and agree that: (a) random number generator software, hosted on our (or any of our third party Game or service providers’) servers will determine the outcome of the Games; (b) if the result shown on the Software conflicts with the result shown on our (or any of our third party Game or service providers’) server, the result shown on our (or any of our third party Game or service providers’) server shall in all circumstances take precedence; and (c) our (or any of our third party Game or service providers’) records shall be the final authority in determining the circumstances of your use of the Website and you shall have no right to dispute our decisions in regard to such matters, except as set out under section 19.1 of these Terms and Conditions.
Integrity of Random Number Generator
: The output of our (or our third party Game or service providers’) random number generator is monitored and tested regularly by us and an independent accredited test facility to ensure it performs within expected bounds and in accordance with the relevant Regulator’s requirements.
Chat Hosts in Multiplayer Poker Games and Tournaments
: Occasionally, you might see our chat hosts playing in multiplayer poker games or tournaments, or informing you about related promotions. They will be clearly identified as chat hosts, and their play will be in accordance with our Poker Chat Host Policy, which you can see
here
.
Results of Members of Group Websites
: If you are a Network User and participate in a relevant multiplayer poker Game or tournament, we may report any actual or suspected act of Collusion, Chip Dumping, soft play, automated playing, manipulation of software, taking unfair advantage, fraud, money laundering, financial crime, or any other breach of our policies, including but not limited to this section 15, to the relevant Group Website. Such actual or suspected acts shall be dealt with by the relevant Group Website in accordance with its policies. This may result in the withholding of winnings, voiding of Wagers and related bonus and rewards by the relevant Group Website, together with the closure of your account with the relevant Group Website (as further described in the relevant Group Website’s policies). For the avoidance of doubt, we shall not be able to assist you in relation to any decisions made by the relevant Group Website.
Complaints:
If you would like to make a Complaint, please refer to our Complaints Policy (which can be found
here
).
Member Account Balances
: Save as a result of manifest error or our negligence, the balance of your Member account will at all times be as recorded on our server.
Autoplay Facility
: If you use an autoplay facility that we make available on any of our Games, the outcome of any spins prior to pressing the STOP button, including, but not limited to, any spin in progress at the time you press the STOP button cannot be reversed.
DISCONNECTIONS AND OTHER EVENTS BEYOND OUR CONTROL
Disconnection information
: The Games are played over telecommunications networks. If you are disconnected from the Internet or a mobile telephone network, then: your status in the applicable Game will be dependent on the type of Game you were playing/about to play. By way of explanation:
if you were playing a single player Game and you had not commenced the Game when you were disconnected, the Game will not take place;
if you had commenced the single player Game when you were disconnected, the Game will be recorded on the Game servers and your Wagers will stand and the outcome will be reflected in your Member account status;
if you had commenced a multi-player Game or Linked Game of casino table games and placed a Wager before you were disconnected, then you will take default actions (for example, stand in a blackjack Game automatically) until you re-join or until the Game ends; and
if you had commenced a multi-player Game of roulette and placed a Wager before you were disconnected, then the Game will auto-play and your Wager will stand, and the outcome will be reflected in your Member account status.
Some single player Games are multi stage and may include bonus Games. If you are disconnected from the Internet or a mobile telephone network during a bonus Game or a multi stage Game, reconnecting and re-selecting the Game (at the same value where applicable) should cause the Game to recommence from the point at which it terminated. Non multi stage Games will complete the outcome of the Game or bonus Game in your absence and will credit your Member account if you win. If a bonus Game cannot for any reason be recommenced in this way, this is considered a Malfunction unless otherwise stated in the specific Game rules. If there is a disconnection, the records stored on the Game server shall be the final authority in determining the terms of any Wagers you place and the circumstances in which they were made. Malfunction voids all Wagers and play, resulting in the amounts of your Wagers being refunded.
Disconnection from a Linked Multiplayer Poker Game or Tournament due to a Malfunction:
If you are disconnected from a multiplayer poker game or tournament that is a Linked Game during a hand due to a Malfunction of the Website but no such Malfunction occurs on any of the other Group Websites, then you may be treated as sitting out and take default actions (for example, check or fold, or post blinds automatically when it is your turn to post blinds) until you are able to re-join the Linked Game or until the Linked Game ends.
If you are disconnected from a multiplayer poker game or tournament that is a Linked Game during a hand due to a Malfunction of all of the relevant Group Websites, then the relevant Linked Game shall be cancelled, all Wagers and play shall be void, and the amounts of your Wagers shall be refunded.
LIMITS ON LIABILITY
You agree that you will only use the Website in accordance with these Terms and Conditions.
Nothing in these Terms and Conditions shall exclude or limit our liability for fraud, fraudulent misrepresentation or for death or personal injury resulting from our negligence or the negligence by us, our employees or agents.
You have certain rights under the law. These include that we will provide services with reasonable skill and care and within a reasonable time.
You have certain legal remedies if we breach any of these rights which may apply irrespective of these Terms and Conditions. Nothing in these Terms and Conditions is intended to affect these legal rights or other rights to which you may also be entitled.
You acknowledge and agree that we are not responsible for any damages, losses, expenses or claims which may be caused by any:
failure of any telecommunications or other data transmission system that results in:
(a) the failure of, or damage or destruction to, our central computer system or records, or any part thereof; or
(b) delays, losses, errors or omissions (including, but not limited to, any delay resulting in non-receipt of any entry for a particular draw);
Event Beyond Our Control; or
third party interception or misuse of Members’ payment details.
If we breach these Terms and Conditions, we shall only be liable to you for losses which are a reasonably foreseeable consequence of such a breach (which means that the losses could have been contemplated by you or us at the time of entering these Terms and Conditions). In no case shall we be liable for indirect, incidental or consequential damages which are a side effect of the main damage and were not reasonably foreseeable at the time of entering these Terms and Conditions.
Subject to Sections 17.2 to 17.4, in no case shall our liability to you exceed the greater of:
where such liability relates to a specific Wager, the value of such Wager paid by you; or
where such liability relates to any money in your Member account which has been misplaced, the amount that has been misplaced; or
the amount of GBP 1,000 (£1,000) (or EUR or other currency equivalent, if applicable).
We do not endorse, warrant or guarantee any third party product or services shown on the Website and will not be a party to or in any way be responsible for monitoring any transaction between you and third-party providers of products or services.
You acknowledge that if you gamble there is a risk that you may lose money.
Subject to Sections 17.2 to 17.4, the Website (including, but not limited to, the Games and all other functionality) is provided on an "as is" and "as available" basis for your use, without warranties of any kind, either express or implied. We do not guarantee that: (a) you will be able to access or use the Website at times or locations of your choosing; or (b) any files that you download are free from malware, viruses, contamination or destructive features
Whilst we use reasonable efforts to correct any inaccuracies, errors or omissions as soon as practicable once they have been brought to our attention, we do not promise that any information provided as part of the Website itself will be accurate or free from errors or omissions.
Whilst we use reasonable endeavours to provide the Website and the Games reliably, outages and unexpected downtime will occur. We do not make any guarantee of uninterrupted service. Access to the Website may be suspended temporarily and without notice in the case of system failure, Malfunction, maintenance or repair or for an Event Beyond Our Control (including, but not limited to, outages or software errors that result from actions taken by social media websites).
The information and other content provided as part of the Website does not constitute any kind of advice, recommendation or endorsement by us and is not intended to be relied upon by you in making (or refraining from making) any specific decision.
Subject to us taking reasonable steps to notify you of any account closure in accordance with Section 7.1, we may discontinue, withdraw, terminate or modify the Website or any part of the Website (including any Game) at any time.
COPYRIGHT AND INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS
General
: The Website and all content and software made available on it (including, but not limited to, the Games and pricing data) (together the “
Website Material
”) are our exclusive property or are used under licence by us.
We are the owner or the licensee of all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Website Material. The names of products and services (including, but not limited to, the names of our Games) are the trade marks of us or our licensors. The Website Material is protected by copyright laws and treaties around the world. All rights in and to the Website Material (including all Intellectual Property Rights) are reserved.
We take breaches of our Intellectual Property Rights seriously and may take legal action in respect of any infringements.
Your Use of Website Material
: The Website Material is made available to you for use on a non-commercial entertainment basis only. Any other use (including, but not limited to, republication) of the Website Material is subject to our prior written approval.
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, you may not sell, assign, license, distribute, copy, modify, publicly perform or display, transmit, publish, edit, adapt, create derivative works from, or otherwise make unauthorised use of the Website Material without our express prior written consent. Except as permitted by applicable law you must not de-compile, re-engineer or disassemble the Website Material, nor attempt to interfere with its correct operation. You agree not to remove, obscure, or alter any copyright, patent, trade mark, or other proprietary rights notices affixed to Website Material.
Subject to these Terms and Conditions, you may download one copy of insubstantial excerpts of the Website Material to your PC, mobile or any other device for the sole purpose of viewing it.
If you print off, copy, download or use any part of the Website Material in breach of these Terms and Conditions, your right to use the Website Material will cease immediately and you must, at our option, immediately return, permanently delete or destroy any copies of the Website Material you have made.
Software Licence
: The Website Material may include or make available software which may be downloaded and installed on your PC, mobile and/or any other device. Subject to these Terms and Conditions, we hereby grant to you a revocable, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable licence for the use of such software on PC, mobile and/or any other device owned or operated by you, solely for the purpose of playing our Games and managing your Member account.
No assignment
: Except as expressly set out in this section 18, you neither have nor obtain any right, title or interest in or to the Website Material or any rights therein (including, but not limited to, Intellectual Property Rights) of us or our licensors. All such right, title and interest (including goodwill) arising from your use of the Website Material will vest in us or our licensors (as applicable). We may, at any time, call for a confirmatory assignment of such right, title and interest (including, but not limited to, goodwill), and you agree to immediately execute it.
Submission of Information
: Except for personal information (which shall be dealt with in accordance with our
Privacy Policy
), you hereby grant to us the right (with the right to sub-license such right) to use any and all material and information (including, but not limited to, ideas, suggestions, concepts and graphics) submitted to us or to other Members or Network Users through this Website. You agree that we will not be subject to any obligation of confidentiality in respect of such material and information, and we will be free to use such material and information in any way and for any purpose.
MISCELLANEOUS
Jurisdiction
: If you have a Complaint, please do follow our complaints procedure as set out in our
FAQs
. If you wish to take court proceedings against us, any disputes shall be subject to the laws of England and Wales and subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of England and Wales (or the laws and courts of Scotland or Northern Ireland if you reside there).
Disallowed terms
: If any part of these Terms and Conditions is disallowed or found to be ineffective, then the other provisions of these Terms and Conditions shall continue to apply.
No Waiver of rights
: If you breach any of these Terms and Conditions and we do not take any action against you, we are still entitled to use our rights and remedies in any other situation where you breach these Terms and Conditions.
Third parties
: These Terms and Conditions form an agreement between you and us and are not intended to give any rights to any third party. This does not affect our right to transfer our rights under section 19.5 below.
Transfer of rights
: We may wish to transfer our rights or obligations under these Terms and Conditions to any other company within the Gamesys Group or any other legal entity (including but not limited to if we restructure our business or if there is a sale of our business). You agree that we may do so provided that in the case of a transfer, after we notify you of the date on which we transfer our rights and obligations under these Terms and Conditions, your rights in connection with these Terms and Conditions will be against the new legal entity. These Terms and Conditions are personal to you and you may not transfer your rights or obligations under these Terms and Conditions to anyone else.
These Terms and Conditions
: These Terms and Conditions apply when you use the Website and supersede any previous agreements in relation to your use of the Website. You confirm that you have not accepted these Terms and Conditions as a result of any statements made by us that are not contained in these Terms and Conditions. If you wish to receive copies of former terms and conditions please contact our Customer Support (their contact details can be found
here
).
REWARD RULES
Please note: These Reward Rules were updated on 29th January 2025.
Reward types
: From time to time, at our own discretion, we may offer certain promotional rewards on the website which may include the following:
a)
Bonuses
– non-withdrawable ‘bonus money’, which may be subject to certain wagering requirements (see section 4 below);
b)
Refer a Friend Reward
– a reward based on you successfully referring friends to the website – please see
Refer a Friend Rules
for specific Rules, which may vary from time to time;
c)
Free Spins
– free spins (sometimes restricted to selected games), which may be made available to you as part of various promotions on the website, including the Welcome Offer – please see the
Welcome Offer Rules
for specific rules, which may vary from time to time;
d)
Free Bingo Tickets
– tickets (sometimes restricted to selected games or excluding selected games), which may be made available to you as part of various promotions on the website and/or in Chat, including the Welcome Offer – please see the
Welcome Offer Rules
for specific rules, which may vary from time to time;
e)
Poker Tickets
– tickets with a face value, which may be used to play multiplayer poker games of that buy-in amount; or promotional tickets, which may be used to play certain promotional multiplayer poker games; and
f)
Free Bets
– a Free Bet is a promotional offer entitling you to place a sportsbook bet without prior deduction of the stake from your account balance. This may be awarded as a non-withdrawable reward that may be used to place such a sportsbook bet.
Conditions of Rewards:
Some of the above rewards may be offered to you on you completing certain actions on the website (including but not limited to making a minimum deposit or minimum wager), or they may be offered to you on a complimentary basis. If specific rules apply to such rewards, these will be made available to you at the relevant time and you should read the specific rules in combination with these Reward Rules.
Expiry of Rewards:
Unless specified otherwise in specific rules, rewards must be claimed within 7 days of notification, and once claimed will expire if not used in full (or if any applicable wagering requirements are not met) within 30 days. Rewards cannot be reinstated once expired.
Wagering with Bonuses
:
a) Wagering Requirements: Where communicated to you, certain bonus money may be subject to completing wagering/bet requirements before a cash withdrawal can be made. Wagering is when you place a bet (or wager) on a game or sporting event using any funds in your account balance and once these are met you can withdraw any winnings relating to your bonus and the following will apply:
i. For each bonus (unless otherwise specified in any bonus-specific rules), you must wager a minimum of 1 times the value of such bonus; and
ii. Your wagering requirements are displayed in your My Account section on the Withdrawals page, where an example of how much you will need to wager will be displayed along with any withdrawable balance.
b) Wagering order**:** When you have an active bonus, the amounts you wager will be deducted from your total balance in the following order:
i. From any net winnings (over the amount of your bonus and including winnings from other types of rewards); and
ii. Then from your bonus; and
iii. Then from any other funds (including any cash balance).
c) Withdrawal: You cannot withdraw your bonus or any winnings won when wagering with your bonus until you have completed the wagering requirements. Withdrawals of winnings won when wagering with a bonus may be subject to a delay of up to 36 hours.
Free Bets
: The following standard terms and conditions shall apply to all Free Bets unless otherwise set out in any relevant specific promotional terms and conditions. Free Bets:
a. must be used within seven (7) days of being credited to your account, otherwise the Free Bet will expire and be removed from your account.
b. may only be used to place a bet of the same value as the applicable Free Bet;
c. may require you to place a bet at minimum odds as specified in any relevant specific promotional terms and conditions;
d. cannot be used to claim any other reward or bonus (including any Free Bet);
e. may only be used one at a time;
f. may be required to be placed on one (1) or more specific events as set out in any relevant specific promotional terms and conditions;
g. cannot be withdrawn as cash;
h. are non-transferable and there is no cash alternative; and
i. will not be returned as a stake on a winning Free Bet, and only the winnings from the Free Bet will be credited to your account.
Depositing:
Your deposit balance (if any) is withdrawable at any time during any reward related promotional period.
Multiple Accounts:
You can only take part in rewards promotions once. If we detect that any Member has created more than one account (including in order to take part in rewards promotion multiple times, in breach of these Rules) we shall be entitled to close any such accounts (and void any rewards and related winnings).
Compliance with terms
: By accepting any Reward, you agree to be bound by these Reward Rules and any applicable rules made available to you before or on accepting a Reward. You must also comply with the website
terms and conditions
at all times, specifically clause 8.1. Failure to comply with the website terms and conditions will automatically render any Reward offered to you as void.
WELCOME OFFER RULES
PLEASE NOTE: these rules were updated on 29th January 2025.
If you are a new member, you will be eligible to receive either:
a) 30 free spins (1p coin size, maximum lines) for the game MONOPOLY Paradise Mansion (“
Free Spins
”);
or
b) 50 free bingo tickets (“
Free Bingo Tickets
”) on applicable games (see section 5(b) below).
To be eligible for this promotion, you must successfully complete the following criteria (the “
Qualifying Requirements
”):
a) register as a member of this website, which means that you must accept our website terms and conditions (which can be found
here
);
b) opt in to this promotion by selecting either the Free Spins offer or the Free Bingo Tickets offer before making your first deposit;
c) make a first deposit of at least £/€10; and
d) wager at least £/€10 in cash on any game(s).
You have 30 days from when you opt-in and make your first deposit to complete the remaining Qualifying Requirements and play any Free Spins or any Free Bingo Tickets before they expire.
If you do not opt in to this promotion by selecting either Free Bingo Tickets or Free Spins before you make your first deposit, you will not be eligible to opt in to this promotion retrospectively. Your choice is locked in at the point that a successful first deposit is made, and cannot be exchanged or altered after this time.
If selected, Free Bingo Tickets:
a) have a maximum value of £/€50 (if used to buy £/€1 tickets) and a minimum value of 50p/cents (if used to buy 1p/cent tickets). Free Bingo Ticket availability at maximum value is based on bingo game ‘max ticket’ restrictions per game, and game schedule;
b) can be used on any bingo game on the website, with the exception of Session Bingo. We reserve the right to amend these Rules in the future to exclude additional bingo games, including new bingo games but any such amendment will not impact any player who has already opted in to the promotion prior to the amendment coming into effect; and
c) can only be used for buy-in to the next game available at the time of ticket redemption, and not to advance buy or to bulk buy tickets.
If selected, Free Spins:
a) are credited once the game is opened, refreshed or you leave the game to the home page and return to it; and
b) must all be played through before your account balance will be updated with any applicable winnings.
You can only take part in this promotion once. If we detect that any member has created more than one account (including in order to take part in this promotion multiple times, in breach of these Rules) we shall be entitled to close any such accounts (and void any Free Spins, Free Bingo Tickets and related winnings).
Your deposit balance and winnings (if any) are withdrawable at any time during this promotion, subject to our rights to temporarily withhold payments as further set out in section 5 of the
website terms and conditions
.
We aim to make Free Spins or Free Bingo Tickets available instantly when you complete the Qualifying Requirements, but please allow up to 72 hours in the case of technical difficulties.
If you opt in to this promotion, you agree to comply with the website terms and conditions and these Rules at all times. If (based on reasonable evidence) we find that you have seriously breached the
website terms and conditions
or these Rules, we may render Free Spins, Free Bingo Tickets and related winnings in your member account void, and we reserve the right to close your member account.
These rules exclude any type of betting on the sports section of this website.
REFER A FRIEND RULES
These rules were updated on 29 January 2025.
If you wish to apply for the Refer a Friend promotion, you must ensure that each of the friends who receive a referral (by your personal invitation or social media communication) are aged 18 or over.
You will only be eligible for the Refer a Friend promotion if:
a)
you
:
have deposited and wagered on this website on at least one occasion; and
comply with these rules and the Website
terms and conditions
b)
your friend
:
successfully registers as a member of this website (which includes, but is not limited to passing our internal age verification and identity checks);
selects the same currency as you;
deposits a minimum of £/€10; and
wagers a minimum total of £/€40 and satisfies the wagering requirements (see the Refer a Friend Wagering Rules in paragraph 11 below)
Once all requirements as set out in paragraph 2 above have been met, you will receive a £/€20 credit to your account balance. Please allow up to 72 hours for this to appear in your account balance.
Both your and your friend’s deposit balance and winnings (if any) are withdrawable at any time during this promotion, subject to our right to temporarily withhold payments as set out in section 5 of
the website terms and conditions
.
Your entry into this promotion will be rendered void if your friend withdraws their deposit, or you or your friend close your member accounts before all of the requirements in paragraph 2 above have been met, or after those requirements have been met, but before your member account has been credited.
Your friend will not be able to use Paysafecard as a payment method at any time.
You can successfully refer a maximum of five (5) friends under these Refer a Friend rules meaning the maximum amount of credit you can receive is £/€100. If you refer more than five (5) friends you will not receive any further credit to your account balance under these Refer a Friend rules.
You are not permitted to refer yourself or other existing Members of this website to the Refer a Friend promotion.
Multiple accounts are not permitted and the Refer a Friend reward is not transferable between Member accounts.
Your friend will also be eligible to receive the Welcome Offer upon registration as a member (subject to your friend completing the opt-in requirements of the Welcome Offer and their compliance with the Welcome Offer Rules).
Refer A Friend Wagering Rules:
Wagering is when you place a cash bet on a game. Wagering on different games contributes different amounts towards your friend’s wagering requirements on their first deposit following registration.
To be eligible for the Refer a Friend promotion, your friend will need to wager a minimum of £/€40 to meet their wagering requirements. Wagering on different games contributes different amounts towards your friend’s wagering requirements. This means that some games contribute towards their wagering requirements more than other games. Wagering on Bingo games will contribute 100% to their wagering requirements. Poker buy-ins will contribute 20% of each buy-in towards their wagering requirements, wagers on Slots will contribute 10% of each wager towards their wagering requirements, wagers on Instant and Casino games (except where subsequently mentioned) will contribute 5% of each wager towards their wagering requirements, wagers on Roulette Splendide, 3D Roulette, Multiplayer Roulette, European Roulette, Roulette Lite, High Stakes Roulette, Mega Ball and all other Live Casino games except where mentioned below) will contribute 2.5% of each wager towards their wagering requirements. Any wagering using free spins or free tickets will not contribute towards the wagering requirements.
All wagers on Blackjack, Baccarat, Ultimate Texas Hold’em, Craps, Video Poker games and on the ‘Streets of Gold’ Multiplayer Roulette sidebet do not contribute to any wagering requirements.
This table sets out: (a) the percentage that wagers on each game contribute towards the wagering requirements; and (b) the total amount your friend would need to wager, if playing only on that game type.
Game
Percentage of each wager on the game that will contribute towards your wagering requirements
Total amount you need to wager, if playing on only this game type
Bingo (except where mentioned below)
100%
£/€40
Slots
10%
£/€400
Multi-player Poker (by reference to player-to-player poker buy-ins and not in game wagering)
20%
£/€200
Except where mentioned below, Instant and Casino games (including Mega Ball and all other Live Casino games)
5%
£/€800
Roulette Splendide, 3D Roulette, Streets of Gold Roulette, Multiplayer Roulette, European Roulette, Roulette Lite, High Stakes Roulette and Mega Ball (including any Live Casino versions of such games)
2.5%
£/€1600
Blackjack, Baccarat, Ultimate Texas Hold’em, Video Poker, ‘Streets of Gold’ Roulette sidebet, Craps and all other games not mentioned above (including any Live Casino versions of such games)
0% (no contribution)
£/€0.00 (no contribution)
12. These rules exclude any type of betting on the sports section of this website.
Sportsbook Rules
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Section A - Conditions of agreement
Introduction
Definitions
Bet Acceptance
Betting and Payout Limitations
Cancellation (Voiding) of Bets
Disclaimer and Priority
Section B - General Betting Rules
Common Terms of Reference
Bet Types
Betting Props
System Bets
Result Settlement
Tattersalls Rule 4
Section C - Sport Specific/Category Rules
Olympic and Championship events
American Football
Athletics
Australian Rules Football
Drone Racing
Baseball
Basketball
Beach Volleyball
Boxing
Cricket
Curling
Cycling (Road & Track)
Cyclo Cross
Football
Golf
Handball
Trotting
Ice Hockey
Motor Sports
Netball
Pesäpallo (Finnish Baseball)
Rugby League
Rugby Union
Lacrosse
Speedway
Surfing
Swimming
Tennis and Racket Sports (Badminton, Jai-Alai, Squash, Padel, Pickleball & Table Tennis)
Volleyball
Winter Sports
Other (Non-Sport/Special)
Mixed Martial Arts
Snooker
Darts
Section D - Racing
Horse Racing
Greyhounds
Section E - eSports
eSports
A. Conditions of agreement
Introduction
This set of terms and conditions govern the use of our Sportsbook (the “Sportsbook Rules”). When placing a bet with our Sportsbook, the Member agrees that they have read, understood and agree to be bound, by these Sportsbook Rules in addition to our general Terms and Conditions applicable at any time, click
here
. You may also find it useful to read our
FAQs section
.
The use of our Sportsbook is subject to the regulations imposed by the Gambling Commission in Great Britain, and the Gibraltar Gambling Commission (the “Regulator”). To the extent that any decision issued by the Regulator conflicts, or is inconsistent, with these Sportsbook Rules, the decision issued by the Regulator will supersede any relevant clause(s) of these Sportsbook rules.
We reserve the right to make changes to betting limits and offerings.
Any reference in these Sportsbook Rules, to words/objects that appear in singular, also applies to plural. References to gender are non-binding and to be treated for information purposes only. All references to “including” shall mean “including without limitation”.
These Sportsbook Rules were last updated on 29th January 2025, and supersede any previous version. We reserve the right to make changes to the Sportsbook Rules at any time.
Definitions
"Error" is a mistake, misprint, misinterpretation, mishearing, misreading, mistranslation, spelling mistake, technical hazard, registration error, transaction error, manifest error, force majeure event and/or similar, which may or may not be apparent to us and/or the Member at the relevant time which has caused or resulted in bets being offered and/or accepted. Examples of errors include, but are not limited to:
As a result of failure of established risk management controls.
As a result of inappropriate manipulation of offers or settlement procedures as well as any fraudulent activity.
Incorrect payouts.
Cyber attacks.
Bets accepted:
During technical problems that would otherwise not have been accepted; at odds/prices that have been increased, improved or enhanced from the odds/prices that would have otherwise been offered.
On events/offers that have already been decided or concluded, or in relation to which we had suspended betting.
On events/offers after the event/match/offer has started (except for live betting bet types).
On markets/events containing participants that are not part of the event.
Otherwise than in accordance with the applicable laws.
At odds that are materially different from those available in the general betting industry at the time the bet was accepted, whereby we will use a majority of betting industry operators, to determine whether odds offered were “materially different”.
At odds which reflect an incorrect score, standing or ranking situation, including where incorrect odds are offered, as a result of any errors or omissions made in respect of the announcing, publishing, or reporting of a score, standing or ranking situation.
At incorrect odds where it is clear that the actual chances of the event occurring at the time the bet was accepted were materially different, or
That the bet has been placed by someone other than the Member (including where someone has gained access to the Members’ account) or where the Member is victim of fraudulent activity.
"Influence Betting" is an act, prohibited by us, where a Member, or parties acting in association with a Member, can influence, or have influenced, the outcome of a match or an event - directly or indirectly.
"Syndicate Betting" is an act, prohibited by us, where Members act together to place a bet or series of bets on the same event or competition, or when a Member places a bet on behalf, or for the intended benefit, of another individual or other individuals. Where there is evidence of Members acting together in this manner, we reserve the right to make the relevant bets void and/or withhold payment of returns pending the outcome of subsequent investigations to determine whether (in our sole opinion), Syndicate Betting has taken place.
Bet Acceptance
Each bet constitutes a legally binding betting contract between the Member and us. The formation of such betting contract requires the following phases:
The advertisement of a betting market.
The request to place a bet or wager on the betting market by the Member.
The acceptance and confirmation of the bet or wager by us.
A bet is not accepted and confirmed until it shows in the Member’s bet history. Once it does, the contract will be considered duly formed. In cases of uncertainty about whether a bet has been accepted, the Member is requested to check the open (pending) bets or contact Customer Service for confirmation. No bet or wager will be considered as completed unless confirmed via the Member’s bet history or Customer services. Unless accepted in Error, once accepted, a bet cannot be withdrawn by the Member. It is the responsibility of the Member to ensure details of the bets placed are correct.
Should a dispute arise about the acceptance (or lack thereof) of any bet, or the time at which any bet was placed, our transaction log database will be the ultimate authority in determining such matters.
We may refuse to accept any bets or wagers at any time and for any reason including in order to:
Preserve the viability of the offered market (for example, without limitation, in relation to events where there is an extraordinary or unbalanced number of bets on the same market).
Protect the Member (e.g., without limitation, in relation to the event in which the Member displays pathological behaviour and refuses to self-exclude).
Protect other users (e.g., without limitation, in connection with the event in which the Member has a betting pattern that could adversely affect the regular betting activity of other users).
To protect our position (for example, without limitation, in the event that the Member exhibits money laundering, collusive or fraudulent behaviour, we suspect that Member is using a third party's account, is allowing a third party to use the account, or is using automated means, bots, software or similar means, or engaging in arbitrage).
We, depending on the level of risk, instead of refusing a bet or a wager, may accept the bet request placed by the Member up to a certain amount thereof.
Betting and Payout Limitations
In order to guarantee the viability of each market, to avoid potential cases of fraud and match-fixing, and to be able to make a correct estimate of the risk involved in each product offered, we will limit the net payout (the payout after the stake has been deducted) on any bet or combination of bets by one Member to £250,000 for any bets placed or settled within a 24-hour timeframe.
We determine that the minimum bet stake accepted will be £0.10 and the maximum stake accepted will be limited to a max betslip win of £50,000, notwithstanding potential exceptions, dependent on the markets and bets proposed.
We reserve the right to decline, all, or part of, any bet requested. This includes the possibility that a "System bet" as defined in Section B, Para 4 is not accepted in full, either in terms of stakes or combinations included in said "System bet". All bets placed through our platform, also including bets requesting manual approval, may be subject to a time delay prior to acceptance, the length of which may vary.
All odds offered are subject to variation. Such fluctuation is determined by us. Bets are accepted only at the odds available in the betting grid, at the time the bet was accepted by us, irrespective of any other claim or previous publication present on the website or any other media detailing otherwise.
All payout calculations when settling bets will be done based on Decimal odds, irrespective of any other format displayed/chosen at time of bet placement.
Cancellation (Voiding) of Bets
A bet can be declared void, under the circumstances described in clause 3 below. If a bet is voided, it will be settled with odds of 1.00.
A bet made as an accumulative bet shall remain valid, notwithstanding a match or an event which is part of the accumulative bet being void.
We reserve the right, to declare a bet void, totally or partially, if any of the following, or similar, circumstances have occurred:
Bets have been offered, placed and/or accepted due to an Error and/or at odds which significantly differ from those currently present elsewhere in the betting industry market (see Section A, Para 2, clause 1)
Bets placed while the website was encountering technical problems, that would otherwise not have been accepted;
Influence Betting;
Syndicate Betting;
A result has been affected by criminal actions - directly or indirectly;
A public announcement has occurred in relation to the bet which significantly alters the odds.
A bet has been offered on the relevant market in breach of the gambling regulation in the specific jurisdiction
Past-posting and other cancellations: While we employ our most reasonable endeavours to ensure the best user experience, should a market be available for betting when it should have been removed or else with incorrect odds, we reserve the right to void all bets accepted within said circumstances in accordance with Section A, Para 5.3. Similar situations include, but are not limited to:
Pre-match' bets placed/accepted after the event has started;
'Live' bets placed/accepted at incorrect odds due to delayed or failing ‘Live’ coverage, or on odds which represented a different score than the actual;
Bets placed following the last instance that a participant/outcome had any chance to influence the match/event scoring applicable to the relevant market and an eventual withdrawal/disqualification/cancellation/format change or anything which precludes the ability of the applicable participant/outcome to influence said scoring will be declared void;
Bets placed with odds which do not reflect that a related event was underway and where conditions could have been altered in a direct and indisputable way, or else after an event which could normally be deemed as leading to the outcome is happening or has happened already.
Related contingencies: Unless placed via our in-event combination functionality, or offered explicitly as a specific offering, we prohibit accumulator bets that include two or more outcomes which might turn out to be related (e.g. Team X to become champions and Player Y to be Top Goal Scorer in the same league). Although we take all necessary steps to prevent such possibilities, in the eventuality that this would happen, we reserve the right, to declare void all parts of the accumulative bet which include the correlated outcomes whose odds are not indicative of the related contingency.
Bets can be voided regardless of whether the event has been settled or not.
Disclaimer and Priority
We reserve the right to adjust a Payout credited to a Member’s balance if the Payout has been credited to the Account due to an Error.
In order to adjust any inaccuracy in the Member's balance following amounts credited due to Error, we reserve the right to take any necessary action, without prior notice and within reasonable limits, to adjust the Member's balance through the reversal, amendment or cancellation, of any subsequent transaction on the Member's account.
These rules are applicable to all transactions with our Sportsbook and may be supplemented with other Rules. In the event of ambiguity, priority should be considered in the following order:
Rules and conditions published in conjunction with an offer and/or campaign.
Sport-Specific Rules.
General Sportsbook rules.
Should unforeseen circumstances occur for which settlement is not covered explicitly by these rules, we reserve the right to settle affected bets on an individual basis on the basis of equity, attaining itself to generally accepted betting norms, customs and definitions.
Any data provided or accessible in, from, or related to the Sportsbook, may be used by the Member for private, non-commercial use only and any use or attempted use of such data for commercial purposes is strictly prohibited.
We have the right to enforce a term of the contract relating to the Sportsbook against any Member.
B. General Betting Rules
Common Terms of Reference
Unless listed either in conjunction with the bet offer, or else in the Sport Specific rules, all bets should be considered valid for the result at the end of the "Regular Time" or "Full Time" only. "Regular Time" or "Full time" is defined as interpreted by the official rules published by the respective governing body. For example, in Football, full time is stipulated to be 90 minutes including injury time, and in Ice Hockey it is stipulated as the 3 x 20-minute periods. Should the governing body decide to stipulate, before the start of the event, that the said event is to be played over a different duration, this will be treated as being the official rules for the event (for example, football matches played with 3 x 30 minutes or 2 x 40 minutes formats). Nonetheless, such occurrence is limited to the "regular" playing time and does not include any prolongation such as extra time or overtime, unless explicitly stated.
"Livebetting" is where it is possible to bet during an ongoing match or event. We do not acknowledge or accept any liability whatsoever if it not possible to place a bet or the live score update is not correct. At all times it is the Member's responsibility to be aware of the match and the events surrounding it such as the current score, its progression and how much time remains before the match is completed. We do not accept any liability for changes to the Livebetting schedule or interruption of the Livebetting service.
The Cash Out function allows the Member the possibility to redeem a bet, which status has not been settled yet, at its current value. It is available on selected events both in pre-match and live, as well as on both single and multiple bets. Cash Out functionality cannot be used on free bets. Cash Out requests might be subject to the same delay procedure as listed in Section A, Para 4.2. Should it happen that during this delay, for whatever reason, either the offer is removed, or odds fluctuate, the Cash Out request will not be accepted, and the Member will be notified with an on-screen message. We reserve the right to offer such functionality at our own discretion and does not acknowledge or accept any liability whatsoever should the functionality not be available. Should a Cash Out request be successful, the bet will be settled immediately and any subsequent events which occur in relation with the bet will not be considered. In the instance of a Cash Out bet having suffered from a technical, pricing or settlement error at any time between the time of original offering and the final settlement, we reserve the right to rectify such inaccuracy in accordance with Section A, Para 6.2.
The "Participant" is an object constituting part of an event. In "Head-to-Head" and "Triple-Head" the Participant only refers to objects that are subject to the "Head-to-Head" or "Triple-Head" event in question. For sake of clarity a “participant” is to be intended as a single player, a team or any group of individuals grouped/listed together. Any reference to participants within these rules is to be intended accordingly regardless of whether its definition is in singular or plural.
The deadline (cut-off time) shown on the website is to be treated for information purposes only. We reserve the right to suspend, partially or completely, the betting activity at any time we deem necessary.
Statistics or editorial text published on the Website are to be considered as added information. We do not acknowledge or accept any liability if the information is not correct. At all times it is the Member’s responsibility to be aware about circumstances relating to an event.
Theoretical return in fixed odds betting to the player is given by the odds from all possible outcomes in the offer. The theoretical payback to a player on a bet offer with 3 outcomes a, b and c can be calculated as follows.
Theoretical % = 1 / (1 /” odds outcome a” + 1 / “odds outcome b” + 1 / “odds outcome c”) x 100
Bet Types
"Match" (aka 1X2) is where it is possible to bet on the (partial or definite) outcome of a match or event. The options are: "1" = Home team/Player 1, or the participant listed to the left side of the offer; "X" = Draw/Tie, or the selection in the middle; "2" = Away team/Player 2, or the participant listed to the right side of the offer. In particular instances or specific competitions, we might display an offer in the so-called “American” format (ie: Away Team @ Home Team), where the host team is listed following the visiting team. Irrespective of the positioning of the teams on the board/betslip, the references to “Home” and “Away” teams will always refer to the actual teams playing at home (host) and away (visitor) respectively, as determined by the official organization bar the exceptions as detailed in Section B, Para 5.32
"Correct Score" (aka Result Betting) is where it is possible to bet on the (partial or definite) exact score of a match/event, or part of it.
"Over/Under" (aka Totals) is where it is possible to bet on the (partial or definite) amount of a predefined occurrence (e.g. goals, points, corners, rebounds, penalty minutes, etc.). Should the total amount of the listed occurrences be exactly equal to the betting line, then all bets on this offer will be declared void. Example: an offer where the betting line is 128.0 points and the match ends with the result 64-64 will be declared void.
"Odd/Even" is where it is possible to bet on the (partial or definite) amount of a predefined occurrence (e.g. goals, points, corners, rebounds, penalty minutes, etc.)."Odd" is 1, 3, 5 etc.; "Even" is 0, 2, 4 etc.
A "Head-to-Head" and/or "Triple-Head" is a competition between two or three participants/outcomes, originating from either an officially organised event, or else, as virtually defined by us.
"Half time/Full time" is where it is possible to bet on the result in Half time and the outcome at the end of the listed timeframe. E.g. if at Half time the home team is leading 1-0 and the match ends 1-1, the winning outcome is 1/X. Bets on this market will be declared void should the match be played in a format where it is impossible to determine an outcome based on the timeframes listed within the offer.
"Period betting" is where it is possible to bet on the outcome of each separate period within a match/event. E.g. If the period scores in an ice hockey match are 2-0 / 0-1 / 1-1, the winning outcome is 1/2/X. Bets on this market will be declared void should the match be played in a format where it is impossible to determine an outcome based on the timeframes listed within the offer.
"Draw No Bet" (aka Moneyline) is where it is possible to bet on either "1" or "2" as defined in Section B, Para 2.1. It is also common practice to refer to "Draw No Bet" in cases where no draw odds are offered. Bets will be voided should the specific match/event not produce any winning outcome (E.g. match ends as a draw), or the occurrence not happen (E.g. First Goal, Draw No Bet and match ends 0-0).
"Handicap" (aka Spread) is where it is possible to bet on whether the chosen outcome will be victorious once the listed handicap is added/subtracted (as applicable) to the match/period/total score to which the bet refers to. In those circumstances where the result after the adjustment of the handicap line is exactly equal to the betting line, then all bets on this offer will be declared void. Example: a bet on -3.0 goals will be declared void if the chosen team wins the match by exactly 3 goals difference (3-0,4-1, 5-2, etc). Any reference in this section to the term “margin” is intended to be understood as the outcome emerging from the subtraction of the goals/points scored by the 2 teams/participants.
Unless otherwise stated, all handicaps listed on the Website are to be calculated based on the result from the start of the listed match/period to the end of the specified match/period. It is however customary that for certain handicap bet offers in specific sports (Asian Handicap in Football), only the outcomes obtained from the time of bet placement until the end of the listed timeframe will be taken into consideration, thus disregarding any goals/points scored before the time the bet was placed and accepted. Any bet offer with these characteristics will be clearly displayed on site and highlighted in the bettors’ Bet History with the score at the time of bet placement.
There are 3 different “handicap betting” formats:
2-way Handicap: Team A (-1.5) vs Team B (+1.5)
Example:
Team A is given a -1.5 goal handicap in the match. For the bet to be won, Team A must win the match with a margin equal or bigger than the listed handicap (ie. 2 goals or more).
Team B is given a +1.5 goal advantage in the match. For the bet to be won, Team B must either win the match, match finish in a draw or not lose with a margin equal or bigger than their listed advantage (ie. lose with a 1 goal margin).
3-way Handicap: Team A (-2) Draw (Exactly 2) Team B (+2)
Example:
Team A is given a 2 goal handicap in the match. For the bet to be won, Team A must win the match with a bigger margin than the listed handicap (ie. 3 goals or more).
Draw would be the victorious outcome should the match end up with exactly the listed margin (ie. match ends with results such as 2-0, 3-1 and 4-2).
Team B is given a 2 goal advantage in the match. For the bet to be won, Team B must either win the match, match finish in a draw or not lose with a margin equal or bigger than their listed advantage (ie. lose with only a 1 goal margin).
Asian Handicap: Team A (-1.75) vs Team B (+1.75)
Example:
Team A is given a -1.75 goal handicap in the match. This means that the stake is divided into 2 equal bets and placed on the outcomes -1.5 and -2.0. For the bet to be fully paid out at the listed odds, Team A must win the match with a bigger margin than both of their listed handicaps (ie. 3 goals or more margin). In the eventuality that Team A wins with only a 2 goal margin, the bet will be considered as partially won with a full payout on the -1.5 part of the bet and a refund on the -2.0 side since the outcome on that part of the bet would be considered a “tie”. Should the match produce any other outcome, including a Team A victory with only 1 goal of margin, the whole stake would be lost.
Team B is given a +1.75 goal advantage in the match. This means that the stake is divided into 2 equal bets and placed on the outcomes +1.5 and +2.0. For the bet to be fully paid out at the listed odds, Team B must either win the match, match finish in a draw or not lose with a margin equal or bigger than any of their listed advantages (ie. lose with only a 1 goal margin). In the eventuality that Team B loses with exactly a 2 goal margin, the bet will be considered as partially lost with a refund on the -2.0 part of the bet and a loss on the -1.5 part of the bet. Should the match produce any other outcome which results in a defeat of Team B with a margin of 3 or more goals, the whole stake would be lost.
"Double Chance" is where it is possible to bet simultaneously on two (partial or definite) outcomes of a match or event. The options are: 1X, 12 and X2 with "1", "X" and "2" as defined in Section B, Para 2.1.
"Outright" or "Place" betting is where it is possible to choose from a list of alternatives and bet on the eventuality that a participant wins or places within a specified position in the classification of the listed event/competition. Should two or more participants share finishing positions, the settlement will be based as per the definition in Section B, Para 5.14.
An “Each Way” bet (aka EW) refers to a bet where the chosen selection must either Win or else Place within the payout terms. The bet is divided in two parts (the “Win” part and the “Place” part) of an equal stake. Settlement of such bets will take into account the applicable rules governing the "Win" and "Place" bets, namely the Sport-specific rules as well as Section B, Para 5, Clause 11.
"Goal minutes" is where it is possible to bet on the sum of the minutes when the goals have been scored. When settling such bets, goals scored in injury time of both halves are to be considered as having been scored in the 45th minute in case the goal was scored in the first half injury time and the 90th minute in case the goal was scored in the second half injury time. Own goals will not count towards the settlement of individual player’s ‘goal minutes'.
Betting Props
Fantasy/Virtual "Matches" or "Head to Heads" are implicit match-ups where the performances of two or more participants/teams which are not directly confronting each other in the same match/event/round are compared. Settlement will be based on the number of times each participant records a predefined occurrence (e.g. goals) in the respective match. The following criteria will be used to determine the settlement of these type of offerings:
Unless specifically stated the bets refer to the next official match/event/round (as applicable) that the listed participants/teams are scheduled to take part in.
All relative matches/events must be completed on the same day/session which the match/event/round is scheduled to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcomes of which has been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Results for these offers will only take into account occurrences deriving from the actual play. Results attributable to walk-overs as well as other decisions as specified in clauses 2, 3 and 4 of Section B, Para 5 will not be taken into consideration.
Should the aforementioned criteria be inconclusive in determining the outcome for these offers, the following criteria will be progressively referenced to in order to settle the offering:
the applicable Sport-specific rules as listed in Section C,
Result Settlement rules as listed in Section B, Para 5.
Bets will be settled as void should it still be impossible to determine a winning outcome.
"Grand Salami" is where it is possible to bet on the total number of listed occurrences (Example: Total Goals, Total Runs) happening in a collection of matches/events on a specified round/day/match day. All relative matches/events must be completed for bets to stand except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Over/Under bets on classification of participants in performances/events must be interpreted as follows: "Over" means a worse or lower position while "Under" means a better or higher position. Example: A bet on a player's classification in a tournament with an Over/Under line 2.5 will be settled as Under if the player classifies first or second. All other placements will be settled as Over.
Bets on "Quarter / Half / Period X" refer to the result/score achieved in the relevant timeframe and does not include any other points/goals/events tallied from other parts of the event/match. Bets on this market will be declared void should the match be played in a format where it is impossible to determine an outcome for the timeframes specified in the offer.
Bets on "Result at end of Quarter / Half / Period X" refer to the result of the match/event after termination of the stipulated timeframe and will take into account all other points/goals/events tallied from previous parts of the event/match. Bets on this market will be declared void should the match be played in a format where it is impossible to determine an outcome for the timeframes specified in the offer.
Bets on "Race to X Points / Race to X Goals…" and similar offers refer to the team/participant that is the first to reach the specified tally of points/goals/events. If the offer lists a timeframe (or any other period restriction), it will not include any other points/goals/events tallied from other parts of the event/match which are not related to the mentioned timeframe. Should the listed score not be reached within the stipulated timeframe (if any), all bets will be declared void, unless odds for such eventuality have been published within the market.
Bets on "Winner of Point X / Next to Score " and similar offers refer to the team/participant scoring/winning the listed occurrence. For the settlement of these offers, no reference to events happening prior to the listed occurrence will be taken into consideration. Should the listed occurrence not be scored/won within the stipulated timeframe (if any), all bets will be declared void, unless odds for such eventuality have been published within the market.
Bets referring to the happening of a particular occurrence in a pre-defined time order, such as “First Card”, or “Next Team to receive penalty minutes” will be settled as void should it not be possible, without any reasonable doubt, to decide the winning outcome, for example in case of players from different teams which are shown a card in the same interruption of play.
"To score first and win" refer to the listed team/participant being the first to register any scoring in the match and going on to win the match. Should there be no scoring in the match all bets will be settled as void.
Any reference to "Clean sheet"/”Shutout” indicates that the listed team/participant must not concede any goal/points during the match/relevant timeframe.
"To win from behind" refers to the listed team/participant winning the match after having been at least 1 goal/point behind their opponents at any point in the match/relevant timeframe.
Any reference for a team/participant to win all halves/periods (e.g. Team to win both halves) means that the listed team must score more goals/points than its opponent during all the stipulated halves/periods of the match.
Any reference to "Injury Time" refers to the amount displayed by the designated official and not to the actual amount played.
Settlement of bets on offers such as "Man of the Match", "Most Valuable Player" etc. will be based on the competition's organisers’ decision, unless otherwise stated.
Settlement of bets which make reference to terms such as "decisive goal" will be settled based on the scorer of the goal that at the end of the match/tie (as applicable) proves to be the one that has produced an unassailable lead, following which any further goals would prove to be irrelevant towards the final outcome. For a bet to be settled as "YES" the listed player's team must be declared winner of that particular match (in case of one match) or progressing to the next round/winning the competition. Goals scored in Regular Time and Extra Time count but not Penalty Shoot outs.
Bets on events which feature a selection of episodes that could happen in a match (E.g. "What will happen first to the player? with options "Score a goal, Get a Yellow/Red Card, Be Substituted) will be settled as void should none of the listed events/outcomes occur, unless odds for such eventuality have been published within the market.
Settlement of Transfer bets will also take into account players signed by the club on loan deals.
Bets referring to Managerial changes refer to the individual in the Head Coach/Manager role (as applicable) who steps down/is removed from the position for any reason. Bets are valid even in cases where a joint responsible (if any) leaves their position and will be settled accordingly. In case that no more changes are happening between the time the bet is placed and the last league fixture (excluding play-offs, play-outs, post season, etc.) the bets placed after the last Managerial change (if any) will be void, unless a suitable option has been offered for betting. American football markets will consider and settle accordingly, any interim/caretaker Head Coach/Manager who since the last Managerial change has led the team for 10 consecutive matches.
Offers referring to which team/participant will achieve a particular accomplishment against another team/participant (E.g. Next team to beat Team X) as well as offers which refer to the classification on a certain date, will stand and be settled regardless of any eventual fixture changes and number of games/rounds played.
Settlement of offers referring to which team/participant will be the first to achieve a particular accomplishment against other team(s)/participant(s) (E.g. Team to score first in Matchday X) will be based upon the timeframe in the respective match in which the feat has been accomplished. Example: Team A plays on Saturday and score their first goal in the 43rd minute while Team B plays on Sunday and score their first goal after 5 minutes, then Team B will be settled as winner.
From time to time we may at our sole discretion and without prejudice to related contingencies as described in Section A, Para 5, Clause 4, decide to publish offerings referring either to the single performance of a participant/team or offerings which combine the potential outcomes of two or more teams/participants (example: Enhanced Multiples, Boosted Odds, etc), at higher odds than those normally available. We reserve the right to withdraw such offers, edit the respective odds and effect any further changes we might deem necessary at its sole discretion. Settlement of these offers will be based on the following criteria in the listed order:
Unless specifically stated the offer refers only to the listed day(s) and/or next official match/event/round (as applicable) that the listed participants/teams are scheduled to take part in at the time the offer is published.
Results settled as per respective Sport-specific rules. All related events must be completed as scheduled within the applicable timeframes for bets to stand unless any other outcome in the offer would incontrovertibly determine the outcome of the offer in a way that completion (or lack of thereof) of the other events listed in the offer would not influence the outcome of the offer. Such markets will be settled according to the already determined outcomes.
Unless explicitly stated within the offer, result settlement will only take into account occurrences deriving from the actual play. Results attributable to walk-overs, protests, changes to the first official result, etc will not be taken into consideration. Bets will be voided should it be impossible to determine a winning outcome in accordance with the respective Sport-specific rules.
All connotations related to the offer must be fully and unquestionably complied with, for the bet to be deemed as winning, regardless of any possible conflict with the Sport-Specific rules, or with any potential interpretation based on previous or current presentation of offers related to events in that particular sport and the way these are normally presented in our Sportsbook. Where applicable, should the offer include any outcome the result of which ties exactly the chosen Over/Under or Spread line (aka PUSH) this will not be considered as having accomplished the listed occurrence and will result in the bet being settled as LOST.
While all necessary precautions have been taken by us to ensure a superior user experience, it is to be understood that markets might fluctuate in such a way that, at any given point in time, these markets do not represent an enhanced value comparable to related bet offers currently present on our Sportsbook. All bets remain valid regardless of these eventual fluctuations.
During selected events, we may provide users with functionality to place bets combining outcomes and occurrences from the same event (aka Intra-Event Combinations), either through pre-established combinations present in its Sportsbook (excluding Enhanced Multiples, Boosted Odds, etc for which Section B, Para 3, Clause 21 applies), or through the BetBuilder functionality. Such functionality is only present at our sole discretion and without prejudice to related contingencies as described in Section A, Para 5, Clause 5. Settlement will be based on the respective Sport-specific rules. All related occurrences must be fully accomplished for a bet to be considered as having happened and eventually paid out at the odds struck. Stakes refunded should any part of the combination be settled as VOID. Where applicable, should the combination feature any outcome the result of which ties exactly the chosen Over/Under or Spread line (aka PUSH), such part of the combination will be removed from settlement calculation and bets will be paid out taking into consideration only the other parts of the combination.
“Teaser+” allows the user the possibility to allocate the same pre-set amount of points to all outcomes present in a parlay (combination) containing Spreads (Handicaps), Totals (Over/Unders) or a combination of both. Example: User combines NFL Team X +6.5 points in a parlay with Over 41 points in the NFL match between Team Y and Team Z. By choosing the “Teaser+ American Football 6 points” option, the lines and odds get recalculated into a parlay featuring Team X +12.5 points (previously +6.5), combined with Over 35 points (previously Over 41). Should any part of a “Teaser+” bet be settled as void (push), that particular selection will be excluded from the parlay and the computation of odds/payout will be re-adjusted accordingly.
Bets referring to “Rest of the match” or similar will consider only outcomes and occurrences obtained from the time of bet placement until the end of the listed timeframe, thus disregarding any occurrences registered before the time the bet was placed and accepted.
Bets on specific timeframes/intervals (example: Match result between 60:00-89:59), will consider only outcomes and occurrences accumulated during the specified timeframe/interval. Settlement will not take into account any other points/goals/events tallied from other parts of the event/match outside the specified timeframe/interval, including stoppage/injury time, unless specified.
System Bets
In Pre-match and Live betting, it is possible to combine up to twelve (12) different offers on a single coupon. Based on these twelve offers, Members can choose their own number of singles, doubles, trebles etc.
We reserve the right to limit the amount of combinations due to what is known as outcome dependency/related contingencies, as defined in Section A, Para 5 Clause 5.
It is possible to include one or several matches as ‘bankers’ which means that the selected matches/events will be included in all coupons.
A ‘Trixie’ is a combination, which includes one treble and three doubles from a selection of three matches.
A ‘Patent’ is a combination, which includes one treble, three doubles and three singles from a selection of three matches.
A ‘Yankee’ is a combination, which includes one fourfold, four trebles and six doubles from a selection of four matches.
A ‘Canadian’ (also known as ‘Super Yankee’) is a combination, which includes one fivefold, five fourfolds, ten trebles and ten doubles from a selection of five matches.
A ‘Heinz’ is a combination, which includes one sixfold, six fivefolds, fifteen fourfolds, twenty trebles and fifteen doubles from a selection of six matches.
A ‘Super Heinz’ is a combination, which includes one sevenfold, seven sixfolds, twenty-one fivefolds, thirty-five fourfolds, thirty-five trebles and twenty-one doubles from a selection of seven matches.
A ‘Goliath’ is a combination, which includes one eightfold, eight sevenfolds, twenty-eight sixfolds, fifty-six fivefolds, seventy fourfolds, fifty-six trebles and twenty-eight doubles from a selection of eight matches.
For display purposes, when necessary, the second digit after the decimal point of the odds is shown as rounded up in the Member’s bet history to the nearest decimal number. The payout will however be made based on the actual odds multiplied by the stake, disregarding the aforementioned rounding.
Result Settlement
When settling results, we will do our utmost to attain information obtained first-hand (during or exactly after the event has been concluded), through TV transmissions, streaming (web-based and through other sources) as well as official sites. Should this information be omitted from first-hand viewing and/or official sources and/or there is an obvious mistake in the information included in the sources above, the settlement of the bet offer will be based on other public sources. Nevertheless, unless a clear and verifiable Error is noted in the first official result, settlement of bets will not include any changes deriving from and/or attributable to, but not limited to: disqualifications, penalisations, protests, sub-judice results and/or successive changes to the official result after the event has been completed and a result has been announced, even preliminarily.
a. Settlement of markets held over for more than 1 round/stage (E.g:.Season Bets), will only consider amendments affecting bets for which settlement has not yet been decided. Such measures must be announced by the governing body before the last scheduled round/stage will be considered. Any changes effected after this date, or else referring to bets which have already been settled based on events happening during the event/competition will not be considered.
b. Unless otherwise specified within the offer, implied by the official competition rules or announced beforehand as being the official format for that particular event, any changes from the default sport/event/competition format that result in us offering odds/lines/totals which are incongruent with the revised playing format, will result in the voiding of the bets affected by the format change.
c. Offers where the format change does not preclude the governing body from declaring a winner (ex.Season winner), irrespective whether there will be a continuation of play or not, revised length of season/competition etc, will be settled according to the result issued by the governing body granted that said result is issued as per the timeframes listed below and is congruent to the odds/lines/totals available at time of offer publishing.
d. The following settlement provisions apply in such cases:
Should the governing body declare a relevant outcome within 3 months from the last match played before the interruption (be it final classification, cancellation or intentions to resume play), markets will be determined accordingly.
In case no applicable official communication/result is issued within 3 months from the last match played before the interruption, markets will be settled in accordance with the last classification/rankings available, regardless of number of matches played/current stage/phase of the competition.
Markets which refer to whether a team/participant will reach a subsequent phase of the competition (example: Play-Offs) will be settled as void should there be any changes to the format/number of participants scheduled to contest that particular phase or that particular phase is not played at all, unless an outcome based on the market connotations at time of bet publishing has already been determined and the change in number of applicable matches bears no influence the outcome of the offer.
Markets which odds are dependent/based on a full schedule of matches being played (example: Over/Under Wins in the Regular Season/Points in the League), will be declared void should the number of matches played end up being different than originally scheduled at the time of bet publishing, unless an outcome has already been determined and the change in number of applicable matches bears no influence the outcome of the offer.
Occurrences which have not been sanctioned and/or acknowledged by the match/event officials (e.g. disallowed goals) will not be taken into account towards the settlement of the bet. As a general rule, and unless the offer specifies otherwise, we will settle offers based on the exact time that the flow of play was interrupted/resumed (as applicable) by the occurrence in question (e.g. ball went out of play for a throw-in/goal kick or crosses the line for a goal), or play is interrupted by the referee, whichever is earliest. Occurrences are only considered awarded, if the subsequent related action is performed i.e. (Offside must result in a free kick, corners must be taken, and Goal kicks must be taken). Should the occurrence be only awarded and not taken, it will not be considered for settlement purposes.
All bet offers related to matches/events which do not take place at all or are awarded a result through a walk-over decision, will be declared void.
In case of an abandoned event, all bet offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, will be settled according to the decided outcome. Should the abandoned event not resume within 12 hours of its start time, all pending offers related to the event will be settled as void.
In case an event is abandoned and is scheduled to restart from the beginning, all bets placed before the initial match which could not be settled through the outcomes deriving from the play prior to abandonment, will be declared void regardless of whether or when the match is continued.
Unless otherwise stated either in the Sport-Specific rules or in conjunction with the bet offer, specific events forming part of tournaments/competitions which are not held, get postponed and/or rescheduled for a time/date longer than 12 hours from the last scheduled time issued by the governing body due to bad weather, crowd trouble or similar scenarios will be declared void with the following exceptions where bets will remain valid:
Events which starting times have not been officially confirmed yet by the governing body at time of bet placement.
Events which are moved due to scheduling conflicts/tv broadcasts but remain scheduled to be played within the same matchday/game week/round (as applicable) and the change does not change the order of official fixtures for any of the participants in the offer.
Events which start times are anticipated (brought forward) but remain scheduled to be played within the same matchday/game week/round (as applicable) and, without prejudice to past-posting and similar occurrences as defined in Section A, Para 5.4, the change does not modify the order of official fixtures for any of the participants in the offer.
For the avoidance of doubt the definition of same matchday/game week/round is to be interpreted as the order of fixtures as dictated by the governing body with each specific match representing a matchday/game week/round. Should this order not be upheld and the sequence of fixtures changes in a way that matches against other teams get scheduled in between so much that the listed fixture ceases to be the next official commitment from that particular tournament/league/competition for all teams involved, that will be considered as not part of the same matchday/game week/round and offers will be declared void. The above does not apply to Season bets which will remain valid granted that the tournament/league/competition is held and decided during the season/year it refers to, regardless of any eventual date changes. In cases of Play-offs series or other series of matches which are scheduled to confront 2 teams over 2 or more matches, any re-scheduling of a single match will be considered as being part of the same matchday regardless of the length of the re-scheduling, granted that the order of home and away fixtures in the series is not modified and the listed fixture takes place within the series. Bets will be declared void otherwise.
In cases of events which have not been completed before their natural conclusion, and a result is issued through a decision by the association not more than 12 hours from the event’s start, we will use the issued decision as the official result for offers related to the event's outcome, such as Match, Draw No Bet and Double Chance granted that the issued decision does not change the outcome of the said bet offers at the time of the abandonment. In that case the stakes will be refunded. All offers referring to the tallying of particular occurrences (example: Total Goals, Handicaps, etc) will be declared void except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
All bet offers related to uncompleted matches/events where the official governing body is not previously acknowledged (e.g. Club Friendlies) will be declared as void unless at least 90% of the stipulated Regular/Full time is played, see in Section B, Para 1.1. Should the match/event be abandoned after 90% has been completed, the settlement will be based on the current score at the time when the match/event was stopped.
Unless stated alongside the wagering market, settlement of bet offers, such as, but not limited to, shots, shots on target, ball possession, assists, rebounds, etc. will be based according to the definition with which the official governing body issues said statistics. Unless backed by un-contradictory evidence, we will not acknowledge any complaints which derive from a personal interpretation of such terms.
With the exception of Trotting and Horse Racing, wagers placed on participants/teams who take no part in an event, will be declared void.
However, applicable qualifying stages or similar are to be considered part of the main event and any participation within is considered as validating the wager and will not be voided.
We reserve the right to apply Tattersalls Rule 4, as explained in Section B, Para 6, on any competition and this will be stated in correlation to the bet offer and/or the relevant Sport-specific rule.
No refunds of bets will apply, even if the winning outcome of a match/event is a participant/outcome that has not been listed for betting purposes. On all bet offers the Member has the possibility to ask for a price on a non-listed participant/outcome. We reserve the right to accept or decline such requests.
In case a participant is disqualified/withheld/banned from taking part in a subsequent part/phase of an event/competition, the disqualification will be considered to have taken place at the time of the participant’s removal from the event. No alterations will be made to previous results, regardless of any modifications due to said actions. Bets placed after the disqualified participant last took part in the event will be declared void.
If two or more Participants share the applicable finishing positions and no odds have been offered for a drawn outcome, the payout will be calculated by dividing the odds by the number of participants sharing those certain positions and are settled accordingly. The payout will always be at least equal to the stake, except in cases of “Head to Heads”, see Section B, Para 2.5 and Section B, Para 5.19.
In “Group Betting” (aka “Best of X”), all listed participants must start the event for bets to stand.
In “Group Betting” (aka “Best of X”), at least one participant from the selection list must successfully complete the event for bets to stand. Should that not be the case, and the governing body does not follow specific tie-breaking criteria, the bets will be declared void.
In a "Head to Head" between two or three participants, all listed participants must start the particular round/event which the bet refers to, for bets to be considered valid.
In a "Head to Head" between two participants, all bets will be refunded if both participants share the same position/score or are eliminated at the same stage of the competition, unless the governing body follows specific tie-breaking procedures, in which case, these will be deemed valid.
In a "Head to Head" between three participants and more than one winning outcome, the odds will be divided by the outcomes sharing the winning position, irrespective whether the net outcome is lower than the Member's stake.
If a "Head to Head" is offered between different rounds/stages, all participants must take part in the upcoming round/stage for bets to be valid. Should any participant listed in the offer not take any subsequent part, bets placed from after the last time the participant was active in the event will be declared void.
Unless specifically stated, whenever the organising association deems it fit to include any necessary rounds, matches, or series of matches (e.g. Play-offs, Play-outs, Postseason) following the end of the so-called Regular Season in order to determine the classification, league winners, promotion/relegation, etc., we will take into account the results and outcomes deriving from these matches for settlement purposes of bets referring to the final league classification, promotion, relegation, etc. For example, seasonal bets on the team winning the NHL will refer to the Stanley Cup Winners.
Offers which confront against each other the performances of two or more individuals/teams over a stipulated timeframe/competition will only be settled based on the result of the listed participants, disregarding all other participants in the same competition/event.
Unless specifically stated, all offers referring to a single player’s performance in a specific domestic league (such as Total Goals Scored by Player X in League Y) or "Head to Head" bet offers involving two players’ performances in domestic leagues, will not take into account those events happening during eventual Play-offs/Play-outs/Post-season or any other matches, or series of, which would happen after the so-called Regular Season.
Offers related to a total amount of occurrences/events scored/tallied by a particular team, either in a single team performance in a specific domestic league (such as Total Goals Scored by Team X), or "Head to Head" bet offers involving two teams’ performances in domestic leagues (E.g. Most Penalty Minutes in League X - Team Y vs Team Z), or a cumulative league performance (E.g. Team to receive Most Yellow Cards in League X) will not take into account those events happening during eventual Play-offs/Play-outs/Post-season or any other matches, or series of, which would happen after the so-called Regular Season, unless otherwise specified.
In a single player performance bet offer in a specific domestic league (such as Total Goals Scored by Player X in League Y) or "Head to Head" bet offers involving two players’ performances in domestic leagues, unless an outcome has already been achieved, bets will be voided should any of the following occurrences happen to any relevant participant: (i) is not part of the matchday squad for the club/team they are eligible for at time of bet placement in 50% or more of the remaining applicable matches for any reason, (ii) does not take part in at least another match after the bet has been placed, (iii) totals the same amount as the other player, unless a draw/tie option has been offered. Other sports-specific conditions may apply, please refer to the Sport-specific section.
In a single player performance bet offer in a specific event (such as Total Goals Scored by Player X in International Tournament) or "Head to Head" bet offers involving two players’ performances in specific events, should any of the following occurrences happen to either of the participants in the selection list, the bets will be considered void: (i) does not take part at all in the event (ii) does not take part in at least another match after the bet has been placed, (iii) totals the same amount as the other participant, unless a draw/tie option has been offered.
During specific events we might decide to offer for betting a reduced selection of participants and might also include betting options such as "any other", "the field", or similar. This option includes all unlisted participants except for the ones mentioned specifically as available.
Offers that make specific reference to a participant’s/participants’ performance in a particular event (e.g. Player X vs The Field) are to be considered void if the mentioned participant(s) do(es) not take part in the competition.
Any form of a qualification ahead of the main event is considered to be a valid part of that competition. Thus any participant who is eliminated at qualification stage will be considered losing to anyone that is pre-qualified or is successful in the qualification part.
Bet offers which originally require participant(s) to compete in two or more stages/legs to advance into a subsequent phase/round of a competition, will remain valid regardless of any postponement/movement of the actual match dates, given that said match(es) actually takes place within the frame of the competition.
A bet on a “To Qualify” market originally requiring just one stage/leg to advance to a subsequent phase/round of a competition (including any eventual prolongations/additional matches, e.g. replays) will be declared void if said match is not decided within more than 12 hours of its supposed start time.
Should an event be moved from its originally announced venue and/or have its playing surface changed, this will not be treated as a cause for offers to be voided unless (i) the Sport-specific rules dictate such, and/or the new location in which the event takes place is the habitual "home" pitch of either participant involved in the match. As a general principle, we will refer to the Home team (host) and the Away team (visitor) in accordance with the definition issued by the governing body for that particular match/competition. Bets on matches played on so-called "Neutral pitches" will remain valid, regardless of whether such information has been detailed in the bet offer and/or the positioning of the teams on the betting board/display. In cases where there is a discrepancy between the positioning of the teams/participants on the official website and their placement on the betting board/display, and such discrepancy causes a significant effect on the odds of the match/competition we will void the affected bets. Such eventuality is contemplated only in cases where the discrepancy has a material and visible effect on the odds. For example, in cases of swapped Home and Away teams in an Ice Hockey match we will void the bets. Nevertheless we will consider valid bets placed on events where the so-called home-field advantage is not considered and in cases of neutral venues. Examples of such cases include but are not limited to tennis tournaments, MMA fights, singles competitions in general, or specific events such as the final/late stages of team competitions being held in pre-established venues, like the Superbowl, the NCAA Final 4 or the Italian Football Cup Final even if the location can be deemed as a potential customary "home" pitch for either of the teams involved. In such cases, said events will be considered as being played in neutral venues and all bets stand, regardless of the positioning of the teams/participants on the official website and their placement on the betting board/display.
Information referring to gender of the teams, age groups and youth teams, as well as various definitions of reserve teams (e.g. B and C teams), is to be treated as supplementary information. The inclusion (or lack of) and correctness of such information will not be treated as sufficient cause for the voiding of the offers related to the match/event, given that this does not cause an obvious inconsistency in odds offered.
While all necessary precautions are taken by us to assure the most faithful rendition of all components involved in a bet offer, it is to be assumed that certain denominations could be represented differently due to different interpretations deriving from adaptations into another language. Such linguistic incongruence will not be treated as sufficient cause for the voiding of the offers related to the match/event, given that it does not create uncertainty with other participants. The same applies for denominations referring to events, team names, sponsor names, etc.
In case of bets where there is reference to timeframes, they should be interpreted in the following way: “within the first 30 minutes” will include anything happening until 0 hours 29 minutes and 59 seconds; “between 10 to 20 minutes” will include anything happening from 10 minutes and 0 seconds until 19 minutes and 59 seconds.
Unless listed either in conjunction with the bet offer, or else in the Sport Specific rules, bets referring to event/match duration which include non-full integer digits (E.g. 88.5 minutes or X.5 rounds) require the full completion of the full integer of the listed duration for them to be considered won. For example: a bet on Over/Under 88.5 minutes in a Tennis match will be settled as Over only if at least 89 full minutes are completed.
We acknowledge that some bets might require the rounding-up of percentages, units or other criteria which are decisive for the settlement of the bet. Should that be the case, We reserve the right to adjust and settle accordingly.
Any reference to goals scored by specific players will not count if they are defined as ‘own goals’ (scored in their own goals) unless otherwise stated.
Any reference to confederation, nationality or similar will be subject to the definition by the governing body.
Any medals won by a team/nation per competition will count as one (1) single medal regardless of the number of team members.
Offers referring to individual player performances' over a particular period/tournament (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X during the World Cup) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of the season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most goals during the season), require all listed individuals to be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Offers on whether certain individuals will be occupying a specified position/title/job on a certain date (E.g. Minister X to still be Minister on date Y, Player/Coach to still be with Team Y on Date Z) refer to the individual in question to hold (or alternatively to be appointed in) the listed position uninterruptedly between the time the bet is placed and the specified deadline. Should the individual for any reason whatsoever leave the position before the specified deadline, the outcome of the bet will be considered as not having happened. This is valid even in cases where the individual is re-appointed/signed again in that same position/title/job and even if on the specified deadline the individual is occupying once more that same position/title/job to which the bet refers to. Settlements will also take into account players signed on loan deals.
Any bets referring to “breaking” of records require the listed occurrence to be fully accomplished. Equalling the record will not be considered as having fully accomplished the feat. Only the listed occurrence will count for settlement purposes.
Tattersalls Rule 4
In the event of one non-runner or one non-Participant, the odds on the remaining runners or remaining Participants are reduced in accordance with the so-called Tattersalls Rule 4.
Win Betting:
Current odds of the withdrawn runner/Deductions in percentage of net gain
Current odds of the withdrawn runner
Deductions in percentage of net gain
1.30 and lower
75%
1.31 to 1.40
70%
1.41 to 1.53
65%
1.54 to 1.62
60%
1.63 to 1.80
55%
1.81 to 1.95
50%
1.96 to 2.20
45%
2.21 to 2.50
40%
2.51 to 2.75
35%
2.76 to 3.25
30%
3.26 to 4.00
25%
4.01 to 5.00
20%
5.01 to 6.50
15%
6.51 to 10.00
10%
10.01 to 15.00
5%
15.01 and higher
No deductions made
Place Betting:
Current odds of the withdrawn runner/Deductions in percentage of net gain
Current odds of the withdrawn runner
Deductions in percentage of net gain
1.06 and lower
55%
1.07 to 1.14
45%
1.15 to 1.25
40%
1.26 to 1.52
30%
1.53 to 1.85
25%
1.86 to 2.40
20%
2.41 to 3.15
15%
3.16 to 4.00
10%
4.01 to 5.00
5%
5.01 and higher
No deductions made
In the event of two or more non-runners or non-Participants, the total reduction shall not exceed 75%. The deduction in this case will be based on the aggregate odds of the withdrawn runners
C. Sports Betting Rules & Limits
Olympic and Championship events
All conditions stated in this section have priority to any other rule or condition.
All bets are valid provided that the event is held and decided during the championship and the year it refers to, regardless of any venue changes.
The previous clause is applicable to offers which reasonably fulfil any of the following criteria:
the bet refers to events scheduled for the final phase of events forming part of Olympic, World and Continental competitions.
the final phase of the event is time restricted.
American Football
All ‘match’ bets on American Football are determined on the basis of the result after the so called extra (over) time.
All ‘match’ offers will only be considered valid should there be less than 5 minutes of scheduled play left in the 4th Quarter/2nd Half, as applicable. Exception will be done for those the outcome of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Offers referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Passing Yards Thrown by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will throw most Passing Yards), require all listed individuals to participate in at least one more play in the match, after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Unless specifically stated or implied in the offer characteristics, settlement of Season bets will be based as per the classifications, definitions and tie-breaking rules as per NFL.com, or the official website of the competition (as applicable).
Unless otherwise specified, a typical NFL week/round schedule is considered as running from Thursday to the following Wednesday, as per local stadium time. Any events/offers not completed within the aforementioned timeframe will be settled as void, except for those offers the outcomes of which has already been decided and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome. Bets referring to events which have been rescheduled within the same week/round will remain valid as much as said events are played within timeframe above.
Matchday/Weekly props is where it is possible to bet on the performances and outcomes of a pre-defined selection of teams and/or individual players’ occurrences happening in a collection of matches/events on a specified week/round/day/match day (example: Total Points Scored in matches from a specific Conference, Highest/Lowest Scoring team, Player Yardage markets etc). All applicable matches/events (including any rescheduling to be played within the aforementioned timeframe), must be completed and validated for the specified week/round/day/matchday for bets to stand except for those the outcomes of which has been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome. In addition, offers referring to the performance of specified players require that all the specified players participate in at least one more play in the match, after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Season bets, regardless whether these include outcomes obtained during Playoffs or otherwise, as well as offers referring to particular teams or player performances, will remain valid irrespective of eventual player trades, team movements, name changes, season length or playoff format changes during any point in the season.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Passing Yards by Player X during the Playoffs) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Touchdowns during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Bets on Double Result (ie. predicting the outcome at Half Time combined with the result at the end of the 4th Quarter) will not take into account any outcomes deriving from Overtime.
First/Next Offensive Play markets are settled based on the first/next offensive play from scrimmage (as applicable), excluding Penalties. Should a kick-off be returned for a touchdown, bets will be settled with the outcome of the subsequent kick-off. For settlement purposes, incomplete/intercepted passes, Quarterback sacks or fumbles will be considered as “Pass Play” unless the Quarterback has passed the line of scrimmage, at which point it would be considered as “Run Play”. Fumbles on exchanges to the Runningback will be considered as “Run Play”.
Settlement on offers referring to “Offensive Yards” will be based on the net number of yards including any sack yardage lost. Such calculation would be done by adding the relevant passing and receiving yards and subtracting the number of yards lost to sacks from the total.
Offers referring to any team scoring a specified successive number of times unanswered will consider scorings tallied during eventual Overtime but excludes any PATs (points after Touchdowns or 2 point conversions).
“Team to call first/next Timeout” offers will not take into consideration for settlement purposes any timeouts lost through any other means such as failed challenges, coaches challenges and/or injuries.
Settlement on all penalty offers will be based on the penalty being accepted. Declined penalties do not count.
Bets referring to the outcome of a particular drive will be settled as void in case of an incomplete drive. In cases where Team A has the ball and fumbles with the ball being recovered by Team B who successively fumbles it back to Team A, the outcome will be settled as a “Turnover”. Turnover on Downs (failed 4th Down attempt), will also be considered as a “Turnover”. Should it happen that a punt is fumbled by the receiving team and recovered by the kicking team, bets will be settled as “Punt”.
Offers on whether a 1st Down will be made, refer only to the team currently in possession achieving said accomplishment. Market will be settled as “YES” should a new set of “Downs” be achieved either by Run, Pass (including cases where a Touchdown is scored as a result) or an Automatic 1st Down Penalty. “Safety”, “Field Goal” (irrespective whether the Field Goal being scored or not), fumbles or any change in possession, will settle the offer as “NO”. Any Down replayed due to non-automatic penalties will not be considered for settlement purposes unless committed with 5 yards or less to go.
Settlement on which team will gain most Passing/Rushing yards will be based on the gross number of yards thrown/run, including any negative yarding for rushing.
For settlement purposes, bets on Touchdown scorers require the listed player to be part of the active roster for that match. Stakes on players which are not on the active roster will be refunded. In cases of “passing Touchdowns” only the player who catches the pass will be considered as the Touchdown scorer.
Player props and other stats-based offers will be settled according to the official match reports as published after the game by the governing body.
Unless otherwise specified in conjunction with the bet offer, bets on outcomes related to 2nd Half, will only take into consideration points and occurrences tallied/obtained during the specified timeframe and will not consider any points and occurrences tallied/obtained during eventual Overtime.
Offers referring to tackles made, will be settled according to tackles made on regular defensive plays only. This will be determined by the final defensive statistics in the official gamebook.
Athletics
Unless otherwise stated, all bets on Athletics are determined on the basis of the result after the final stage of that competition. If none of the listed participants takes part in the final stage, all bets will be void, unless the governing body follows specific tie-breaking procedures, in which case, these will be deemed valid.
All bet offers will be settled based on the first official result being presented. However, we will take into account and settle/re-settle accordingly, following any changes to the official result issued within 24 hours after the event has taken place. For such eventuality to be considered, the protest must be attributable to incidents happening exclusively during the event, such as a line infringement, pushes or a false handover in a relay race, etc. No doping cases will be considered. The result available at the end of the aforementioned 24 hours will be deemed as binding regardless of any further protests, changes to the official result, etc.
If two or more participants take part in different heats during a competition, all Head-To-Head-offers between them will be considered void, unless there is a later stage in the competition that at least one of them qualifies for.
A participant that is disqualified due to infringement of the start procedure (false start) will be deemed as having taken part in the event.
We reserve the right to apply Tattersalls Rule 4, in cases of non-starters in any athletics events.
Australian Rules Football
Unless explicitly stated, should a match or else a specified period (ex. 1st Half, 3rd Quarter, etc.) end in a draw, all bets will be settled according to the so-called “dead-heat” rule. Section B, Para 5.14). In such case the payout would be calculated after the odds are divided and then multiplied by the stake, irrespective of whether the net payout is lower than the Member's stake.
Unless otherwise stated, all bets referring to matches will be settled on with the result at the end of 4th Quarter (normal time).
For any Offer referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Points Scored by Player X) stakes will be refunded, if the player is not in the starting 22. For any offer between two players (head to head matchups) stakes will be refunded if either player is not in the starting 22.
First Goalscorer in the match/1st Quarter – Bets will be voided on players who are not in the starting 22. Bets on First Goalscorer in the match, do not require the goal to be scored in the 1st Quarter. Should no goal be scored in the listed period, all bets will be settled as void, unless an option for “no goal” has been offered.
First Goalscorer in the 2nd, 3rd or 4th Quarter - All bets stand irrespective of the player’s participation (or lack thereof) in the listed Quarter and the match. Should no goal be scored in the listed quarter all bets will be settled as void.
“Wire-to-Wire" betting refers to which team (if any) is leading the match at the end of each quarter.
Should any replay/extra matches be required to determine any position in the classification, league winners, etc., the outcomes deriving from these replays/extra matches will be used for the settlement of the respective bet offer.
For match betting on a Grand Final, the betting is specific to the upcoming match to be played, or the current match, in the case of live betting. Bets will not carry over to any replay and a new market will be added for any subsequent matches.
When settling offers which relate to the performances of two or more individuals/teams over a stipulated timeframe/competition, stages of elimination within the “Finals” will count for the settlement. Should two teams be eliminated at the same stage, the team that finished highest on the AFL ladder at the conclusion of the Regular Season will be considered as having achieved a better position.
All bets stand, regardless of change of venue.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Points Scored by Player X during the Playoffs) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most points during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
For any “time of goal” offer (example: time of first goal) stoppages are not included. All bets are settled according to the match timeline on the official AFL website (no stoppages, time on is included, clock counts upward).
For all highest scoring quarter offers, the “Same amount” outcome settles on any 2 (or more) quarters being equal highest.
For all season offers, that are settled at the conclusion of the regular season, the official ladder position is used as the determining factor (i.e Percentage determines tied positions).
Similarly, for the “Team(s) with the Most Losses” offer, in the event of two or more teams recording the same number of losses, the winner will be determined as the team with the lower ladder position (i.e Percentage determines tied positions).
Drone Racing
Bets are settled according to the publication of live timing and classification as shown on TV/public stream at the time of podium presentations, or at the end of the heat/semi-final/final/level (as applicable). Should the information required for the settling of the offer be missing/not shown and/or incomplete, the first official information on the official site will be deemed binding, regardless of subsequent promotions, demotions, appeals and/or penalties inflicted after the termination of the session/level which the bet refers to. In cases of abandoned/uncompleted events, all those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome are deemed valid and will be settled accordingly.
Events being shortened due to weather conditions or other situations but are deemed official by the governing association will be settled accordingly, regardless of any changes which said associations might make due to the incompletion of the level.
Should a heat/semi-final/final/level be restarted from the beginning, bets will stand and will be settled according to the result issued after the restart, except for those bets the outcome of which has already been determined.
For settlement purposes, a pilot who has taken part in a heat is considered to have taken part in the semi-final/final/level.
In "Head to Head" bets, all listed pilots must take part in at least one heat for bets to stand, irrespective of whether a pilot manages to get an official time.
In "Outright" or "Place" bets, no refunds will apply on those pilots who do not take part for any reason, for the heat/semi-final/final/level to which the offer refers to.
Baseball
Unless otherwise stated, bets on Baseball are determined on the basis of the result after any eventual extra innings, and regardless of the amount of extra innings played, as declared by the respective organising body. In case of a draw after the eventual extra innings, match bets will be settled as void.
A bet is declared void on a cancelled or postponed match which has not started, or in the case of a result not having been issued within twelve hours of the scheduled start time.
In the case of a shortened match, “Match” bets (aka Moneyline) will be settled, as per the rules of the respective governing body.
"Handicap", "Over/Under", "Odd/Even" and all other markets, including player performance markets, but except Moneyline require all scheduled innings to be completed, or at least 8.5 innings to be completed if the home team is in advantage, for bets to stand. This applies to all offers except those the outcome of which has been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events. These will be settled according to the decided outcome.
With the exception of those offers where the start/participation of the listed pitcher(s) is specifically required for the market to deemed valid, (example: Listed Pitcher Moneyline), whoever is chosen to be the starting pitcher of either team has no relevance on how offers are settled.
For settlement purposes "First Half" bets are deemed to be referring to the outcomes deriving from the first 5 innings. All 5 innings must be completed for bets to stand except for those offers the outcome of which has been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome. For games played under a scheduled, shortened format, the first half innings will be shortened accordingly, for example "first half" bets in a 7 innings game refer to outcomes deriving from the first 4 innings.
Live Betting offers referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Hits by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will have most Hits), require all listed individuals to participate in at least one more play in the match, after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
All Pre-Match markets involving hitters, require for the player to be listed as in the starting line-up, and to have at least one plate appearance. Those involving pitchers, require the Player to throw at least one pitch, for bets to stand. Offers referring to one or more players’ performance in a given match, require that all listed players are included in the starting lineup, for bets to stand.
Unless specifically stated or implied in the offer characteristics, settlement of Season bets and Tournament or Playoff Totals will be based as per the classifications, definitions and tie-breaking rules as per MLB.com, or the official website of the competition (as applicable). Unless otherwise stated, cumulative amounts of such bets will include eventual prolongations (e.g. Extra Innings). “Head to Head” and “Over/Under” bets involving one or more players’ performance in the tournament are considered valid given that all listed players take part in the tournament at some stage for bets to stand.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Runs Scored by Player X during the Playoffs) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will record most hits during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more game applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Season bets, regardless whether these include outcomes obtained during Playoffs or otherwise, as well as offers referring to particular teams or player performances will remain valid irrespective of eventual player trades, team movements, name changes, season length or playoff format changes during any point in the season.
Bets on the outcome of a particular period (example Inning X) or occurrences achieved during a time-limited period require the specified period to be completed with the exception of those offers the outcome of which is already determined before any interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers which will be settled accordingly. For settlement purposes, any Inning (including eventual extra innings) which does not require the Home Team to bat further, or at all, is considered to have been naturally concluded and all bets referring to the inning (example: Result of Inning X, Handicap (Spread) of Inning X, Over/Under (Total) Runs or Hits in Inning X) stand with the exception of those which specifically refer to the single performance of the Home team within the specified inning (example: Over/Under (Total) Runs scored by the Home Team in Inning X) which will be settled as void should the Home Team not bat at all during the specified Inning.
During certain events we might decide to offer markets related to the outcome of a series of consecutive Regular Season matches playing between the listed teams during the specified timeframes. Settlement will include outcomes deriving from any doubleheaders as much as these are played within the specified timeframe. In cases where no drawn (tie) outcome has been made available for betting, bets will be settled as void should both of the listed teams win the same number of matches. All scheduled matches must be completed as per the rules of the governing body for bets to stand except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Offers which confront or tally outcome and occurrences obtained/achieved by teams or players taking part in different matches not confronting each other (example: Team to score most runs in their respective match), require that all applicable matches are completed as per the rules of the governing body for bets to stand except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome. In cases where no drawn (tie) outcome has been made available for betting, bets will be settled as void should both of the listed teams/participants obtain/achieve the same amount.
Series winner results are settled according to which team wins most matches in the series of matches (including any doubleheaders) playing within the listed timeframe. Bets void if teams win the same number of matches. All scheduled matches must be completed as per the rules of the governing body for bets to stand except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Basketball
All ‘match’ bets on Basketball are determined on the basis of the final result, including potential overtime, unless stated otherwise.
Bets referring to the match outcome (aka “Moneyline”) from ties which are decided over two or more match-ups will have the “Including Overtime” offer voided in case the match ends in a draw and no further play is done in that particular match. Remaining markets (Totals, Handicaps etc) will be settled normally, based on the result at the end of play.
In multiple legged ties, all points collected during any overtime period will count for the final settlement of that particular match.
Offers referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Points Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will get most Rebounds), require all listed individuals to participate in at least one more play in the match, after bet acceptance, for bets to stand.
All bets referring to aggregated Tournament Totals (such as Points, Rebounds, Assists, etc.) will be settled based on official statistics by the governing body. Unless otherwise stated, cumulative amounts of such bets will include eventual prolongations (e.g. Overtime).
All NBA and NCAA ‘match’ offers will only be considered valid should there be less than 5 minutes of scheduled play left in the 4th Quarter/2nd Half, as applicable. Exception will be done for those the outcome of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Season bets, regardless whether these include outcomes obtained during Playoffs or otherwise, as well as offers referring to particular teams or player performances will remain valid irrespective of eventual player trades, team movements, name changes, season length or playoff format changes during any point in the season.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Points Scored by Player X during the Playoffs) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will win most rebounds during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more game applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Bets on Double Result (ie. predicting the outcome at Half Time combined with the result at the end of the 4th Quarter) will not take into account any outcomes deriving from Overtime.
Unless otherwise specified in conjunction with the bet offer, bets on outcomes related to 2nd Half, will only take into consideration points and occurrences tallied/obtained during the specified timeframe and will not consider any points and occurrences tallied/obtained during eventual Overtime.
For settlement purposes a ‘double-double’ is considered to have occurred should the player register 10 or more in at least 2 of these categories in a single match (including during eventual overtime): Points Scored, Any Rebounds Won, Assists, Steals and/or Blocked Shots. A ‘triple-double’ is considered to have occurred should the player register 10 or more in at least 3 of the aforementioned categories in a single match (including during eventual overtime).
For 3 x 3 basketball: “Over/Under” and "Handicap" offers on unfinished matches the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and/or where any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences, which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion, will be added as necessary depending on the format of the match. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer, this will be settled as such. See examples from the tennis-section for reference.
Beach Volleyball
All bets will remain valid as far as the match/offer is played within the tournament framework regardless of any changes in schedule, conditions, etc.
“Match” bet offers are based on the general principle of tournament progress or tournament win, depending on which phase of the competition the match refers to. The team progressing to the next round or winning the tournament is to be considered the winner of the bet regardless of match duration, withdrawals, disqualifications, etc. These bets require at least one set to be completed for bets to stand.
“Over/Under” offers on unfinished matches/events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion will be added as necessary depending on the number of sets which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer, this will be settled as such. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
“Handicap” offers require all scheduled sets to be completed for bets to stand except in those events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers which will be settled accordingly. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
All “Correct Score”, “Odd/Even” and those offers which refer to the winner of a particular period in the match (example “E.g. Team to win the first set”) require the relevant part of the match to be completed.
Boxing
All offers will be settled according to the official result of the relevant governing body immediately as declared by the ring announcer at the end of the fight. No amendments made to the official result after being first announced, will be taken into consideration, except for those which the official organization effects to rectify clear cases of human errors by the ring announcer.
For settlement purposes, in case the match is interrupted for any reason in between rounds, (e.g. retirement before the start of a round, disqualification, failure to answer the bell), the fight will be deemed to have finished, at the end of the previous round. For all the “To go the Distance” offers, to be settled as yes, the official scheduled number of rounds, must be fully completed. In the event of a technical decision, before the end of the scheduled number of rounds, all bets will be settled as a win by decision.
Offers on fights declared as a "No Contest" or "Technical draw" (prior to the completion of 4 full rounds) will be settled as void, except for those offers the outcome of which have been decided prior to the decision, and which could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, will be settled according to the decided outcome.
If for any reason, the number of rounds in a fight is changed between the time of bet acceptance and the actual fight, offers which make specific reference to rounds, such as "Round betting", "Group of Rounds", "Over/Under", "Winning Method" and “To go the distance” will be declared void.
For settlement purposes, betting on rounds or groups of rounds refers to a fighter to win by KO (Knockout), TKO (Technical Knockout), or disqualification during that round or group of rounds. If for any reason, a points decision is awarded before the full number of scheduled rounds is completed (Technical Decision), offers such as “Alternate Round Betting”, “Group of rounds” and “Over/under” will be declared void, unless the outcome is already determined.
Bets referring to round/fight duration represents the actual time passed in the round/fight, as applicable, depending on the scheduled round/fight duration. For example, a bet on Over 4.5 Total Rounds in a Boxing fight will be settled as Over once a minute and a half in the 5th Round has passed.
Any confirmed fight must be completed by 23:59 local time of the following day for bets to stand. Any changes in venue, location will not be deemed valid grounds for voiding of the offers.
In offers where a draw/tie is possible and odds have not been offered for such outcome, bets will be settled as void should the official result be declared as such. For settlement purposes, fights the outcome of which is declared as either a “Majority draw” or a “Split draw” are to be considered as a drawn/tied outcome and offers will be settled accordingly.
Settlement of statistics-based offers such as "Boxer X to be knocked down" or similar will be settled based on the results declared by the referee.
Cricket
General Cricket Rules
In cases where no odds have been offered for a tie and the match/offer ends in a tie, bets would be settled according to the so-called “dead-heat” rule where the payout would be calculated after the odds are divided and multiplied by the stake, irrespective whether the net payout is lower than the Member's stake. In competitions where other means are used to determine a winner after a tie (for example: ‘Bowl out’ or ‘Super over’) then offers will be settled based on the result after such prolongations are completed. The only exception to this rule is for “Match Odds” betting in Test/First Class/3, 4 or 5 day matches where, in the event of a tie, where both teams have completed two innings each and have scored exactly the same number of runs, bets on “Match Odds” will be settled as void.
For “Total Runs Over X” (Over/Under & Odd/Even) betting, “extras” and “penalty runs” (as per match scorecards) are included for settlement purposes. Bets will be void if the over is not completed unless a result has already been determined or the over has reached its ‘natural conclusion’ (e.g. innings end/declaration). The market refers only to the listed over (e.g. “5th over” refers to over number 5, i.e. the over directly following over number 4).
For “Total Runs Delivery X” (Over/Under & Odd/Even) betting, “extras” (but not “penalty runs”) as per match scorecard are included for settlement purposes. Deliveries are counted from the start of the over, and additional deliveries (resulting from ‘extras’) will be counted consecutively and separately (e.g. If delivery 1 is a wide, the next ball is considered delivery 2).
For “Boundary Over X” (Yes/No) betting, any instance of the ball striking or clearing the boundary regardless of whether the ball comes off the bat shall be deemed a boundary. This includes wides, byes, leg byes & overthrows (e.g. any instance of an in play ball that hits or clears the boundary shall be settled as yes for that over). 4 runs that are “all run” between the wicket shall not be counted as a boundary. Bets will be void if the over is not completed unless a result has already been determined or the over has reached its ‘natural conclusion’ (e.g. innings end, declaration). The market refers only to the listed over (e.g. “5th Over” refers to over number 5, i.e. the over directly following over number 4).
For “Wicket Over X” (Yes/No) betting, the over must be completed for bets to stand, unless a wicket has already fallen or the innings reaches its natural conclusion (e.g. innings end, declaration).
For “Total Wides” (Over/Under) betting, settlement will be based on the “Runs” scored from “Wides” and not the number of “Wides” bowled. E.g. If a single wide delivery reaches the boundary it shall count as 5 total wides.
For “Method of Dismissal” betting, bets will be void if either player retires due to injury or any other reason, before the wicket falls or there are no further wickets.
For “Most Run Outs” betting, settlement will be based on the batting team not the fielding team. (E.g. run outs count for the team of the player that is dismissed).
For “Odd/Even” betting, a ball must be bowled for bets to stand.
For any betting involving “ducks”, a “duck” is defined as when a player is dismissed for a score of zero runs. Any player not-out for zero runs is not considered a duck.
For “Maiden in Match” betting, a maiden is considered any over bowled with no runs scored. Only completed overs with zero runs count. A minimum of 1over must be bowled for bets to stand. For settlement purposes leg-byes and byes are not applied to this bet offer, as per the match scorecard.
For all “4s” betting including but not limited to total 4s, most 4s & player’s total 4s; any ‘all run’ 4s will not count towards the total. Over-throws that reach the boundary and are awarded to the batsman will be counted. No-balls that reach the boundary off the bat and are awarded to the batsman will be counted. Leg-byes & byes that reach the boundary are not included. Wides that reach the boundary are not included.
Penalty runs awarded will be counted towards the over, interval and innings for settlement purposes, as per match scorecard. If penalty runs are not awarded to a specific over, they will only count towards innings runs.
Player Cricket Rules
"Top Run Scorer" and "Top Wicket Taker" bets (including all variants by “Home Team”, Away Team”, “1st Innings” & “2nd Innings”) placed on any player not in the starting 11 will be declared void. Bets on players who are selected but do not bat or field will be settled as losers. In the event of a tie, dead heat rules as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1 will apply.
Additionally, for all limited overs matches the following will apply.
Betting requires a minimum of 20 overs to be bowled per innings of a One Day match, unless a team is all-out or the match is completed, or a minimum of 5 overs to be bowled per innings of a Twenty 20 match, T10 or Hundred match unless a team is all-out or the match is completed
Additionally, for all Test matches & 4/5 day matches the following will apply.
Betting requires 50 overs to be completed for bets to stand, unless the Innings has reached its natural conclusion (including ‘Innings declared’).
All “Top Wicket Taker” bets will be settled solely on the number of wickets taken regardless of the number of runs conceded.
All “Top Wicket Taker” bets will be void if no wicket is taken by any bowler in that innings.
This rule excludes any Tournament or Series market as covered in Section C, Para 10€.5“
"Man of the Match/Player of the Match” bets placed on any player not in the starting 11 will be declared void. Bets on players who are selected but do not bat or bowl will be settled as losers. In the event of a tie, dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
“Next Man Out” & “First Batsman Dismissed” bets will be settled as void if either player retires due to injury or any other reason before the wicket falls or if there are no further wickets. Both named batsmen must be batting at the fall of the nominated wicket for bets to stand.
“Most Runs” (2-way & 3-way) matchups, require that both/all players reach the batting crease while a ball is bowled, though it is not necessary they face a ball nor must the quoted players have batted together, otherwise bets will be void. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
“Most Wickets” (2-way & 3-way) matchups, require that both/all players bowl at least 1 ball for bets to stand. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
“Player Performance” bets placed on any player not in the starting 11 will be declared void. Settlement is based on the following points based scoring system:
1 point per run scored (batsman only);
10 points per catch taken (fielder or wicket keeper only);
20 points per wicket (bowler only);
25 points per stumping (wicket keeper only).
Additionally, for all limited overs matches, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the standard scheduled number of overs in a Twenty 20 match or any other limited overs match. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
For “Player to take 5 or more Wickets/Player’s Total Wickets/Player to take a wicket” bets placed on any player not in the starting 11 will be declared void. Bets will also be void if the player does not bowl a ball.
“Player to take make a Duck” (Yes/No) bets require that the player reaches the batting crease while a ball is bowled, though it is not necessary they face a ball.
For “Player to score Fastest 50/Century” betting, settlement is based on the least number of balls faced to reach the milestone (either 50 runs or 100 runs). In the event of a tie, dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
For “Race to X Runs” bets, both players must open the batting for bets to stand.
“Player’s Total Runs/Player’s Total 4s/Player’s Total 6s” (Over/Under) betting requires that the player reach the batting crease while a ball is bowled, though it is not necessary they face a ball. In cases where a batsman's innings is ended by weather or bad light, all bets where a result has not been determined will be declared void. A result is deemed to have been determined if a batsman has passed the run total at which the bet was accepted, has been dismissed or an innings completed/declaration made. For example, if a Batsman's score stands at 50 ‘Not-Out’ when a game or innings is terminated due to bad light or rain, all bets on 50.5 runs will be voided unless the game has reached its natural conclusion. However, all bets on Over 49.5 Runs will be considered as winning while bets on Under 49.5 Runs will be settled as losing. Should a batsman retire due to injury or any other reason, his score at the end of his team's innings will be considered as the result for that bet. Additionally, for all limited overs matches, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the standard scheduled number of overs in a Twenty 20 match or any other limited overs match. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
“Player to Score 50/Half Century” (Yes/No) betting requires that the player reach the batting crease while a ball is bowled, though it is not necessary that they face a ball. A player is deemed to have scored 50 or a ‘Half century’ once their score is 50 or more runs regardless of whether the player scores a century or more. In cases where a batsman's innings is ended by weather or bad light, all bets where a result has not been determined will be declared void, unless the game has reached a natural conclusion. Should a batsman retire due to injury or any other reason, his score at the end of his team's innings will be considered as the result for that bet. Additionally, for all limited overs matches, should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted, then all open (player to score 50) bets will be declared void granted that the reduction is 10% or more of those scheduled. If the reduction is less than 10% of the scheduled overs at the time the bet was accepted, then bets will stand. If a team innings is 10 overs or less, then any reduction in overs will void bets. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play could possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
“Player to Score 100/Century/200/Double Century” (Yes/No) betting requires that the player reach the batting crease while a ball is bowled, though not necessarily facing a ball. A player is deemed to have scored 100 or a ‘Century’ once their score is 100 or more runs regardless of whether the player scores a double century or more. Similarly, a player is deemed to have scored 200 or a “Double Century” once their score is 200 or more runs. In cases where a batsman's innings is ended by weather or bad light, all bets where a result has not been determined will be declared void. Should a batsman retire due to injury or any other reason, his score at the end of his team's innings will be considered as the result for that bet. Additionally, for all limited overs matches, should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted, then all open (player to score 100/200) bets will be declared void granted that the reduction is 10% or more of those scheduled. If the reduction is less than 10% of the scheduled overs at the time the bet was accepted, then bets will stand. If a team innings is 10 overs or less, then any reduction in overs will void bets. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
Limited Overs Cricket
Should a match be transferred to a ‘reserve’ day, all bets will remain valid as long as the game commences within 48hrs of the original, scheduled start time.
Match odds (head to head) betting pays on the official result. In the event of a tie, dead heat rules as explained in Clause 1 of the General Cricket Rules will apply unless a subsequent tiebreaker method is used to determine the winner (e.g. super over, bowl-off), in which case the outcome will be settled on the result of this method. Should the match be declared a 'no-result' all bets are void.
If any ‘Super Over’ or tie-breaker is required; any runs, wickets or any other stat that may occur in the super over/tie breaker do not count towards any betting market (except match result) including player bet offers & team totals (e.g. Top batsman/bowler, player runs, total 6’s, to take at least X wickets). This rule does not apply to specific bet offers relating to ‘Super Overs’ (e.g. Super Over Total Runs).
For “Match Handicap / Winning Margin” betting, settlement will depend on whether the winning team bats 1st or 2nd. If the team batting 1st wins, then the runs handicap will be used for settlement. If the team batting 2nd wins then the wickets handicap will be used for settlement. All bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the standard scheduled number of overs in a Twenty 20 match or any other limited overs match.
For “Highest 1st 6/15 Overs” all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs in the match be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Clause 1 of the General Cricket Rules will apply.
“Highest Total 1st X Overs” bets will be void should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs in the match being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play could possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
“Highest Opening Partnership” requires that both sides complete their opening partnerships with the exception of those situations where an outcome has already been determined. An opening partnership is considered to have begun once the first ball is bowled in a team innings, and lasts until the fall of 1st wicket or, should no 1st wicket fall, the innings reaching its natural conclusion. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Clause 1 of the General Cricket Rules will apply. Additionally, all (highest opening partnership) bets will be declared as void should the number of overs in the match be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
In “Fall of Next Wicket” & “Opening Partnership” (Over/Under) betting, should either batsman retire due to injury or any other reason before a result has been determined all bets placed before the retirement will be declared void; bets taken after the first ball of the new partnership will stand. A result is deemed to have been determined if the partnership total has passed the run total at which the bet was accepted. If a team reaches their target, the total achieved by the batting team will be the result of the market. If a partnership is disrupted due to weather all bets will stand, unless there is no further play in the match. In such case all bets where a result has not been determined will be declared void. In relation to the over number at the fall of next wicket, any quoted half refers to the whole over number not the specific balls bowled in each over (e.g. over/under 5.5 refers to either ‘any delivery in over 5 & earlier’ or ‘any delivery in over 6 & later’). Additionally, all (F.O.W) bets will be declared as void should the number of overs in the match be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
For “Total Runs – Innings X” (Over/Under) (e.g. Total Team Runs) betting, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs in the match be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. For the avoidance of doubt: Any bets taken after the number of overs has been reduced will stand unless there is a further reduction.
For “Total Runs – Innings X, Overs X-X” (Over/Under) (e.g. Total Runs – Home Team, Overs 1-15) betting, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs in the match at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers have already been decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. For the avoidance of doubt: Any bets taken after the number of overs has been reduced will stand unless there is a further reduction.
For “Total 4s/6s/Boundaries/Wickets” (Over/Under) betting, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs in the match at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers have already been decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. Leg-bye and byes that reach/pass the boundary do not count towards total 4s/6s. Overthrows awarded to the batsman do count. Wides that reach the boundary are not counted. No-balls that reach the boundary off the bat and are awarded to the batsman will be counted.
For “Most Fours/Sixes/Wides/Run-outs/Boundaries/Ducks/Extras” betting, should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted, then all open (Most 'X’) bets will be declared void granted that the reduction is 10% or more of those scheduled. If the reduction is less than 10% of the scheduled overs at the time the bet was accepted, then bets will stand. If a team innings is 10 overs or less, then any reduction in overs will void (most ‘x’) bets. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. Leg-bye and byes that reach/pass the boundary do not count towards total 4s/6s. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Clause 1 of the General Cricket Rules will apply.
For “Total Wides/Run-outs/Ducks/Extras/Stumpings” (Over/Under) betting, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs in the match at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers have already been decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. For wides and extras, settlement will include the runs scored from wides and not just the number of wides bowled.
For “Highest Individual Score”, all bets will be declared as void should the number of overs in the match be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the standard scheduled number of overs in a Twenty 20 match or any other limited overs match. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption then these will be settled accordingly.
For “Team of Top Run Scorer” betting, should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted, then all open (team of top run scorer) bets will be declared void granted that the reduction is 10% or more of those scheduled. If the reduction is less than 10% of the scheduled overs at the time the bet was accepted, then bets will stand. If a team innings is 10 overs or less, then any reduction in overs will void bets. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Clause 1 of the General Cricket Rules will apply.
For “Fifty/Century in Match” (Yes/No) betting, should the intervention of rain (or any other delay) result in the number of overs being reduced from those initially scheduled at the time the bet was accepted, then all open (fifty/century in match) bets will be declared void granted that the reduction is 10% or more of those scheduled. If the reduction is less than 10% of the scheduled overs at the time the bet was accepted, then bets will stand. If a team innings is 10 overs or less, then any reduction in overs will void (Fifty/Century in Match) bets. Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
For “Highest Total Runs in an Over/Maximum Runs in an Over” (Over/Under) bets will be settled on the greatest number of runs (including extras) scored in any one over of either innings in the match. All bets will be declared as void should the number of overs be reduced due to weather (or any other reason) from the scheduled number of overs at the time the bet was accepted (whether standard or already reduced). Should the outcome of such offers be already decided before the interruption and no further play would possibly change the outcome of such bets, then these will be settled accordingly.
Test Matches/First Class Matches /3, 4 or 5 day matches
If a match is officially abandoned (e.g. due to dangerous pitch conditions) then all undecided bets on the match are void.
For “Match Odds” betting in Test/First Class/3, 4 or 5 day matches, in the event of a tie where both teams have completed two innings each and have scored exactly the same number of runs, bets on “Match Odds” will be void, with stakes being refunded. In Test and First Class Cricket matches, the match winner will be settled as determined by the competition’s official governing body. If the governing body states that the match has been drawn, then only bets on draw/tie will win on the 3-way match odds market, while bets on either team to win the match will be lost.
For “Draw No Bet” betting, in the event of a draw or tie bets are void & therefore refunded.
For “Double Chance” betting, in the event of a tie where both teams have completed two innings each and have scored exactly the same number of runs, bets will be void & therefore refunded.
For “Most Points” betting, offers will be settled based on who has the most points awarded for the match (e.g. Sheffield Shield). In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
“Highest Opening Partnership” bets require that both sides complete their opening partnerships with the exception of those situations where an outcome has already been determined. Unless otherwise stated, highest opening partnership refers to the first innings of each team only. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
In “Fall of Next Wicket” & “Opening Partnership” (Over/Under) betting, should either batsman retire due to injury or any other reason before a result has been determined all bets will be declared void. A result is deemed to have been determined if the Innings total has passed the run total at which the bet was accepted. If a team declares or reaches their target, the total achieved by the batting team will be the result of the market. If a partnership is disrupted due to weather all bets will stand, unless there is no further play in the match. In such case all bets where a result has not been determined will be declared void. Extras and penalty runs awarded before the fall of wicket or during the partnership, according to the match scorecard, will be counted. In relation to the over number at the fall of next wicket, any quoted half refers to the whole over number not the specific balls bowled in each over (e.g. over/under 5.5 refers to either ‘any delivery in over 5 & earlier’ or ‘any delivery in over 6 & later’).
For “Total Runs - Innings X” (Over/Under) (e.g. Total Team runs) betting, all bets will be void if 50 overs are not bowled, unless an innings has reached its natural conclusion, or is declared. If an innings is declared at any point bets will be settled on the declaration total. Extras and penalty runs awarded during the innings, according to the match scorecard, will be counted.
“Session Runs” betting requires 20 overs to be bowled in a session for bets to stand. Bets are settled on the total number of runs in the session regardless of which team scores the runs. Extras and penalty runs awarded during the session, according to the match scorecard, will be counted.
“Session Wickets” betting requires 20 overs to be bowled in a session for bets to stand. Bets are settled on the total number of wickets lost in the session regardless of which team loses them.
For any betting involving “Session”, the following definition of each session will apply to day matches.
Day X, Session 1 (Start of play until Lunch is taken)
Day X, Session 2 (Lunch until Tea is taken)
Day X, Session 3 (Tea until stumps/close of play for the day)
The following definition of each session will apply to day/night matches.
Day X, Session 1 (Start of play until tea is taken)
Day X, Session 2 (Tea until dinner is taken)
Day X, Session 3 (Dinner until stumps/close of play for the day)
For “Test Match Finish” betting, where a match finishes in a draw, the winner will be deemed as ‘Day 5, Session 3’. If a match is officially abandoned (e.g. due to dangerous pitch conditions) then all bets are void.
For “Team to Lead after First Innings” betting, both teams are required to be bowled out or declare their first innings for bets to stand. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
“First Innings Century” offers require 50 overs to be bowled unless a result has already been determined or the innings has reached its natural conclusion (including innings declared).
For "Fifty/Century/Double Century in match" in either Test or First class matches, bets will be void in drawn matches where the number of overs bowled is less than 200, unless a result has already been determined.
For "Fifty/Century/Double Century in match" in ‘Home/Away 1st Innings’ of either Test or First class matches, bets will be void unless the Innings reaches its natural conclusion (including ‘Innings declared’) or a result has already been determined.
For "Fifty/Century/Double Century in match" in Either 1st Innings of either Test or First class matches, bets will be void unless both Innings reach their natural conclusion (including ‘Innings declared’) or a result has already been determined.
For "Fifty/Century/Double Century in match" in ‘Home/Away 2nd Innings’ of either Test or First class matches, bets will be void in case the number of overs bowled for that Innings is less than 50, unless a result has already been determined.
“Team of Top Run Scorer” betting will be settled of the top run scorer for either the 1st or 2nd innings of either team, i.e. the team of the highest individual run scorer in the match regardless of the overall match result. Bets will be void in drawn matches where the number of overs bowled is less than 200. In the event of a tie, if no draw price was offered, dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
Series/Tournament Betting
Should no draw odds be offered for a “Series Winner” bet and the series is drawn, all bets will be declared void, unless dead heat rule was specified (as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1.
If a tournament is not completed but a winner or winners are declared by the governing body, bets are paid on the winner(s) as declared. Dead heat rules as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1 might apply. Should no winner be declared then all bets will be settled as void.
All tournament betting includes Finals/Playoffs, unless otherwise stated.
For “Series Score” (Correct Series Score) betting, if for any reason the number of matches in a series is changed and does not reflect the number envisaged in the offer then all bets will be declared void.
For “Top Series Run Scorer/Wicket Taker” & “Top Tournament Batsman/Bowler” betting, where a tie occurs dead heat rules will apply as explained in Section C, Para 10(a).1. No refunds will be issued on players not participating. At least one game must be completed in the tournament/series for bets to stand.
Bets referring to a particular player/teams' performances in a Series/Tournament will not take into account any statistics accumulated from warm-up matches.
For “Series Handicap” betting, all bets will be settled on the “series score” result not the runs scored in the series. If for any reason the number of matches in a series changes then all bets will be declared void.
For “To Win a Test in Series” & “Total Test Wins/Draws” betting, if for any reason the number of matches in a series changes then all bets will be declared void with the exception of those situations where an outcome has already been determined.
Curling
Settlement of all bets referring to Curling will be based on the result after eventual extra innings, unless specifically specified.
Cycling (Track & Road)
Settlement of offers will be based upon the rider/team achieving the highest position at the end of the stage/event.
The decisive factor in settling bets will be the highest placing in the specified event as listed by the official organisation at the time of the podium presentation, disregarding subsequent disqualifications, changes to the official result, etc.
All "Head to Head" and “Over/Under” bets featuring the performance of one or more riders in an event/stage are considered valid given that all listed riders start the relative event/stage and at least one completes the said event/stage.
Bets referring to the outcome upon completion of the event require that the specified event is considered as completed in full and its result is declared, otherwise bets will be declared void, unless the result is already determined. In case the full number of stages for an event is not totally completed, or if the organizers decide to remove the result of certain stages from the computation of the official result, then the bets will be deemed valid granted that the number of the excluded stages does not exceed 25% of the pre-established number of stages (excluding prologue) at the beginning of the competition.
All bets will be deemed as valid provided that the event or the relative stage to which the bet refers to, is played within the same year, unless other arrangements have been agreed to.
Bets on performances in a particular stage stand regardless of any route modifications which the organizers might deem fit to consider and apply during the stage. Exception to this is the case where a stage which has particular characteristics (E.g.: a Mountains stage) is changed by the organizers, before the stage starts, into a stage which has other predominant characteristics (E.g.: Time Trial or low-lying stage). In such case bets which have been placed before the announcement of the change in stage concept will be declared void.
Unless otherwise specified, in a team/rider performance bet offer in a specific event (such as Total Stage wins by Team/Rider X in Tour Y) or "Head to Head" bet offers involving two riders/teams performances in specific events, occurrences happening in events which are given any of the following denominations will not count towards the settlement: Prologue, Team Time Trial.
Cyclo Cross
Terms and conditions stated for Cycling apply where applicable
Football
First/Next Goalscorer – The bet refers to a specific player being the scorer of the listed goal within the applicable timeframe, or else being the first scorer for his team (E.g. “First Goalscorer – Team X)”. Bets will be voided on players who do not take part in the match or else come on the field of play after the listed goal to which the bet refers to has been scored. Own goals do not count for the settlement of this offer. Should the goal to which the bet refers to be deemed as an own goal, the next player to score a goal which is not an own goal and conforms with the bet offer parameters will be deemed as the winning outcome. In case no goals (or no further goals, as applicable) is/are scored which are not own goals and fulfil the remaining bet offer parameters, all bets will be considered lost, unless an applicable option has been listed within the offer.
Last Goalscorer – The bet refers to a specific player being the scorer of the last goal either during a particular timeframe of the event (E.g. “Last goal in the match” or “Last goal in the 1st Half”), or else being the last scorer for his team (E.g. “Last Goalscorer – Team X)”. Bets will be voided only on players who do not take part in the match at all. In all other instances bets will remain valid, irrespective of the time of inclusion/substitution of the player. Own goals do not count for the settlement of this offer. Should the goal to which the bet refers to be deemed as an own goal, the previous player to score a goal which is not an own goal and conforms with the bet offer parameters will be deemed as the winning outcome. In case no goals (or no previous goals, as applicable) is/are scored which are not own goals and fulfil the remaining bet offer parameters, all bets will be considered lost.
"Scorecast" and “Matchcast” are bet offers where it is possible to bet simultaneously on a particular occurrence (e.g. First Goalscorer) combined with another from the same, or related event (e.g. Correct Score in the match, or match outcome). Should the bet refer to First or Last Goal Scorer, Sportsbook Rules as stated in Section C, Para 14.1 and Section C, Para 14.2 will apply, where applicable. Bets will be voided on players who do not take part in the match at all. In all other instances bets will remain valid, irrespective of the time of inclusion/substitution of the player. Own goals do not count for the settlement of this offer.
Unless otherwise specified, or indicated in conjunction with the bet offer, all bets placed before match start related to whether a specific player(s) will manage to score any number of goals, require the listed player(s) to play from the start of the match to be valid. Similar type of bets placed after the relevant match has started will be settled as void should the listed player(s) not take any further part in the match for whatever reason after bet acceptance. Own goals will never count as a goal scored for any selected player.
On all bets related to yellow/red cards, booking points, etc., only cards shown to players which at that moment are on the pitch are valid for settlement purposes. Cards, disciplinary actions, suspensions, imposed on any other individual which at the moment of the sanction is not, or should not, be actively playing on the pitch, as well as disciplinary measures taken after the game has officially ended, are disregarded.
Unless otherwise specified, or indicated in conjunction with the bet offer, all disciplinary-related bets placed before match start referring to individual(s) (e.g. yellow card, red card, number of fouls), require the listed player(s) to play from the start of the match to be valid. Similar type of bets placed after the relevant match has started will be settled as void should the listed player(s) not take any further part in the match for whatever reason after bet acceptance.
"Booking Points" are calculated according to the following rules: Yellow card = 10 points, Red card = 25 points. Maximum points for one player are 35.
Offers referring to individual player performances in a single match (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Goals), require all listed individuals to play from the start of the match for bets to stand.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X during the World Cup) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most goals during the league), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
All bets referring to aggregated Tournament Totals (such as Goals, Corners, Cards, Penalties, etc.) will be settled based on official statistics by the governing body. Unless otherwise stated, cumulative amounts of such bets will include eventual prolongations (e.g. Extra Time) but not Penalty Shoot Outs.
Unless specifically stated, all bets referring to a particular team winning a number/selection of trophies in the same season will be based on the particular team's performance within the following competitions: the domestic league, the apparent equivalent of the respective FA Cup and League Cup as well as the Champions League or Europa League. Other trophies (e.g. domestic and European Super Cup, World Club Cup) do not count.
The "Domestic Double" is to be considered as the team’s victory in the apparent equivalent of the respective domestic league and FA Cup.
For settlement purposes, bets referring to the number of cards shown by the referee will be counted as follows:
Yellow card = 1
Red card = 2
One yellow and a red = 3
Two yellow cards and a red = 3
The maximum cards for one player is 3 cards. Only cards shown to players currently eligible as per C.14.5 will be taken into consideration
Bets on whether a particular player(s) will manage to score from certain areas of the pitch (E.g. from outside the 'penalty box') will be settled based on the position of the ball at the time the shot was struck by the player, irrelevant of any further deflections which the ball trajectory might incur following the initial shot. For the sake of clarity, it is to be understood that the lines delineating the 'penalty box' are to be considered as an integral part of such area of the pitch. Thus, should a shot be struck with the ball hovering above, or touching, even partially, said lines, the shot will not be considered as having been outside the box.
Bets on whether a particular player(s) will manage to hit the cross bar, goal post or any other part of the frame delineating the goal area will only be settled as having accomplished such feat if the shot does not result directly in a goal being awarded exactly after the ball hits a part of the goal frame. Settlement will only take into consideration shots aimed at the goal frame defended by the opponents of the listed player(s) team. Should a player have a shot which hits the post their team defends this will not be considered as having accomplished such feat.
During certain events we might decide to offer for betting a reduced selection of participants (E.g. Any unlisted Team X player) or else a single participant as a representation of the whole squad (E.g. “Any Team X player”). In both cases for settlement purposes, all unlisted squad members are to be deemed as starters (and settled as such), including substitutes, regardless whether they take part in the match or not.
Bets on the performance of players starting the match on the bench will be settled as void if the player is either listed in the starting XI or does not take part in the match at all.
On offers such as Next Goalscorer, Next Carded player, Next Assist and Man of the Match, bets will be voided should the chosen player not take part in the match at all or had no possibility to accomplish such feat during the specified timeframe.
Bets on “Next Assist” for a particular goal will be settled as void should the governing body declare the specified goal as having been unassisted, the specified goal is an own goal and/or no more goals are scored in the match during the specified timeframe.
Bets referring to penalty kicks conversion and/or outcome will be settled according to the outcome occurred on the field of play as per the rules governing that specific scenario and in cases of penalty shoot-outs will remain valid regardless of the format employed by the governing body during the shoot-out. Bets stand in case the penalty is ordered to be re-taken and will be settled with the outcome achieved from the re-taken penalty.
As a general principle, settlement will be based on the concept that unless the penalty kick results in a goal being awarded (and settled accordingly), the first person/object/location (as applicable) which the ball initially touches after being kicked will be considered as the winning outcome, disregarding any other persons/objects the ball hits in its subsequent trajectory following any previous deflection, if any. The following examples are being issued as a general guideline on settlement:
"Goal" would be the winning outcome in case of the following scored penalties scenarios:
Any penalty kick which ends up as a goal without it being deflected;
Goalkeeper touches the penalty kick but ball ends up as goal;
Penalty kick touches the woodwork before ending up in goal.
"Save" would be the winning outcome in case of the following missed penalties scenarios:
Goalkeeper deflects the penalty kick to outside the goal frame;
Goalkeeper deflects the penalty kick onto the post/crossbar.
"Woodwork" would be the winning outcome in case of the following missed penalties scenarios:
Penalty kick hits the woodwork before it is touched/saved by the goalkeeper;
Penalty kick hits the woodwork and ball goes outside the goal frame.
"Any other Miss" would be the winning outcome in case of any penalty kick which without any deflection either by the goalkeeper or by the woodwork ends up outside the goal frame:
Exception to the above scenarios would be in in case of penalty shoot-outs, should the ball hit the woodwork, bounce on the goalkeeper and end in goal, such penalty will be considered as having been scored while should said situation occur during any other part of the match which is not a penalty shoot-out, the penalty taker would be considered as having missed to score and "hitting the woodwork" will be considered as the winning outcome.
Any decision taken by the Video Assistant Referee (VAR) which conflicts with the original decision sanctioned by the officials on the pitch (including non-decisions like allowing play to continue before reviewing the video), thus altering the understood state of the match at the time of bet placement, will result in all bets placed in the timeframe between the actual occurrence of the original incident and the referee's final decision on the incident being deemed as void, unless the odds offered on the specific bet offer are unaffected by the use of VAR or have already been accounted for in the odds offered at the time of bet acceptance. Settlement on all other unrelated bet-offers, including those determined by any play between the time of the original incident and the decision following the VAR review, which are not influenced/altered by the VAR decision will stand.
For resulting purposes VAR reviews, and the decisions emanating from said reviews, are to be considered as having happened at the time of the original incident for which the VAR would be eventually used even if play has not been immediately interrupted. We reserve the right, in accordance with Section A, Para 6.2, to reverse any previously settled offers where the settlement becomes inaccurate following the final referee decision, providing said decision is taken and communicated before the conclusion of the match and/or timeframe listed.
In order to avoid any doubts, we will consider the VAR as having been used if it is understood from the referee's gestures (ex.hand gestures, stopping the match to review the incident themselves), and/or the VAR usage is confirmed by the match report issued by the official organization. In cases where it is unclear whether the VAR has been used due to missing TV coverage and/or conflicting reports, we will settle the bets based on the information acquired from feed providers and reputable online sources on the basis of equity.
For settlement purposes, markets referring to team to be shown the next Card (booking) and/or “Total Cards” will always consider a Red Card as 2 instances of a card being shown and will be settled accordingly. The following examples are being listed as a guideline:
First card shown in a match is a straight Red Card. The team to which the card is awarded will be settled as the winning selection for the offers: Cards #1 and #2;
First card shown in a match is a Yellow Card followed by a straight Red Card to the same player without a second yellow card being shown. The team to which the cards are awarded will be settled as the winning selection for the offers: Cards #1, #2 and #3;
First card shown in a match is a Yellow Card followed by a second Yellow Card with the subsequent Red Card to the same player. The team to which the cards are awarded will be settled as the winning selection for the offers: Cards #1, #2 and #3.
Markets referring to which specific player will be the next to be booked/receive a card are to be understood and settled as per the order of the instance in which each single player gets booked/sent off by the referee. The card colour shown by the referee will not be given any consideration in the settlement of this offer and the decisive criteria will always be the order in which the single player is considered to have gone into the referee’s book. For settlement purposes it is possible for a single player to be listed twice as the “Next Carded player” as much as both bookings occur during different interruptions of play. Should 2 or more players be booked during the same interruption of play, bets on this offer will be settled as void.
Any reference to “Free Kicks” both when presented as a single outcome, as well as an occurrence will also take into consideration instances awarded for offsides and any other violation except those sanctioned with a penalty.
Offers referring to specific player(s) playing the whole match require the specified player(s) to start the match for bets to stand. For settlement purposes, bets will be settled as YES only if the specified player(s) is/are neither substituted nor sent off during Regular Time only. Eventual extra time does not count.
Golf
All bets will be deemed as valid as much as the Tournament, or the relative round to which the bet refers to, is played within the same sporting season and within 3 months from the last scheduled date (as per local course time), as issued by the governing body, irrespective of any time delays, unless other arrangements have been agreed to.
All bets referring to Tournament Performance, including but not limited to Winner, Place, Each-way, Winner without X, Group Betting, Top Nationality, Individual Final Position, etc., will be deemed valid as long as the minimum number of holes, applicable to the offer, as per the rules of the governing body (E.g. 36 holes for European Tour sanctioned events and 54 holes for PGA Tour sanctioned events), have been completed by the eligible players, and an official result has been declared by the sanctioning body. Should the format of a tournament be changed so that it features less rounds/holes than originally scheduled, all bets accepted on such offers after the last shot of the last completed round will be declared void.
Bet offers already decided are considered as valid bets even though 36 holes are not played and/or an official result has not been issued by the organisation.
Any result deriving from officially-sanctioned playoffs will count towards the settlement of Tournament offers only. Unless otherwise stated, offers referring to the performance within a specific round or hole will not take into account outcomes deriving from playoffs.
Bets on players who start the tournament, but withdraw or are disqualified, will be settled as losing bets, unless the result of the offer which the bet refers to, is already determined.
All bets placed on participants who do not compete at all will be refunded.
In outright bets which include a limited selection of participants, such as Top Nationality, Group Betting, Six-shooters, etc., We reserve the right to apply Tattersalls Rule 4 on any non-starter. Should it be the case that all players listed in the offer "miss the cut", the player with the best position at the time "cut" was made will be deemed the winner. Dead Heat rules will apply except for cases where a play-off has determined a better finishing position, where applicable.
All "Head to Head" bet offers require all participants to start in the event/round to which the bet refers to.
In "Head to Head" bets featuring only two players, bets will be voided if both participants share the same finishing position and no draw option has been offered. In "Head to Head" bets featuring three players, should two or more participants share the same finishing position, stakes will be divided in accordance with Section B, Para 5.19.
Settlement of "Head to Head" bet offers involving the performance of two or more players (e.g. Best Finishing Position in the tournament) will be based upon the best finishing position/lowest score (as applicable) achieved in the relative event/round which the bet refers to.
Any reference to Make/Miss the "Cut" requires an official cut/exclusion effected by the organisers for bets to stand. In the case of tournaments where players are eliminated during more than one phase, settlement will be based on a whether the player has qualified or not following the first "Cut" made.
Disqualification/withdrawals by a player before the "Cut" is made, will result in the player being considered as having missed the "Cut". Disqualification/withdrawals subsequent to the "Cut" being made will be irrelevant towards the original settlement of the "Make the Cut" offers.
In "Head to Heads" based on the best finishing position in the tournament, in case one player misses the cut then the other player will be settled as the winner. If both participants fail to make the "Cut" the player with the lowest score at the "Cut" will be considered as the winner. Should both players fail to make the "Cut" with the same score then the bet will be void. A player disqualified after the "Cut" has been made is deemed to have beaten a player who has failed to make the "Cut".
Any reference to "Majors" will be based on the tournaments for that particular season to which the PGA attributes said definition, irrespective of any venue, date, or any other changes.
Should play be stopped after a round has started and the governing body decide to cancel all action referring to that round and start from scratch or cancel altogether said round, then all bets placed after the start of that round on the Tournament outright, Leader After Round market and the Miss/Make the cut market will be void.
Bets referring to a specific participant placing within a predetermined position (example: Top 5/10/20/40) during a tournament, selection of tournaments or any particular classification will be settled as per "Dead Heat" rules should the participant tie for that particular position.
Offers related to a participant occupying a particular position on the Leaderboard at a specific time (example: Leader at End of Round X) will be settled in accordance with the result at the end of the specified round/timeframe. Dead Heat Rules will apply for any tied placings.
In tournaments where the "modified Stable ford scoring" is used, bets will be settled on the points scored and not the strokes taken. Listed players must complete at least 1 hole for bets to stand, otherwise bets will be void.
Settlement of so-called "Action-betting" offers and similar, including but not limited to "Fairways/Greens in Regulation/Bunkers/Water Hazards", are settled on the exact location where the ball is deemed to have come to rest. Bets will be settled according to the Official Website of the Tour/event involved and should no information for such settlement be published then TV pictures will be used to determine the outcome. The following description and settlement rules are being provided for "Action-betting" offers:
Fairway in Regulation – Bet refers to a player's tee shot on a Par 4 or Par 5 hole being deemed to have come to rest on the cut piece of grass known as the "fairway"
Green in Regulation – Bet refers to a player's approach shot being deemed to have come to rest on the cut piece of grass known as the "green" in the regulation number of strokes, which are to be understood as follows:
Regulation number of strokes for Par 3 holes: 1 Stroke
Regulation number of strokes for Par 4 holes: 2 Strokes
Regulation number of strokes for Par 5 holes: 3 Strokes
Water Hazard on Hole – Bet refers to a player's shot being deemed to have come to rest inside a Water Hazard or beyond the red boundary line of a Water Hazard and therefore within the Hazard.
Bunker on Hole – Bet refers to a player's shot being deemed to have come to rest inside a Sand Bunker. Should a player require to stand within a Sand Bunker to play a shot that lay outside the Sand Bunker, this will NOT be deemed to have come to rest in a Sand Bunker.
Nearest the Pin in Regulation – Bet refers to the player who hits it the closest to the Pin with their regulation stroke. Ball must come to rest on the Green to count. Should all players miss the Green in Regulation, then bets will be void.
Regulation number of strokes for Par 3 holes: 1 Stroke
Regulation number of strokes for Par 4 holes: 2 Strokes
Regulation number of strokes for Par 5 holes: 3 Strokes
"Dead heat" rules will apply on "Winner without X/named player(s) offers" should 2 or more participants share applicable positions. Bets void should the named players not take part in the competition.
For "Winning Margin" bets at least 36 holes of the tournament must be played for bets to stand.
In "Straight Forecast" offers, the selected participants must end the tournament in 1st and 2nd place in the order they have been listed. Dead-heat rules will apply in case of any ties. Both listed players must tee off at least once more after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
"Winning score" bets require all scheduled holes in the Tournament to be completed. Any reduction in number of holes will result in the voiding of the offer.
For "Hole in One during the Tournament" at least 36 holes of the tournament must be played for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined and in such case will be settled accordingly. For "Hole in One during Round X" the full round must be completed by all players for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined and in such case will be settled accordingly.
Bets referring to a specific player being the "Wire to Wire Winner" require that the listed individual is leading the Leaderboard (including any eventual ties) at the end of each and all scheduled rounds of the tournament. Any reduction in scheduled holes/rounds will render the bets void.
"Winner to Birdie/Par/Bogey the 72nd Hole" refers to the eventual winner of the Tournament's performance on their 18th Hole in Round 4. Bets void should there be any reduction in scheduled holes/rounds of the Tournament. In situations where play is by "Shotgun Start" in Round 4, bets will be made void.
"Winner to play in the Final Round Grouping" refers to whether the eventual tournament winner will be emanating from the 2-ball or 3-ball pairings that are scheduled to tee off last as per the tee times issued by the official organization.
Season Bets; Player to win on a stipulated tour schedule in a stipulated calendar year.
Player must play a minimum of 10 events on that Tour for bets to stand, otherwise they will be void.
Individual events only will count, team events do not count.
To finish Top 5, 10, 20 in individual or ALL majors in a stipulated calendar year. Dead Heat Rules will apply for tied positions.
Handball
Offers referring to individual player performances in a single match (example: Total Points Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Points), require all listed individuals to be an active participant in the applicable match for bets to stand.
All bets referring to aggregated Tournament Totals will be settled based on official statistics by the governing body. Unless otherwise stated, cumulative amounts of such bets will include eventual prolongations (e.g. Extra Time) but not Penalty Shoot Outs.
Settlement of player related bets in a specific match will be based on the result after the end of the 2nd half (Regular Time), unless otherwise stated.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X during the World Cup) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most goals during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Trotting
For major events in the Trotting calendar, Ante Post markets may be offered. For a bet to be considered an Ante Post bet, it is to be placed prior to the final declaration stage. Bets are deemed "all-in, run or not" so bets on non-runners will not be voided, nor will Tattersalls Rule 4 apply, unless specifically stated.
A Head-to-Head Bet where at least one horse completes the race is determined on the basis of the declared official result issued by the governing body.
A Head-to-Head Bet where both horses fail to get an official result is declared void.
A Head-to-Head Bet where both horses are recorded with the same official time is determined on the basis of which horse is notified in the Result as having placed ahead of the other horse; if it is impossible to determine whether one horse is ahead of the other horse on the basis of the Result, the Bet is declared void.
A Head-to-Head and/or Triple Head bet is declared void in the event that:
All participating horses fail to complete the race; and/or
None of the participating horses is awarded any prize money. 'Prize money ' is to be understood as the money scale awarded depending on the performance of the participant in the specified race. For settlement purposes, amounts awarded to participants for any other reason besides their classification (ex. participation/appearance) will not be considered as 'prize money'.
In case of misprints regarding information, such as, but not limited to, race and start numbers, race names, starting methods or distances, the bet will still be considered valid given that all listed horses take part in the same race within the same meeting.
All bets refer to the listed/race meeting. Should the race/meeting not be held/completed within the scheduled date, all bets placed after 00:00 CET of the scheduled day will be settled as void. Bets placed before 00:00 CET of the scheduled day will remain valid granted that the race/meeting is held within its scheduled year.
Ice Hockey
Team/match markets which do not refer to a specific timeframe (ex. Period 1, Regular Time, etc) will also include the outcomes emanating from any eventual Overtime and Shootouts, to decide the outcome. Any team winning during Overtime/Shootouts will only be credited as having scored one goal, regardless of the number of goals scored during the eventual prolongations.
Offers referring to individual player performances in a single match (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Goals), require all listed individuals to be an active participant (spends time on the Ice, if not mentioned by the appropriate body, we will settle based on being in the lineup) in the applicable match for bets to stand.
Settlement of player related and team markets (such as Goals, Assists, Points, Penalty Minutes, Shots on Goal, etc) will be settled based on official statistics by the governing body. Unless otherwise stated, settlement of such bets will include eventual prolongations (e.g. Over Time) but not Penalty Shoot Outs.
All NHL and NCAA 'match' offers will only be considered valid should there be less than 5 minutes of scheduled play left in the 3rd Period. Exception will be done for those the outcome of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Unless specifically stated or implied in the offer characteristics, settlement of Season bets will be based as per the classifications, definitions and tie-breaking rules as per the official website of the competition (as applicable).
Season bets, regardless whether these include outcomes obtained during Playoffs or otherwise, as well as offers referring to particular teams or player performances, will remain valid irrespective of eventual player trades, team movements or name changes during any point in the season.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Goals Scored by Player X during the Playoffs) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most points during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Player props and other stats-based offers will be settled according to the official match reports as published after the game by the governing body.
Motor Sports
This section is valid for all sports related to Motor Racing, such as: Formula One, A1 GP, CART, Indy Car, Nascar, Circuit Racing, Touring Cars, DTM, Endurance, Rally, Rally-cross, Motorcycling, Superbike.
Bets are settled according to the publication of live timing and classification as shown on TV at the time of podium presentations, or at the end of the session/race/event (as applicable). Should the information required for the settling of the offer be missing/not shown and/or incomplete, the first official information on the official site will be deemed binding, regardless of subsequent promotions, demotions, appeals and/or penalties inflicted after the termination of the session/race which the bet refers to.
Events being shortened due to weather conditions or other situations but are deemed official by the governing body will be settled accordingly, regardless of any changes which said associations might make due to the incompletion of the race.
Should an event/race/session/lap/heat be restarted from the beginning, bets will stand and will be settled according to the result issued after the restart, except for those bets the outcome of which has already been determined.
For settlement purposes, a driver/rider who has taken part in an officially-sanctioned practice or qualification session is considered to have taken part in the event, regardless of his eventual participation in the actual race.
In "Head to Head" bets all listed participants must take part in the session to which the bet refers to for bets to stand, irrespective of whether a driver manages to get an official time.
In "Outright" or "Place" bets, no refunds will apply on those participants who do not take part for any reason, for the session/event/championship to which the offer refers to.
Settlement for any offer with reference to "Race completion" will be based on official regulations as issued by the governing body.
A "Head to Head" bet where both drivers/riders fail to complete the race is determined on the basis of the most laps completed. In case the participants fail to complete the race and are recorded for the same number of laps, the bet is declared void, except in cases of Rally where at least one of the listed participants must complete the event, otherwise the bets will be declared void.
Time penalties inflicted by the governing body during the qualifying session(s) will count. Other grid demotions/promotions are disregarded.
A Race is considered to have started when the warm-up lap starts (where applicable), thus all drivers/riders taking part in the warm-up lap are deemed to have started. In case of a participant whose start is delayed, or starts the race from the pit lane, the participant is also deemed to have taken part.
Settlement of seasonal markets will take into account the classification issued exactly after the completion of the last race of the season including any decisions taken by the organizing body during the season, given that said decision is issued before the last race of the season. Any decision (even on appeal) taken after the end of the last stipulated race is deemed as irrelevant.
All bets which make reference to teams' performances will stand regardless of any driver/rider changes.
Bets will stand regardless of any schedule/location/circuit changes as far as the race/event is held within the same year/season, irrespective of any time delays, calendar order, etc., except for those bets placed after 00:00 CET of the Monday of the week for which the race/event is scheduled which will be refunded should the race/event/session that the offer refers to not be held within 7 days of the scheduled date at the time the bet was placed.
Bets referring to specific teams' performance during the race require the initially stipulated number of vehicles from each team to start the race for bets to stand, otherwise they will be declared void (e.g. in Formula 1, two cars from each team should start the race).
Settlement of bets referring to the inclusion of the "Safety Car" will not take into account those occurrences in which the actual race starts behind the "Safety Car".
Settlement of offers on the first driver/car to retire will be based on the actual lap in which the driver is considered to have withdrawn from the race. Thus if two or more drivers retire during the same lap bets will be settled in accordance with Section B, Para 5, Clause 14.
Bets on the First/Next Driver to retire during the race will include only the outcomes deriving after the official start of the race. Any retirements/withdrawals previous to the actual start of the GP (including those during the warm-up lap) will not be considered for settlement purposes.
Netball
Unless otherwise stated, settlement of bets on will be determined on the basis of the result after the so called extra (over) time.
"Margin Betting" and "Half/Time Full Time" offers are settled with the outcome at the end of the 80 minutes play.
A match has to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcome of which has been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Offers referring to individual player performances in a single match (example: Total Points Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most points), require all listed individuals to participate in at least one more play in the match, after bet acceptance, for bets to stand.
Offers referring to individual player performances over a particular period (example: Total Points Scored by Player X during the Regular Season) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of the season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Points during the Regular Season), require all listed individuals to be an active participant in at least one more match applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Pesäpallo (Finnish Baseball)
All bets on Pesäpallo are determined on the basis of the result after the first two rounds (innings). Unless otherwise stated, any scores deriving from prolongation periods (e.g. Supervuoropari) are not taken into consideration.
Rugby League
Unless otherwise stated, settlement of bets on Rugby League is determined on the basis of the result after the so called extra (over) time or Golden Point Rule, as applicable.
"Margin Betting" and "Half/Time Full Time" offers are settled with the outcome at the end of the 80 minutes play.
Certain competitions/events might have offers that are relevant to a specific period/match that can end in a draw, either at the end of the normal 80 minutes of play or even after eventual extra (over) time is played. In such cases bets are settled according to the so-called “dead-heat” rule where the payout would be calculated after the odds are divided and then multiplied by the stake, irrespective of whether the net payout is lower than the Member's stake.
Try Scorers (First/Last/Anytime/Team) – All bets include any potential extra (over) time. Any bets placed on players in the game day 17 stand regardless of the player’s participation (or lack thereof) in the match. Stakes on players not included in game day 17 will be refunded.
Unless otherwise specified, offers referring to individual player performances in a single match (example: Total Tries Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Tries), require all listed individuals to play from the start of the applicable match for bets to stand.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Tries Scored by Player X during the World Cup) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most tries during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand. Bets placed after any news which can even potentially reduce the number of fixtures any listed player is eligible for within the competition (example: injury/transfer/trade news); thus altering the odds even just theoretically in favour of any particular outcome without said odds having been adjusted to reflect the current state of the bet, will be declared void. Settlement of similar bets will be based on the result after potential over (extra) time, unless otherwise stated.
All bets stand, regardless of change of venue.
Rugby Union
Unless otherwise specified all bets referring to the match and team performances, etc. are settled in accordance with the result at the end of the 2nd half (after 80 minutes play).
Certain competitions/events might have offers that are relevant to a specific period/match that can end in a draw, either at the end of the normal 80 minutes of play or even after eventual extra (over) time is played. In such cases bets are settled according to the so-called "dead-heat" rule where the payout would be calculated after the odds are divided and then multiplied by the stake, irrespective of whether the net payout is lower than the Member's stake.
Try Scorers (First/Last/Anytime/Team) – All bets include any potential extra (over) time. Any bets placed on players in the match day squad stand regardless of the player's participation (or lack thereof) in the match. Stakes on players not included in the match day squad will be refunded. Penalty Tries will be settled on the "penalty try" outcome listed for each team. In the event of no try scored in the match no bets shall be refunded.
Unless otherwise specified, offers referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Tries Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Tries), require all listed individuals to play from the start of the applicable match for bets to stand.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Tries Scored by Player X during the World Cup) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most tries during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand. Settlement of similar bets will be based on the result after potential over (extra) time, unless otherwise stated.
All bets stand, regardless of change of venue.
Lacrosse
A two point goal counts as two goals.
"Total Goals" Refers to the Sum of the Final Score.
For player props, "Total Goals Scored by the Player" = Points - Assists.
No refunds on odds to win.
All games must go the full 60 minutes for bets to be valid.
Overtime is included for wagering purposes if there is no draw line.
Speedway
All offers will be settled based on the official result declared by the governing body at the completion of the last scheduled heat. Subsequent promotions, demotions, appeals and/or penalties inflicted after the termination of the event which the bet refers to are disregarded.
"Match" bets between two teams/riders are settled according to the official result, regardless of the number of heats completed.
"Over/Under" offers on unfinished matches/events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion, will be added as necessary depending on the number of sets which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer this will be settled as such. See examples from the tennis-section for reference.
"Handicap" offers require all scheduled heats to be completed for bets to stand except in those events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers which will be settled accordingly. See examples from the tennis-section for reference.
All "Head to Head" and "Over/Under" bets featuring the performance of one or more riders in an event/heat are considered valid given that all listed riders take part in at least one heat for bets to stand.
Bets referring to a specific heat require the specific heat to be completed and all listed participants to take part in the particular heat for bets to stand.
Surfing
All bets stand, regardless of any postponement, change of venues, etc., granted that the event is held within the official waiting period as declared by the governing body.
Matchups referring to the performance of one or more surfers are considered valid given that all listed surfers start in the listed heat/event.
Certain competitions/events might have offers that are relevant to the performance in an event where two or more listed surfers are eliminated in the same stage. In this case bets would be settled according to the so-called "dead-heat" rule where the payout would be calculated after the odds are divided and then multiplied by the stake, irrespective of whether the net payout is lower than the Member's stake. Should such provision be in place it would be listed in conjunction with the bet offer.
Swimming
Unless otherwise stated, all bets on Swimming are determined on the basis of the result after the final stage of that competition. If neither of the listed participants takes part in the final stage, all bets will be void, unless the governing body follows specific tie-breaking procedures, in which case, these will be deemed valid.
All bet offers will be settled based on the first official result being presented. However, we will settle/re-settle accordingly, any changes to the official result issued within 24 hours after the event has taken place. For such eventuality to be considered, the protest must be attributable to incidents happening exclusively during the event, such as a lane infringement or an early start in a relay race, etc. No doping cases will be considered. The result available at the end of the aforementioned 24 hours will be deemed as binding regardless of any further protests, changes to the official result, etc.
If two or more participants take part in different heats during a competition, all Head-To-Head-offers between them will be considered void, unless there is a later stage in the competition that at least one of them qualifies for.
A participant who is disqualified due to the infringement of the start procedure (false start) will be deemed to have taken part in the event.
Tennis and Racket Sports (Badminton, Jai-Alai, Squash, Padel, Pickleball & Table Tennis)
All bets will remain valid as far as the match/offer is played within the tournament framework regardless of any changes (either before or during the match), in conditions (indoor/outdoor) and/or surface types, unless other arrangements have been agreed.
"Match" bet offers are based on the general principle of tournament progress or tournament win, depending on which phase of the competition the match refers to. The player/team progressing to the next round or winning the tournament is to be considered as the winner of the bet regardless of withdrawals, disqualifications, etc. These bets require at least one set to be completed for bets to stand.
"Over/Under" and "Handicap" offers on unfinished matches the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and/or where any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion will be added as necessary depending on the number of sets which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer this will be settled as such. The following examples can be used for consideration:
Example 1 - Over/Under: A retirement occurs in a match scheduled for three sets with the score 7-6, 4-4. The offers: "Total Games Set 2 – 9.5" (or any lines lower than that amount) & "Total Games Played in the Match – 22.5" (or any lines lower than that amount) will be settled with "Over" bets as winning and "Under" bets as losing. Bets on lines higher than that will be settled as void.
Example 2 - Handicap: A retirement occurs at the start of the 3rd set in a match scheduled for 5 sets with the score at 1-1. Bets on +2.5/-2.5 Sets will be settled as winners and losers respectively. Offers on any lines lower than that amount will be settled as void.
All "Correct Score" (namely Set Betting and Game Betting), "Odd/Even", and those offers which refer to the winner of a particular period in the match (example "Which player will win the first set?" and "Set 2 – Game 6: Winner" require the relevant part of the match to be completed.
All type of offers not specified above require at least one set to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
In a Doubles match, all bets will be declared void if any of the stated players are being replaced.
Any reference to "Grand Slams" will be based on the tournaments for that particular season to which the ITF attributes said definition, irrespective of any venue, date, or any other changes.
Bets on doubles matches in the Round Robin stages of the Davis Cup Finals, Billie Jean King Cup Finals and ATP Cup will always stand, even if the score in the tie is 2-0. For all other Davis Cup, ATP Cup and Billie Jean King Cup ties, the doubles matches will be void, if the tie has already been decided.
Results acquired in a "Pro Set" will be valid only for the following offers: "Match", "Set Handicap", "Set Betting" and "Total Sets". All other types of offers will be settled as void, with the exception of offers the outcome of which is already determined. Should a match be played in a format/number of sets different than that presumed at time the market was published, we will void the applicable markets pertaining to X, Y, Z unless the necessary number of occurrences has already been achieved regardless of the change in format/number of sets.
As a general rule "tie-breaks" are always considered as 1 game only, regardless of the number of points needed to win or whatever the format of the "tie-break". The following tie-break scenarios will be settled as follows:
"Match tie-break": Normally played instead of the decisive set when both participants have won the same number of sets. For settlement purposes, this is considered as a full set as well as a game and counted accordingly. However, it will not be considered as a tie-break for the settlement of the relevant offers;
"Tiebreak at 6-6 in a set, first to 7 points": For settlement purposes, this is considered to be 1 game and counted accordingly as well as a tie-break for the settlement of the relevant offers;
"Tiebreak at 6-6 in a set, first to 10 points": For settlement purposes, this is considered to be 1 game and counted accordingly as well as a tie-break for the settlement of the relevant offers;
"Tiebreak at 12-12 in a set, first to 7 points": For settlement purposes, this is considered to be 1 game and counted accordingly as well as a tie-break for the settlement of the relevant offers;
"Tiebreak at 3-3 in a set, first to 7 points" (aka Fast 4 format): For settlement purposes, this is considered to be 1 game and counted accordingly as well as a tie-break for the settlement of the relevant offers;
"Tiebreak Tens": A match which consists solely of a tie-break with the winning participant being the one to first reach 10 points and lead by a margin of 2. This is considered both as a tie-break and as a full match for the settlement of the relevant offers.
Should any match include a tie-break format not listed above, offers will be settled according to the definitions as described by the ITF, or in absentia, the closest in principle to the examples listed above.
Win/Place and Each-Way bets referring to the Tournament Winner placed between the time of the first publication of the main draw by the governing body and the start of the competition, will be refunded should the listed participant not take any further part in the Tournament. Exception will be done for any participants still involved in the Qualifying stages as these will be considered as active participants.
Bets on season related performances (e.g. "number of Grand Slam titles won" or "to finish top 20 yes/no" will be void if the player does not play at least 5 ranking point awarding events during the season.
Volleyball
Any points tallied during the so called "Golden Set" will not count for the settlement of the offers relating to that particular match, with the exception of any bets referring to tournament progression and Tournament Totals.
Offers referring to individual player performances' in a single match (example: Total Points Scored by Player X) or confronting performances from 2 individual players during the course of a match (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most Points), require all listed individuals to be an active participant in the applicable match for bets to stand.
"Over/Under" and "Handicap" offers on unfinished matches the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and/or where any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion will be added as necessary depending on the number of sets which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer, this will be settled as such. See examples from the tennis-section for reference.
All "Correct Score" offers, "Odd/Even", and those offers which refer to the winner of particular period/timeframe in the match (example "Which team will win the 1st set?" and "Set 2 – Race to 15 points" require the relevant part of the match to be completed.
All type of offers not specified above require at least one set to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Offers referring to individual player performances' (example: Total Points Scored by Player X during the World Championship) or confronting performances from 2 individual players over a particular period/tournament/season (example: Which of Player X or Player Y will score most points during the Regular Season), require that all listed individuals must be an active participant in at least one more fixture applicable for the offer after bet acceptance for bets to stand.
Winter Sports
This section is valid for the following sports: Alpine Skiing, Biathlon, Cross Country Skiing, Freestyle, Nordic Combined, Short Track, Ski Jumping, Snowboard & Speed Skating.
Results from a competition will be deemed valid if it is declared as a valid competition for the relevant category, by the governing body for that sport. This applies in case of an event being shortened, such as only consisting of one run/jump instead of two, or an event being moved to another venue.
In cases of abandoned/uncompleted events, all those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome are deemed valid and will be settled accordingly.
All offers will be settled as void if the original/stated format of an event is completely changed, like the size of hill in Ski Jumping, style in Course Country Skiing, etc.
We reserve the right to apply Tattersalls Rule 4 in case of a non-starter in a "Group Betting" ("Best of X") offer.
Offers related to specific Winter Sports events (excluding for example bets referring to Overall classifications, Olympic, World and Continental competitions), are offered with the explicit assumption that the particular event will be the next event held in that particular sports/discipline. Should the specific event be moved for any reason whatsoever and an exactly similar event for that sports/discipline is held in the same location starting in not more than 72 hours, the bets will be valid for the next scheduled event in that sports/discipline. Thus, if for example two separate races from the same sports/discipline are scheduled for Friday and Saturday and the Friday competition is moved to Saturday or Sunday, the bets on the Friday competition will be settled in accordance with the next scheduled event, in this case Saturday's events. In cases where just 1 event is scheduled in that sports/discipline and the starting time is moved less than 72 hours, bets will remain valid and will be settled accordingly. Should no event with the same connotations be held in the 72 hour period after the initially scheduled time, bets will be settled as void.
In a "Head to Head" between two or three participants, at least one of the listed participants must complete the final run/stage/jump which the bet refers to, for bets to be considered valid. Such provision is not applicable for Cross-country Sprint events which include different elimination stages as well as Ski Jumping. In such cases, settlement will be based on the official classification irrespective of whether any of the listed participants completes the final run/stage/jump.
All bet offers will be settled based on the first official result being presented. However, we will take into account and settle/re-settle accordingly, following any changes to the official result issued within 24 hours after the event has taken place. For such eventuality to be considered, the protest must be attributable to incidents happening exclusively during the event, such as a line infringement, pushes or a false handover in a relay race, etc. No doping cases will be considered. The result available at the end of the aforementioned 24 hours will be deemed as binding regardless of any further protests, changes to the official result, etc
Other (Non Sport/Special Bets/Politics)
The conditions stated in this section refer to all offers which would not be reasonably classified under the different sports categories (Ex. TV Programs, Politics, Awards & Prizes, Beauty Contests, Entertainment and similar). Whenever applicable, and unless otherwise stated in this section or in the offer, settlement of these offers will be based on our Rules under Section B, Para 5.
Unless otherwise specified below or in conjunction with the bet offer, all bets which fall under this section are valid until a result is officially declared regardless of any delays in the announcement, extra voting rounds, etc. which would be needed for the outcome to be announced.
All open offers involving participants who withdraw/have been evicted from TV shows (either departing voluntarily or following an organiser’s decision), will be settled as lost. Should the same participant re-enter the same competition at a later date, he/she will be treated as a new contestant thus previous bets will be settled as lost.
Bets referring to the removal of a participant are only valid for the next scheduled show. Any changes to the methods of eviction, amount and/or line-up of participants eliminated during the same program, or any other factors which were not reasonably expected will result in the bets referring to "Next eviction" or "Next Elimination" to be voided.
In the event of the show terminating before an official winner is declared, bets will be settled as a tie (i.e. dead heat) between the contestants who have not been eliminated. Win/Place bets on contestants who have been already eliminated will be settled as lost.
a. Politics markets will be settled in accordance with the result as confirmed, after it was first published by the government organization responsible for holding the election, within that particular jurisdiction, on its official website/social media.
b. We reserve the right to use information collected from a consensus of recognised national broadcasters, in order to settle markets before the official result as described in Section C, Para 31, Clause 6(a) is proclaimed and confirmed. Any public concession by an opposing contender will also be considered grounds for settlement to occur. Section A, Para 6, Clause 2.
c. Changes in a declared or published official result deriving from eventual protests, disputes, sub-judice results and/or successive changes to the official result, after it has been issued/confirmed will not be considered.
Mixed Martial Arts
All offers will be settled according to the official result of the relevant governing body immediately as declared by the ring announcer at the end of the fight. No amendments made to the official result after being first announced will be taken into consideration except for those which the official organization effects to rectify clear cases of human errors by the ring announcer.
Unless clearly specified that the fights are unconfirmed, bets are only valid should the fight take place on the card/date it was announced for irrespective of any change in venue/location. Bets will be settled as void should there be any official announcement by the organizing body of a date postponement, re-scheduling to a different card or change in fighters even if said match ends up taking place as originally announced.
With the exception of the instances as detailed in Section C, Para 33, Clause 4, addition or removal of title stipulations (example: a match initially announced as a non-title match gets changed into a title match) or changes in weight classes as well as either/both of the fighters fail to make the pre-established weight, will not result in the voiding of the offers as much as the fight takes place on the card it was announced for.
If for any reason, the number of scheduled rounds in a fight is changed between the time of bet acceptance and the actual fight, offers which make specific reference to rounds, such as "Round betting", "Group of Rounds", "Over/Under", "Winning Method" and "To go the distance", or other offers which would be affected by such change, will be declared void.
For settlement purposes, in case the fight is interrupted for any reason in between rounds, e.g. retirement before the start of a round, disqualification, failure to answer the bell, the fight will be deemed to have finished at the end of the previous round.
Offers on fights declared as a "No Contest" or where neither fighter is declared as the only winner of the fight, will be settled as void, except in cases where such outcome was offered for betting purposes or for those offers the outcome of which has been decided prior to the decision and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
The following descriptions are to be considered as the applicable outcomes for the different scenarios:
"Finish": A win by KO (Knockout), TKO (Technical Knockout), DQ (Disqualification), Submission, ‘throwing of the towel’ from either fighter’s corner, any referee stoppage which declares either fighter as the only winner of the fight;
"Points/Decision”: Any win based on the judges’ scorecards;
"Unanimous decision": A decision where all judges declare the same fighter as the winner;
"Majority decision": A decision where the majority of judges declare the same fighter as the winner while the minority of the judges declare the fight as a draw;
"Split decision": A decision where the majority of judges declare a particular fighter as the winner while the minority of the judges declare the other fighter as the winner;
"Majority draw": A decision where the majority of judges declare the fight as a draw while the minority of the judges declare a particular fighter as the winner;
"Split draw": A decision where each of the judges’ scorecards declare a different outcome of the fight and no outcome prevails over the other.
A fight will only be considered as having gone "the distance" only if a points/judges’ decision is awarded after the full duration of all scheduled rounds has been completed. If a judges or referees’ decision is awarded, before the full number of scheduled rounds are completed (Technical Decision or No Contest) offers such as “Alternate Round Betting”, “Group of rounds” and “Over/under” will be declared void, unless the outcome is already determined. For settlement purposes, betting on rounds or groups of rounds is for a fighter to win by KO, TKO, disqualification or submission during that round/group of rounds. In the event of a Technical Decision before the end of the fight, all bets will be settled as a "Win by Decision".
In offers where a draw/tie is possible and odds have not been offered for such outcome, bets will be settled as void should the official result be declared as such. For settlement purposes, fights the outcome of which is declared as either a "Majority draw" or a "Split draw" are to be considered as a drawn/tied outcome and offers will be settled accordingly.
Bets referring to round/fight duration represents the actual time passed in the round/fight, as applicable, depending on the scheduled round/fight duration. For example, a bet on Over 4.5 Total Rounds will be settled as Over once two minutes and 30 seconds in the 5th Round has passed.
Settlement of statistics-based offers such as "Fighter to have most takedowns" or "Fighter to have most significant strikes" will be settled based on the results issued by the governing body or its recognized official partner for such statistics. Settlement will be based according to the definition with which the official governing body issues said statistics. In cases where both fighters are declared as having accomplished the same result and said outcome not having been available as a possible outcome for betting purposes, bets will be voided.
Markets which confront or tally different fights from the same card such as "Total KOs/TKOs on the card" or "Total matches to end by decision on the card" will indicate the number of fights required to take place on a card, or list specifically the section of the card the bet relates to. Bets will remain valid should any applicable fight be cancelled yet the number of fights on the card or the applicable specific section of it remain the same (example: re-booking, replacement fighter or undercard/preliminary matches being pushed to the main card). Should for whatever reason the listed number of fights not take place during the card or the specific section of it for which the bet refers to, bets will be settled as void.
Snooker
All bets will remain valid as far as the match/offer is played within the tournament framework regardless of any changes in schedule, etc.
"Match" bet offers are based on the general principle of tournament progress or tournament win, depending on which phase of the competition the match refers to. The player progressing to the next round or winning the tournament is to be considered the winner of the bet regardless of match duration, withdrawals, disqualifications, etc. These bets require at least one frame to be completed for bets to stand.
"Over/Under" offers on unfinished matches/events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption has occurred. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion will be added as necessary depending on the number of frames which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer this will be settled as such. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
"Handicap" offers require all scheduled frames to be completed for bets to stand except in those events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers which will be settled accordingly. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
All "Correct Score", "Odd/Even" and those offers which refer to the winner of a particular period in the match (example "E.g. Player to win the first set" or "First Player to reach X Frames") require the relevant part of the match to be completed.
All types of offers not specified above require at least one frame to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
In cases of a re-rack all bets on that specific frame will be settled as void and a new market will be opened. An exception will be done for those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the re-rack and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
All offers that refer to a "{x}+break" will be settled as yes on occurrences of the break of {x} or more inclusive. For example, the offer "100+ Break in Frame 1" will be settled as yes, if there is exactly a 100 break in frame 1.
Darts
All bets will remain valid as far as the match/offer is played within the tournament framework regardless of any changes in schedule, etc.
"Match" bet offers are based on the general principle of tournament progress or tournament win, depending on which phase of the competition the match refers to. The player progressing to the next round or winning the tournament is to be considered the winner of the bet regardless of match duration, withdrawals, disqualifications, etc, granted that the match actually starts.
"Over/Under" offers on unfinished matches/events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers, will be settled based on the result achieved until the interruption. For the calculation of these settlements, the minimum amount of occurrences which should have been needed to bring the offer to the natural conclusion will be added as necessary depending on the number of legs which the match is scheduled for. Should this calculation produce a situation where no possible alterations could affect the outcome of the offer this will be settled as such. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
"Handicap" offers require all scheduled sets to be completed for bets to stand except in those events the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption and/or any further continuance of play could not possibly produce a different outcome to said offers which will be settled accordingly. See examples from the Tennis section for reference.
All "Correct Score", "Odd/Even" and those offers which refer to the winner of a particular period in the match (example "E.g. Player to win the first set" or "First Player to reach X Sets") require the relevant part of the match to be completed.
All types of offers not specified above require at least one set to be completed for bets to stand, except for those offers the outcome of which is already determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Offers combining a number of occurrences by a specific player within a match/event (example: King of the Oche, etc), require that all connotations related to the offer bet must be fully and unquestionably complied with. Should 1 or more parts of the offer end in a tie bets will be settled as LOST.
All offers that refer to a "{x}+checkout" will be settled as yes on occurrences of the checkout of {x} or more inclusive. For example, the offer "100+Checkout – Leg 1" will be settled as yes, if there is exactly a 100 checkout in Leg 1
D. Racing
Horse Racing
1. General Horse Racing Rules
a) All conditions stated in this section refer only to Horse Racing and have priority over any other rule or condition.
b) All bets are governed by Tattersalls Rules of Betting as described on
http://www.tattersallscommittee.co.uk/
. These rules will govern the settlement of bets should anything occur that is not covered by the rules within this section.
c) Settlements will be based upon the official result issued at the time of the 'Weigh In'. Any changes after such result has been announced will not be taken into consideration. In the event of a steward enquiry in races happening in the UK, Ireland and South Africa where the initial result/finishing order is eventually amended, we will settle results based on the "first past the post" rule. Any subsequent changes will not be taken into consideration for settlement purposes with the exception of cases where any horse is disqualified due to weighing in light. In such cases, result after "Weigh In" will count. For races happening in other countries besides the aforementioned, the official result issued at the time of the 'Weigh In' (or similar local procedure) will count.
d) Any bets, with the exception of "Ante Post Betting" will be considered void should the race be abandoned or declared void. Should the race be postponed to a future day and the 'Final Declarations' stand, all bets will be deemed valid provided that the venue for said race has not been changed. In such other cases all bets will be declared void.
e) Any reference to start times published in conjunction with any bet offer, refer to the official scheduled race time in local time. Unless otherwise specified within the Horse Racing rules, all bets will stand irrespective of any eventual changes to the race start time.
f) In the event of a false start, or any other occurrence which would result in a race being re-run, the race will not be considered to have been 'under starter's orders'. In such case stakes would be refunded on selections not taking part in the re-run. Any returns on the remaining selections would be subject to Tattersalls Rule 4. The number of runners taking part in the re-run will establish the 'Place' terms. However, regular Ante Post rules apply for Ante Post bets.
g) Should a race be declared as being a "No-Race" and a re-run takes place, all bets will stand for the Horses that take part in the re-run. Prices offered for a "No-Race" will stand for the re-run race unless there is a non-runner, in which case all bets will be settled as per Tattersalls Rule 4.
h) Settlement of bets on horses which either refuse to come out of the starting stalls, or else refuse to start in a National Hunt race will be based on the pronouncement of the official starter. Should the official starter deem the horse as being a runner, bets on that horse will be settled as lost.
i) A race is considered to be 'Walkover' when only one horse takes part in the race.
j) 'Walkovers' and void races count as races but any selection involved will be treated as a non-runner.
2. Win Betting & Each Way Betting
a) A "Win" bet is a single stake on the chosen selection which will only be considered as won if the chosen horse wins the race.
b) An “Each Way” bet (aka EW) refers to a bet where the chosen selection must either Win or else place within the payout terms. The bet is divided in two parts (the “Win” part and the “Place” part) of an equal stake: thus a £1 EW bet will cost a total of £2.
c) All "Each Way" bets are governed by the Starting Price (aka S.P.) place terms. Thus place terms (1/4, 1/5 and number of places paid) will be determined by the number of horses coming 'under starter's orders' and not by the number of declared runners when the bet was placed.
d) The following are the terms for "Each Way" betting:
Handicap Races:
2-4 runners = Win only
5-7 runners = 1/4 the odds 1, 2
8-11 runners = 1/5 the odds 1, 2, 3
12-15 runners = 1/4 the odds 1, 2, 3
16 or more runners = 1/4 the odds 1, 2, 3, 4
Non Handicap Races:
2-4 runners = Win only
5-7 runners = 1/4 the odds 1, 2
8 or more runners = 1/5 the odds 1, 2, 3
e) All Each-Way Doubles, Trebles, etc., are settled win to win, place to place.
f) "Betting Without" refers to the possibility of betting on whether a particular horse will be able to achieve a specific finishing position (Win or Place) should the listed horses be excluded from the computation of the official results.
g) 'Each Way’ terms for "Betting Without" markets will be based on the number of runners who actually take part in the race after the listed horses are excluded from the total amount or runners.
h) Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions apply in case of non-runners within "Betting Without" markets.
3. Prices - Early, Board and Starting
a) It is possible to select from two (2) pricing options: the price at the time of placement or else the Starting Price (SP). The SP refers to the odds for the chosen selection at the start of the race. Should betting be available during the race, the SP will be calculated based on the last available odds for the selection. It is to be noted that SP is not available for Ante Post betting (AP).
b) Early Prices (EP) are the odds offered on the day of the event. These are usually offered between 8 and 10 am on the day of the event until 15 minutes from the start of the race. There might be cases (such as for Saturday racing and high profile meetings), where once the final declarations are known, EP are offered at different timeframes than the ones mentioned above.
c) The alternatives to SP, Board Prices (BP) or Industry Prices (IP) are normally shown around 15 minutes prior to the race.
d) Any bet, other than those placed at SP will result in the settlement being based on the price taken at the time of bet placement, as well as subject to the other rules stated in this section.
e) Stakes placed on EP and BP will be refunded in case a horse is withdrawn "not under orders". Odds on horses within the same race will be subject to Tattersalls Rule 4(c) deductions, if applicable.
f) In cases of withdrawals which result in a new market being formed. All bets taken at EP or BP prior to the new market will be subject to Tattersalls Rule 4(c) deductions, if applicable.
g) Bets are accepted in races of two (2) or more runners for named selections at the current "Board/Show Prices" as transmitted to our service by the official information service (PA),
h) Should an erroneous price be transmitted, all bets taken on outcomes with wrong odds will be settled as void.
i) In cases where to Tattersalls Rule 4 is applicable following the withdrawal of a horse, no further bets will be taken at "Board/Show Price", unless a new market has been formed.
j) Horses offered as "Price Boosts", "Knockouts" etc., will also be subject to a Rule 4 deduction should there be an applicable non-runner in the race.
k) Any reference to timeframes, price availability, etc. is to be deemed as indicative and not binding. We reserve the right to alter such timeframes, issue prices, as well as suspend availability of any race or betting option at its sole discretion.
4. Unnamed Favourite Betting
The "Unnamed Favourite" (fav) and the "Unnamed Second Favourite" (2fav) refer to selections which are determined based on the following:
a) The horse which is given in the SP at the lowest odds is to be considered as the "Unnamed Favourite".
b) Should the SP return two horses as the ones with the shortest odds the horse with the lowest race card number will be deemed as the "Unnamed Favourite".
c) Should a horse be withdrawn ‘not under orders’ but is still returned favourite as per SP, the horse will be treated as a non-runner.
d) In the event of a ‘walkover’, after the market has been displayed all bets will be settled as void.
5. Tattersalls Rule 4
a) Tattersalls Rule 4 is applicable in cases where a horse is withdrawn not coming under starters orders, or is officially deemed by the starter not to have taken part in the race.
b) Tattersalls Rule 4 deducts a set value from winning bets in order to compensate for the withdrawal of a horse in the specific race. The size of the deduction is determined by the odds (Early or Board/Show) that the horse has at the time of its withdrawal.
c) Deductions on the odds of the remaining horses are based on the following:
Decimal odds
Fractional odds
Net deductions
1,12 or lower
1/9 or shorter
90%
1.13 - 1.19
1/8 - 2/11
85%
1.20 - 1.27
1/5 - 1/4
80%
1.28 - 1.33
7/25 - 8/25
75%
1.34 - 1.44
1/3 - 11/25
70%
1.45 - 1.57
4/9 - 14/25
65%
1.58 - 1.66
4/7 - 13/20
60%
1.67 - 1.83
4/6 - 4/5
55%
1.84 - 1.99
5/6 - 49 - 50
50%
2.00 - 2.24
Evens - 31/25
45%
2.25 - 2.59
5/4 - 39/25
40%
2.60 - 2.79
8/5 - 7/4
35%
2.80 - 3.39
9/5 - 23/10
30%
3.40 - 4.19
12/5 - 3/1
25%
4.20 - 5.40
16/5 - 22/5
20%
5.50 - 6.99
9/2 - 23/4
15%
7.00 - 10.99
6/1 - 9/1
10%
11.00 and higher
10/1 and higher
No deduction
d) The tables which are referenced above include odds listed both in decimal and fractional format. In the event that the decimal options are not covered by their fractional equivalent, we reserve the right to apply the Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions based on the decimal table.
e) The application of Tattersalls Rule 4 on bets placed at EP will be based on the EP of the withdrawn horse at the time the bet was placed, irrespective of the odds at the time of the horse’s withdrawal.
f) Races which involve more than one withdrawal be subject to a maximum deduction of 90p per £1.
g) Where the total deduction on the market on which the bet was placed is 5p in the £, and only one horse has withdrawn, as a concession, the deduction will be waived. However, if two or more horses are withdrawn an accumulative Rule 4 deduction will be applied.
6. Ante Post betting
a) For a bet to be considered as an Ante Post bet (AP) it is to be placed prior to the overnight declaration stage. Usually, declaration takes place 48 hours prior to race start for Flat racing and National Hunt racing.
b) AP stakes on horses which are not participating in the race will not be refunded and Tattersalls Rule 4 does not apply, unless specifically stated.
c) Should at least one of the following occurrences happen all AP bets will be declared void:
The race is abandoned.
The race is officially declared void.
The conditions of the race are altered after bets are made (as defined under Tattersalls Rules).
A horse is balloted out under The Jockey Club Rules of Racing.
The venue or running surface is altered (example Turf to Dirt/All Weather or vice versa).
The entries of the race are reopened.
d) Aside from the eventualities stated in this section, all AP bets will be deemed valid if the race is run within 14 full days from when initially scheduled, as long as the conditions of the race remain unaltered. Such conditions include that the rescheduled race is ran on the same track, covering the same distance and that the race is not reopened for new entries. Should the rescheduled race fail to meet any of the aforementioned criteria, all AP bets will be settled as void.
e) AP bets are settled at the price and place terms applicable at the time of acceptance, should a bet be accepted at wrong odds or Place terms, we reserve the right, at our own discretion, to settle the bet as void.
7. Forecast and Tricast betting
1) Forecast & Tricast Betting – General rules
a. Forecasts are made available and accepted in races with 3 or more runners.
b. Tricasts are accepted in races where an official computer Tricast dividend is declared.
c. Should no dividend be declared, bets will be considered as a computer straight forecast on the selections chosen to finish first and second with the third being discounted.
d. Forecast bets are settled in accordance with the computer SP straight forecast returns. Should for any reason a Forecast SP return is not given, bets will be considered void.
e. Forecast bets must always be named. No bets on unnamed favourites are accepted and should such bets be accepted in error, they will be voided.
f. Bets will be voided on Forecast and Tricast bets involving a non-runner.
2) Straight Forecast
A Straight Forecast is where it is possible to bet on the exact finishing order of the first and second placed horse in a race.
3) Reverse Forecast
A Reverse Forecast is where it is possible to bet on the first and second placed horse in a race, irrespective of the finishing order. The cost of this bet is twice that of a Straight Forecast since such bet can be considered as 2 Straight Forecast bets.
4) Combination Forecast
A Combination Forecast is where it is possible to choose 3 or more selections in a particular race. For the bet to be considered as won, 2 of the selected horses must finish in first and second place, irrespective of which order.
5) Tricast
A Tricast is where it is possible to bet on the exact finishing order of the first, second and third placed horse in a race.
6) Combination Tricast
A Combination Tricast is where it is possible to bet on the first, second and third placed horse in a race, irrespective of the finishing order.
8. 'Place Only' Betting
We reserve the right, to offer a ‘Place Only’ market on certain races. Such bets would be settled in the same way as the ‘Place’ part of an “Each Way” bet.
a) Should a horse be withdrawn ‘not under orders’, all stakes on that horse will be refunded. Deductions in accordance with the Rule 4 tables below will apply. These deductions will be based on the ‘Place Only’ price at the time of the withdrawal and will apply to the ‘Place Only’ market.
b) The number of places paid will be determined by the declarations on the day of the race. Should the number of places be reduced because of a reduction in the number of runners, for the purposes of ‘Place Only’ betting the number of places paid will remain unchanged. However, should the number of runners be equal to or less than the number of places on offer, bets on this market will be declared void and stakes refunded.
c) Deductions on the odds of the remaining horses are based on the following:
Decimal odds
Fractional odds
Net deductions for 2nd placed
Net deductions for 3rd placed
Net deductions for 4th placed (or more)
1,12 or lower
1/9 or shorter
45%
30%
20%
1.13 - 1.19
1/8 - 2/11
40%
30%
20%
1.20 - 1.27
1/5 - 1/4
40%
25%
20%
1.28 - 1.33
7/25 - 8/25
35%
25%
20%
1.34 - 1.44
1/3 - 11/25
35%
25%
15%
1.45 - 1.57
4/9 - 14/25
30%
20%
15%
1.58 - 1.66
4/7 - 13/20
30%
20%
15%
1.67 - 1.83
4/6 - 4/5
25%
20%
15%
1.84 - 1.99
5/6 - 49/50
25%
15%
10%
2.00 - 2.24
Evens - 31/25
20%
15%
10%
2.25 - 2.59
5/4 - 39/25
20%
15%
10%
2.60 - 2.79
8/5 - 7/4
15%
10%
10%
2.80 - 3.39
9/5 - 23/10
15%
10%
0%
3.40 - 4.19
12/5 - 3/1
10%
10%
0%
4.20 - 5.19
16/5 - 4/1
10%
0%
0%
5.20 and higher
21/5 and higher
No deduction
No deduction
No deduction
d) The tables which are referenced above include odds listed both in decimal and fractional format. In the event that the decimal options are not covered by their fractional equivalent, we reserve the right to apply the 4 deductions based on the decimal table.
9. Special bets
1) Jockey Specials
Jockey Specials is where it possible to bet on a named jockey to ride horses which either win or place in a definite amount of races at a specific meeting, as applicable.
a. In the event that a jockey who is scheduled to ride 3 or less rides, has at least 1 non-runner, the Jockey Accumulator market will be settled as void. Such provision will be in place unless the offers could be settled irrespectively of the outcome of the race involving the non-runner. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
b. Jockey Accumulator markets on jockeys scheduled to ride at least 4 rides will remain valid unless the jockey has 2 or more non-runners. In such case bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless the offers could be settled irrespectively of the outcome of the race involving the non-runner. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
c. “Place” markets will be settled in accordance with the Place terms applicable for each race.
d. Odds on other Jockey Specials, with the exception of the ‘Jockey Accumulator’ will require the Jockey to win (or Place, as applicable) all the listed races.
e. In the event of non-runners in Jockey Specials on specific races, bets will be settled as void.
f. Jockey Specials will be based on a jockey’s booked rides only. Should a jockey get additional rides at a meeting, these will NOT be considered for the purposes of the bet.
2) Cross Card Jockey Specials
Cross Card Jockey Specials is where it possible to bet on named jockeys, both of which must ride horses which either win or place in a definite amount of races at a specific meeting, as applicable.
a. In the event that 1 or more of the meetings is not completed, bets will be settled as a void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
b. Jockey Specials rules apply.
3) Trainer Specials
Trainer Specials is where it possible to bet on a named trainer to have horses which either win or place in a definite amount of races at a specific meeting, as applicable.
a. Jockey Specials rules apply.
4) Distance betting - General rules (applicable to all distance betting)
a. Results for winning distance bets will be considered as the officially declared distance between the first and second placed horse past the post, granted that they have followed the correct course and carried the correct weight.
b. The following terminology applies in ‘Distance betting’:
"Nose" = 0.05 of a length
"Short Head" = 0.1 of a length
"Head" = 0.2 of a length
"Neck" = 0.3 of a length
‘Half a length’ = 0.5 of a length
‘Three quarters’ = 0.75 of a length
c. The maximum amount of ‘lengths’ in each race is 12 lengths for Flat Racing and 30 lengths for National Hunt Racing.
5) ‘Meeting Winning’ distance betting
a. ‘Meeting Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on the total winning distances in a specific meeting.
b. In the event of a ‘Walkover’, or should no official result be declared, (example: all horses fail to compete), the following amount of lengths will be added to the total: 5 lengths for Flat Racing and 12 lengths for National Hunt Racing.
c. Should a meeting include 1 or more races which are either abandoned or declared void, all bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
d. We, at our sole discretion, reserve the right to offer bets referring to a specific amount of meetings, on a listed day/period. Should any of the listed meetings include 1 or more races which are either abandoned or declared void, all bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
6)‘Race Winning’ Distance betting
a. ‘Race Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on the winning distance in a specific race.
b. In the event of a ‘Walkover’, or should no official result be declared, (example: all horses fail to compete), all bets on this market will be declared void.
7) ‘Horse Winning’ Distance betting
a. ‘Horse Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on a specific horse winning a listed race by a particular distance.
b. In the event of a ‘Walkover’ or the specific horse is declared a non-runner, all bets on this market will be declared void.
c. Should the chosen horse not win the race all bets on this market will be settled as lost.
8) Horse Racing combined with any other sports
a. Solely at our discretion, it might be decided to offer pre-set combinations between Horse Racing and other sports.
b. Unless otherwise specified, combinations will include a horse winning a specific race alongside a team/athlete(s) winning a specific match.
c. In the event that any of the chosen horses are non-runners, bets will be settled as void.
d. Unless specifically stated, settlement rules as described in Section B, Para 5 apply in case of abandoned/postponed sports (non Horse Racing) events.
9) TV special markets
a. All TV special markets refer only to races which are shown live on terrestrial UK TV.
b. Unless specifically stated in conjunction with the bet offer, regular Horse Racing rules apply.
10) Ante Post Specials
a. At our sole discretion a variety of markets, similar but not limited to the “Daily Specials” might be offered, based on long-term Ante Post races.
b. Unless specifically stated in conjunction with the bet offer, regular Ante Post rules apply.
11) ‘Match’ bets
a. Bets refer to which of the listed horses will have the best finishing position at the end of the race, or after a pre-defined stage.
b. All markets will be settled based on the official result.
c. Should none of the listed horses manage to finish the race, all bets on the market will be declared void.
d. In the event that at least one (1) of the listed horses is a non-runner, all bets will be declared void.
12) ‘Daily Favourites’ bets
a. The Daily Favourites refer to betting on a specified number of Favourites either to Win or Place (as applicable) at a listed meeting.
b. Markets referring to “Place” Favourites will be settled in accordance with the ‘Place’ terms of the respective race in the meeting.
c. Should the SP return more than 1 horse as the ones with the shortest odds, the horse with the lowest race card number will be deemed as the “Favourite”. In the event that the declared “Favourite” withdraws and no market is reformed, the second horse with the lowest race card number will be deemed as the “Favourite”.
d. In cases where there are 4 runners or less, the “Favourite” must win the race for “Place” purposes.
e. In the event that 1 or more races are not completed bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
13) ‘Daily Accumulator’ bets
a. The Daily Accumulators refer to betting on whether named horses/Favourites will win or place within their respective races, as applicable.
b. Place Accumulators will be settled in accordance with the ‘Place’ terms of the respective race in the meeting.
c. In the event that any of the chosen selections are non-runners, all bets will be settled as void.
10. Reserves
a. In races where Reserves are declared to replace any non-runners, we reserve the right, solely at our own discretion, to quote Early Prices for Reserve horses.
b. Odds on any Reserves which run in the race will be used to compensate against any Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions which would be applicable to non-runners.
c. There will not be any Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions on reserves which have Early Prices available and eventually become non-runners. Such provision is not applicable in cases where after the racecourse declaration stage has passed, (45 minutes before race scheduled start); a reserve takes the place of a withdrawn horse, and therefore is considered as an official runner. Following the aforementioned deadline, should the ‘reserve’ horse withdraw, Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions will apply.
11. International Racing
a. This section refers to races held outside Great Britain and Ireland. In cases where these rules are unclear and/or inconclusive, settlement will be based on the other rules present in the Horse Racing section.
b. All races are settled on the basis of the official result issued by the local Horse Racing Authority on the day of the race, including any amendments effected after eventual steward inquiries and objections. Settlement will also take into account any additional rules applied by the relevant local authority/organizing committee.
c. Should an industry Starting Price (SP) be available, bets will be settled in accordance with these prices, with the exception of bets taken at Early Prices (EP). In such cases bets will be settled at EP. In cases where no industry SP is available, bets will be settled Pari-Mutuel/Tote odds.
12. USA Racing
a. This section refers to races held in the USA. In cases where these rules are unclear and/or inconclusive, settlement will be based on the other rules present in the Horse Racing section.
b. All races are settled on the basis of the official result issued by the local Horse Racing Authority on the day of the race, including any amendments effected after eventual steward inquiries and objections. Eventual amendments to the official result, including any changes to the results made at a later date will not be considered.
c. Bets placed at SP will be settled at the industry Starting Price (SP). Bets placed at an Early Prices (EP) will be settled at the EP price taken. In cases where no industry SP is available, SP bets will be settled at the last EP price available before the race started. If no EPs were available, SP bets will be settled in accordance with the US Pari-Mutuel/Tote odds.
d. Should no Industry SPs be returned, no EP taken and/or no dividend declared by the US Pari-Mutuel/Tote, the bet will be settled as void.
e. All US racing bets will be settled according to the horse name only and coupled runners will not be considered for settlement purposes. Therefore, when multiple horses are running with the same cloth number, a bet on any such horse is considered a bet on the named selection only and will not include any other selections with the same cloth number.
f. Each Way bets will be settled using the same each way terms used for UK & Irish racing, applied to the relevant SP or EP.
g. Rule 4 will apply where necessary and deductions will be applied with the same terms applied to UK and Irish racing.
h. Bets will stand in case races are taken ‘off the turf’, and/or where races are scheduled to be run on the turf but are switched to the dirt or AW surface.
i. Forecast and Tricasts will be settled at the Industry Dividends. Should no Industry Dividend be declared, Forecast and Tricasts will be settled at the local US Pari-Mutuel/Tote dividends.
Greyhounds
1. General Greyhounds Rules
a) All conditions stated in this section refer only to Greyhounds and have priority over any other rule or condition.
b) We will normally publish odds on all events covered by BAGS (Bookmakers Afternoon Greyhound Service) we reserve the right to alter such offering by adding or removing events, irrespective of whether the races which are added/removed are covered by BAGS.
c) Settlements will be based upon the official result issued by the governing body. Any changes after such result has been announced will not be taken into consideration.
d) Any bets, with the exception of “Ante Post Betting” will be considered void should the race be abandoned or declared void.
e) Any reference to start times published in conjunction with any bet offer, refer to the official scheduled race time in local time. Unless otherwise specified within the Greyhounds rules, all bets will stand irrespective of any eventual changes to the race start time.
f) Should a race be declared as being a “No-Race” and a re-run takes place, all bets will stand for the greyhounds that take part in the re-run. Prices offered for a “No-Race” will stand for the re-run race unless there is a non-runner, in which case all bets will be settled as per Tattersalls Rule 4.
2. Win Betting & Each Way Betting
a) A “Win” bet is a single stake on the chosen selection which will only be considered as won if the chosen greyhound wins the race.
b) An “Each Way” bet (aka EW) refers to a bet where the chosen selection must either Win or else place within the payout terms. The bet is divided in two parts (the “Win” part and the “Place” part) of an equal stake. Thus a £1 EW bet will cost a total of £2.
c) All “Each Way” bets are governed by the Starting Price (aka S.P.) place terms. Thus place terms (1/4, 1/5 and number of places paid) will be determined by the number of greyhounds effectively starting the race and not by the number of declared runners when the bet was placed.
d) The following are the terms for “Each Way” betting:
2-4 runners = Win only
5-6 runners = 1/4 the odds 1, 2
e) All bets on non-finishers will be considered as losing bets.
f) Should the number of greyhounds finishing the race be inferior to the amount of place terms as listed previously, only those runners officially placed will be treated as winning selections.
g) All Each-Way Doubles, Trebles, etc., are settled win to win, place to place.
h) Each-Way bets are also accepted on Unnamed Favourites.
i) “Betting Without” refers to the possibility of betting on whether a particular greyhound will be able to achieve the highest finishing position should the listed greyhound be excluded from the computation of the official results.
j) ‘Each Way’ terms for “Betting Without” markets will be based on the number of runners who actually take part in the race after the listed greyhounds are excluded from the total amount or runners.
k) Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions apply in case of non-runners within “Betting Without” markets.
l) Should a greyhound become a non-runner after the live show has come through from the track, bets placed on that selection will be declared void. Bets on the remaining runners will be subject to a Rule 4 deduction.
3. Prices - Board and Starting
a) It is possible to select from two (2) pricing options: the price at the time of placement or else the Starting Price (SP) The SP refers to the odds for the chosen selection at the start of the race. Should betting be available during the race, the SP will be calculated based on the last available odds for the selection. It is to be noted that SP is not available for Ante Post betting (AP).
b) The alternatives to SP, Board Prices (BP) or Industry Prices (IP) are normally shown around 5 minutes prior to the race. Bets taken at BP or IP SP will result in the settlement being based on the price taken at the time of bet placement, as well as subject to the other rules stated in this section.
c) Bets are accepted in races of two (2) or more runners for named selections at the current "Board/Show Prices" as transmitted to our service by the official information service (PA),
d) Should an erroneous price be transmitted, all bets taken on outcomes with wrong odds will be settled as void.
e) Any reference to timeframes, price availability, etc. is to be deemed as indicative and not binding. We reserve the right to alter such timeframes, issue prices, as well as suspend availability of any race or betting option at its sole discretion.
4. Unnamed Favourite Betting
a) Bets are accepted on the “Unnamed Favourite” only. The “Unnamed Favourite” (fav) refers to selections which are determined based on the following:
The greyhound which is given in the SP at the lowest odds is to be considered as the “Unnamed Favourite”.
b) Should the SP return two greyhounds as the ones with the lowest odds the greyhound with the lowest trap number will be deemed as the “Unnamed Favourite”.
c) Unless specified, should a track hold more than 1 meeting on the same day, the bet will refer for the next meeting to be ran after the bet is accepted.
5. Tattersalls Rule 4
a) Tattersalls Rule 4 is applicable in cases where a greyhound is either withdrawn, or is officially deemed by the starter, not to have taken part in the race.
b) Tattersalls Rule 4 deducts a set value from winning bets in order to compensate for the withdrawal of a horse in the specific race. The size of the deduction is determined by the odds (Early or Board/Show) that the horse has at the time of its withdrawal.
c) Deductions on the odds of the remaining greyhounds are based on the following:
Decimal odds
Fractional odds
Net deductions
1,12 or lower
1/9 or shorter
90%
1.13 - 1.19
1/8 - 2/11
85%
1.20 - 1.27
1/5 - 1/4
80%
1.28 - 1.33
7/25 - 8/25
75%
1.34 - 1.44
1/3 - 11/25
70%
1.45 - 1.57
4/9 - 14/25
65%
1.58 - 1.66
4/7 - 13/20
60%
1.67 - 1.83
4/6 - 4/5
55%
1.84 - 1.99
5/6 - 49/50
50%
2.00 - 2.24
Evens - 31/25
45%
2.25 - 2.59
5/4 - 39/25
40%
2.60 - 2.79
8/5 - 7/4
35%
2.80 - 3.39
9/5 - 23/10
30%
3.40 - 4.19
12/5 - 3/1
25%
4.20 - 5.40
16/5 - 22/5
20%
5.50 - 6.99
9/2 - 23/4
15%
7.00 - 10.99
6/1 - 9/1
10%
11.00 and higher
10/1 and higher
No deduction
d) The tables which are referenced above include odds listed both in decimal and fractional format. In the event that the decimal options are not covered by their fractional equivalent, we reserve the right to apply the Tattersalls Rule 4 deductions based on the decimal table.
e) Races which involve more than one withdrawal be subject to a maximum deduction of 90p per £1.
6. Ante Post betting
a) For a bet to be considered as an Ante Post bet (AP) it is to be placed prior to the Final Declarations being known for the race.
b) AP stakes on greyhounds which are not participating in the race will not be refunded and Tattersalls Rule 4 does not apply, unless specifically stated.
c) Should at least one of the following occurrences happen all AP bets will be declared void:
The race is abandoned;
The race is officially declared void;
The conditions of the race are altered after bets are made (as defined under Tattersalls Rules).
d) Aside from the eventualities stated above, all AP bets will be deemed valid as much as the race to which the bet refers to is ran within 14 full days from when initially scheduled, unless other arrangements have been agreed.
e) AP bets are settled at the price and place terms applicable at the time of acceptance. Should a bet be accepted at wrong odds or Place terms, we reserve the right, at our own discretion, to settle the bet as void.
7. Forecast and Tricast betting
1) Forecast & Tricast Betting – General rules
a. Forecasts are made available and accepted in races with 3 or more runners. Any bets taken on races which contain fewer runners will be settled as void.
b. Tricasts are accepted in races where an official computer Tricast dividend is declared.
c. Should no dividend be declared, bets will be considered as a computer straight forecast on the selections chosen to finish first and second with the third being discounted.
d. Forecast bets are settled in accordance with the computer SP straight forecast returns. Should for any reason a Forecast SP return is not given, bets will be considered void.
e. Forecast bets must always be named. No bets on unnamed favourites are accepted and should such bets be accepted by mistake, they will be voided.
f. Stakes Bets will be voided on Forecast and Tricast bets involving a non-runner.
2) Straight Forecast
A Straight Forecast is where it is possible to bet on the exact finishing order of the first and second placed greyhound in a race.
3) Reverse Forecast
A Reverse Forecast is where it is possible to bet on the first and second placed greyhound in a race, irrespective of the finishing order. The cost of this bet is twice that of a Straight Forecast since such bet can be considered as 2 Straight Forecast bets.
4) Combination Forecast
A Combination Forecast is where it is possible to choose 3 or more selections in a particular race. For the bet to be considered as won, 2 of the selected greyhounds must finish in first and second place, irrespective of which order.
5) Tricast
A Tricast is where it is possible to bet on the exact finishing order of the first, second and third placed greyhound in a race.
6) Combination Tricast
A Combination Tricast is where it is possible to bet on the first, second and third placed greyhound in a race, irrespective of the finishing order.
8. Distance betting
1) General rules (applicable to all distance betting)
a. Results for winning distance bets will be considered as the officially declared distance between the first and second placed greyhound past the post that have completed the race.
b. The following terminology applies in ‘Distance betting’:
"Nose" = 0.05 of a length
"Short Head" = 0.1 of a length
"Head" = 0.2 of a length
"Neck" = 0.3 of a length
‘Half a length’ = 0.5 of a length
‘Three quarters’ = 0.75 of a length
c. The maximum amount of ‘lengths’ in each race is 12 lengths.
2) 'Meeting Winning’ distance betting
a. ‘Meeting Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on the total winning distances in a specific meeting.
b. Should a meeting include 1 or more races which are either abandoned or declared void, all bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
c. We, at our sole discretion, reserve the right to offer bets referring to a specific amount of meetings on a listed day/period. Should any of the listed meetings include 1 or more races which are either abandoned or declared void, all bets on this market will be declared void. Such provision will be in place unless all offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, make it possible to settle such markets. In this case bets will be settled according to the decided outcome.
3) ‘Race Winning’ Distance betting
a. ‘Race Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on the winning distance in a specific race.
b. In the event that no official result is declared, all bets on this market will be declared void.
4) ‘Greyhound Winning’ Distance betting
a. ‘Greyhound Winning’ distance betting is where it possible to bet on a specific greyhound winning a listed race by a particular distance.
b. In the event that no official result is declared, all bets on this market will be declared void.
c. Should the chosen greyhound not win the race all bets on this market will be settled as lost.
9. Trap Challenge/Specials
a. "Trap Challenge" is where it is possible to bet on which trap will have most winning greyhounds at a listed meeting and/or a specified number of races.
b. All bets referring to "Trap Challenge" stand irrespective of vacant traps, 'Reserves' or void races granted that at least half of the specified races have been completed and their result has been issued.
c. For "Trap Challenge" settlement, should two or more greyhounds be deemed the winners of a race, all greyhounds in 1st place (and their respective Traps) will be regarded as having won the specified race.
d. Should two or more Traps share finishing positions, the settlement will be based on the so-called "Dead Heat rule" as per the definition in Section B, Para 5.14.
e. Bets referring to the Racing Post Greyhound TV (RPGTV) Flying Four Selections will be declared void should any of the races involved are settled as void, unless the result has already been determined. Any "dead-heat" for first place will also be considered as winner.
eSports
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Sections 1 - Conditions of agreement
A. Introduction
B. General Result Settlement rules
Sections 2 - Genre/Game-specific Rules
A. FPS
B. MOBA
C. Fighting games
D. Battle Royal
E. RTS
F. Card Games
G. FIFA & Rocket League
H. NBA 2K
A. Introduction
We reserve the right to include and treat as eSports offers on events related to games/genres not listed in the subsequent rules which reasonably fit the said description. Previous or future iterations of games/genre forming part of the same series, will be treated as per the rules related to that particular game/genre as present in these Sportsbook Rules, regardless of any different numbering and/or denomination. Should it be the case that a game, genre, event and/or offer related to it is not specifically listed in these Sportsbook Rules, settlement of such offers will be based on the general principles established in the Sportsbook Rules.
When placing a bet with us, the Member is agreeing that they have read, understood and will be adhering to the Sportsbook Rules present in this section as well as the other Terms and Conditions governing the usage of the Website
Unless sspecifically stated in this section, the rules present in our Terms and Conditions and Sportsbook Rules apply. In the event of ambiguity, priority will be set in the following order:
i. Rules and conditions published in conjunction with an offer and/or campaign;
ii. eSports Game-specific rules (if applicable);
iii. eSports Genre-specific rules;
iv. eSports General Result Settlement rules;
v. Our Terms and Conditions.
Should none of the above provide an adequate resolution, we reserve the right, according to our own discretion, to settle offers on an individual basis on the basis of equity, attaining itself to generally accepted betting norms, customs and definition
B. General Result Settlement rules
When settling results, we will do our utmost to attain itself to information obtained first hand (during or exactly after the event has been concluded) from the organizing association through the game broadcast and any relevant counters it might display, the game API and the official website. Should this information be conflictual, disputed and or omitted from first hand viewing as well as official sources and/or there is an obvious error in the information included in the sources above, the settlement of the bet offer will be based on other public sources.
Settlement of bets will not include any changes deriving from and/or attributable to, but not limited to: disqualifications, penalisations, protests, sub-judice results and/or successive changes to the official result after the event has been completed and a result has been announced, even preliminarily. For bets referring to competitions which span over more than 1 round/stage (E.g.: Tournament Bets), only amendments effecting bets which settlement has not been decided yet will be taken into consideration. The following example is being provided as a general guideline of how such bets would be treated in case of comparable situations: A bet on a team to reach the semi-finals of a tournament will be considered as having been attained once the organizing association deems it as such, even if the same team is disqualified from the tournament at a later stage for any reason whatsoever.
Whilst all systematic precautions have been put in place in order to represent the most faithful rendition of the event as scheduled by the governing association, any reference to the order in which the participants are shown, venues, etc, is to be deemed for information purposes only. Switching of home/away participants as well as previously announced venues, will not be deemed as valid grounds for cancellation of bets placed.
Before or during an event/match, we may decide to show current and past scores, counters and other statistics related to the offer. It is to be understood that we provide such data for information purposes only and does not acknowledge or accept any liability whatsoever for the accuracy of such data. All data presented in this regard must be treated as unofficial and any inaccuracy will not be deemed as valid grounds for the cancellation of bets placed.
Should the name of any participant/event/game be misspelled and/or has changed, bets will remain valid granted that it is reasonably clear and can be ascertained through reputable sources, that the object that the bet has been placed upon, is the same as the participant/event/game intended.
The deadline (cut-off time) shown on the website is to be treated for information purposes only. We reserve the right, at our own discretion, to suspend, partially or completely, the betting activity at any time where it deems necessary.
We reserve the right, solely at our own discretion, to void bets should any of the following situations arise:
i. we experience lags in receiving data/image streams from any of its sources/providers resulting in us presenting odds not reflecting the current state of the bet;
ii. it is reasonably obvious that bets have been placed from accounts which have access to data/image streams not available at that time to us;
iii. bets have been placed after any participant has gained an advantage enough to alter the odds of any offer, even just theoretically, without said odds having been adjusted to reflect the current state of the bet.
Should a match start at a different time than that listed on the website this will not be deemed as valid grounds for cancellation of the bets, granted that the exact same match is the next match taking place for both teams within the same tournament and is valid for the round/stage initially intended for.
Unless specifically stated, if the organising association includes any necessary extra rounds/overtime, qualifying match/es or series of matches in order to determine any classification and/or match outcome, we will take into account the results and outcomes deriving from the added matches/rounds/overtime for settlement purposes of bets referring to said match/classification.
All bet offers related to matches, or parts thereof, which do not take place at all or are awarded a result through a walk-over decision will be declared void. For settlement purposes action within a match (or part thereof) is considered to have occurred as to either when the game clock has started or whenever a participant performs an in-game action related to the match (or part thereof), whichever happens first.
Offers related to matches/or parts thereof which get abandoned for whatever reason and no result is declared by the official organization within 36 hours from the actual match start, will have the stakes refunded on those bet offers whose result has not yet been determined. All bet offers that have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, will be settled according to the decided outcome.
For all Match odds, Series Outcome and Team to go Through offers, the first official decision on the outcome of the offer issued by the governing association within 36 hours of match completion/abandonment will be the deciding factor for the settlement of bets, including but not limited to any decisions involving disqualifications, withdrawals, concessions, etc., which will be taken into account for settlement purposes. In cases where the offer ends in a drawn outcome, with said outcome not having been available as a possible outcome for betting purposes, stakes will be refunded.
Should it be decided that an abandoned fixture (or part thereof) is to be continued from the within 36 hours of the original start time, all bets placed on the initial match will stand and will be settled through the outcomes deriving from the continued play.
Should it be decided that an abandoned fixture (or part thereof) is restarted from the beginning within 36 hours of the original start time, all bets placed on the initial match which could not be settled through the outcomes deriving from the play prior to abandonment, will be declared void.
Should it be the case that either participant is involved in a match from the same tournament with a different opponent between the time of the abandonment and the continuation of the initial match, all pending bets on the initial match, will be settled as void regardless of the outcomes obtained during the continuation of the match.
Offers referring to Tournament outcomes and or matches/events scheduled over a 2 or more days-span, will remain valid granted that said event is considered completed and an official result is announced by the official organization within the specified year, regardless of the current/future participation (or lack thereof) of any listed and/or previously announced participant, unless otherwise stated.
In cases of matches which have not been completed before their natural conclusion, and when a result is issued through a decision by the association not more than 36 hours from the actual event’s start without play having continued following the abandonment, we will use the issued decision as the official result for the offers detailing the outcome of the match and/or tournament progress (E.g. Match odds and Participant to reach next round) granted that the issued decision does not change the outcome of the said bet offers at the time of the abandonment. In that case the stakes will be refunded. (E.g. Team A leading 2 Maps to nil in a best of 5 Maps match and Team B concedes: Association declares Team A as winner of the match = bet stands. Meanwhile if the same best of 5 Maps match was abandoned with the score 1-1 and the Association declares either team as the winner, the bet will be considered as void). All other offers will be declared void except for those the outcomes of which have been decided prior to the abandonment and could not possibly be changed regardless of future events, which will be settled according to the decided outcome.
Settlement of bet offers linked to counters (E.g. Total Kills) and any other offers related to specific terminology will be decided according to the definition with which the official governing body issues said statistics. Unless backed by un-contradictory evidence, we will not acknowledge any complaints which derive from a personal interpretation of such terms.
When placing "Outright" or "Place" bets, stakes will be refunded on participants/outcomes that are not participating or withdraw from an event prior to the beginning of the entire event (including qualifying events), unless otherwise stated. We reserve the right, at our own discretion, to apply Tattersalls Rule 4, as explained in Section B, Para 6, on any competition and this will be stated in correlation to the bet offer and/or the relevant Sport-specific rule (available upon request).
Offers referring to a single participant’s performance in a specific event/timeframe (such as Tournament Progress of Team X) require the listed participant to play an active part at least once in a subsequent stage of the applicable event/timeframe after the bet has been placed and/or accepted.
No refunds of bets will apply, even if the winning outcome of a match/event is a participant/outcome that has not been listed for betting purposes. On all bet offers the Member has the possibility to ask for a price on a non-listed participant/outcome. We reserve the right, at our own discretion, to decline such requests.
Offers which confront against each other the performances of two or more participants over a specified timeframe/competition will only be settled based on the result of the listed participants, disregarding all other participants in the same competition/event.
In case a participant is disqualified/withheld/banned from taking part in a subsequent part/phase of an event/competition for any reason whatsoever, as well as in case of voluntary withdrawals, the disqualification will be considered to have taken place at the time of the official announcement. No alterations will be made to previous results, regardless of any modifications due to said actions.
In an "Outright" or "Place" bet, should two or more participants be considered to have obtained the same result and the organizing association does not distinguish in their classification the "Dead Heat rule" as specified in Sportsbook Rules Section B, Para 5, Clause 14 applies.
We will refund stakes on offers comparing the achievements/performances of two participants within a specified timeframe (E.g. Tournament Best Finishing Position, Match Winner, Winner of Map X] should any of the following circumstances apply:
i. No odds were offered on a ‘draw’ outcome and no tie-breaking procedures/overtime/extra rounds are used by the organizing association to result a match/offer or classify participants that obtained the same result;
ii. Any of the listed participants does not play any further part in any subsequent stage of the related event/part thereof after the bet has been placed and/or accepted;
iii. None of the listed participants is included in the applicable classification;
iv. None of the listed participants is deemed to have achieved the specified requirement after the bet has been placed and/or accepted and no odds for such outcome has been offered.
Offers comparing the achievements/performances of three participants will be treated as detailed in above clause, with the exception that should two or more participants share the applicable finishing position the "Dead Heat rule" as specified in Sportsbook Rules Section B, Para 5, Clause 14 applies.
"Outright" and "Place" bets rules apply on offers comparing the achievements/performances of four or more participants, with the exception of those offers specifically listed as "Group Betting". In such cases, stakes will be refunded should at least one of the listed participants not be actively involved anymore for whatever reason after the bet has been placed and/or accepted.
Unless the outcome of the offer has already been determined before any change is announced, bets referring to a race to a particular happening/totals of a particular occurrence (E.g. First participant to win X rounds, Over/Under Maps played) or the margins/difference of completed occurrence between participants (E.g. Map Handicap, Exact Map score in the match) will be settled as void in case the match format is completely changed in a way that would alter the counter of such occurrences and their respective odds, including but not limited to cases where the number of scheduled Maps is changed from a previously announced odd number of scheduled Maps (E.g. Best of 1/3/5) to an even number of scheduled Maps (E.g. Best of 2/4/6) and vice-versa. Bets will stand and will be settled accordingly for those offers where the announced changed is not relevant (E.g. Match odds will remain valid if the number of scheduled Maps is changed from the previously announced 3 Maps to 5 Maps), or the outcome of the offer has already been determined before any change is announced. The following example is being provided as a general guideline of how such bets would be treated in case of comparable situations: A bet on "To win 1st Map" will remain valid if a match is changed from 3 to 5 Maps but an Over/Under bet on Total Maps in the Match would be settled as void in a similar scenario.
Should we erroneously offer odds and lines based on a different number of Maps/Games/Rounds from the correctly scheduled number of said instances, settlement of offers referring to a race to a particular happening/totals of a particular occurrence (E.g. First participant to win X rounds, Over/Under Maps played) or the margins/difference of completed occurrence between participants (E.g. Map Handicap, Exact Map score in the match) will be settled as void in case the match format is completely different in a way that would alter the counter of such occurrences and their respective odds, including but not limited to cases where the number of scheduled Maps is calculated on an odd number of scheduled Maps (E.g. Best of 1/3/5) when the match is scheduled for an even number of Maps (E.g. Best of 2/4/6) and vice-versa. Bets will stand and will be settled accordingly for those offers where the discrepancy is not relevant (E.g. Match odds will remain valid if the number of scheduled Maps quoted is 3 instead of the stipulated 5 Maps), or the outcome of the offer has already been determined before any change is announced. The following example is being provided as a general guideline of how such bets would be treated in case of comparable situations: A bet on "To win 1st Map" will remain valid if a match is listed as 3 instead of 5 Maps but an Over/Under bet on Total Maps in the Match would be settled as void in a similar scenario.
During specific events we might decide, solely at our own discretion, to offer for betting purposes a reduced selection of participants which could include betting options such as "Any Other", "The Field", or similar. This option includes all unlisted participants except for the ones mentioned specifically as available. We reserve the right to list/specify more participants at a later stage. Should these newly listed participants be the winning outcome, they will be considered as having been unlisted until the time they have actually been introduced to the list and settled accordingly.
Offers that make a specific reference to a participant’s performance in a particular event/timeframe (e.g. Team X vs The Field or Winner without Team X) are to be considered void if the mentioned participants fail to play an active part at least once in a subsequent stage of the applicable event/timeframe after the bet has been placed and/or accepted.
Should a match start with a different number of players than that encompassed in the event regulations (E.g.: Either team starts a match with only 4 players instead of the scheduled 5 players), all bets will be determined as void. In case either team loses momentarily and/or permanently from the match any number of players, after the match has started with the stipulated number of participants as per the event regulation, bets will remain valid.
Bets on matches/events featuring participants which use a different/wrong nickname or using a so-called "smurf account" will stand, granted that it does not become reasonably obvious that the participant using that particular nickname is not the one intended. In such cases bets will be settled as void.
Bets on a team are to be considered valid regardless of the individuals used by said team as participants. Should the organizing association deem it permissible for a team to play with a stand-in participant or replacement player, all bets will stand granted that an official result is issued.
Any form of a qualification ahead of the main tournament (where applicable) is considered to be a valid part of that competition. Thus any participant who is eliminated at qualification stage will be considered losing to anyone that is pre-qualified or is successful in the qualification stage.
In the case of bets where there is reference to timeframes, they should be interpreted in the following way: "within the first 30 minutes" will include anything happening until 0 hours 29 minutes and 59 seconds; "between 10 to 20 minutes" will include anything happening from 10 minutes and 0 seconds until 19 minutes and 59 seconds.
Any bets referring to duration represent the actual time passed in the map/round/event, as applicable. For example, a bet on Over 30.5 minutes in a Map will be settled as Over once 30 minutes and a half in the specified map have passed.
Any reference to "Winner" and/or "Upper" bracket will remain valid regardless of whether Maps and/or any other advantages are awarded via the event rules to any participant.
Advantages awarded via event structure will be considered for settlement purposes, unless otherwise specified. Nonetheless, any reference to specific indexes of Maps, Games, etc as presented on site is always to be considered as relevant to the phase of the match being actually played. Example: in a best of 3 Maps match where Team A starts with a 1 Map advantage, any Map 1 related offers will actually refer to the outcomes emanating from the second Map of the match, ie. the first Map to be actually played.
2. Genre/Game-specific Rules
A. FPS
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of an FPS (First Person Shooter) genre. These include, but are not limited to Call of Duty, CS:GO, Overwatch, Quake, Valorant and Rainbow Six. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. Should overtime/extra Maps/extra rounds be required to decide the Match Outcome (or any part of it), and unless otherwise stated within the offer, the outcomes deriving from added play will be taken into account for settlement purposes.
This however does not apply to Correct Score offers.
2. For Match odds, Series Outcome, Total Maps and Map Handicaps, the first scheduled Map must start for bets to stand.
The exception is for any Maps awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" and/or "Upper" bracket.
In such cases, said Maps will be taken into consideration for settlement purposes.
3. For Total Maps, Map handicap, Correct Score, Duration, Map X, First X/First to X, Ace, Kills/Kill-streak and Player Kills, all parts of the map/scheduled maps must be completed for bets to stand. Should an event be abandoned before natural completion, those bets on over/unders on Total Maps and on Match Handicaps will be normally settled if a result fulfilling those bets offers has been reached, otherwise they will be declared void.
4. For Correct Score, all regularly scheduled Maps must be completed for bets to stand.
5. For Duration, settlement of bets referring to duration will also include any time required to complete any Overtime/extra Maps needed to complete the match (or part thereof), to which the offer refers to.
Any Map awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" and/or "Upper" bracket will be considered as "0" (zero) minutes for settlement purposes.
6. For Map X, the listed Map must be completed for bets to stand.
7. For First X/First to X, the bet offer refers to which of the participants is the first to be credited as having accomplished/reached the listed amount of a predefined occurrence. Unless a drawn outcome (aka neither team) has been offered, should neither of the participants reach the listed amount, stakes will be refunded.
8. For Ace, the bet offer refers to whether a single participant is credited with having on its own killed the whole opposing team at any round in the match, or part thereof, as specified in the offer.
9. For Player Kills, bet offers linked to counters (E.g. Total Kills) and any other offers related to specific terminology will be decided according to the definition with which the official governing body issues said statistics. Unless backed by un-contradictory evidence, we will not resolve any complaints which derive from a personal interpretation of such terms.
CS:GO/Valorant
10. For Round Handicap and Total Rounds in CS:GO, all scheduled Rounds must be completed for bets to stand.
Should the match be abandoned before its natural completion, (regardless of any eventual decision by the governing association), bets will be settled as void, unless the Over/Under or Round Handicap line upon which the bet has been placed, has already been surpassed at the time of the match abandonment.
In that case, bets will be settled according to the outcomes obtained prior to the match abandonment.
11. For CS:GO Total Rounds, Any Map awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket will be considered as "0" (zero) rounds for settlement purposes.
12. For Round X offers in CS:GO, the listed round must be completed for bets to stand.
13. For CS:GO Kills offers, settlement will include any kills happening after a bomb explodes or is defused between rounds.
B. MOBA
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of a MOBA (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena) genre. These include, but are not limited to DOTA 2, King of Glory, League of Legends, Wild Rift, Mobile Legends, Smite and Vainglory. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. For Match odds, Series Outcome, Total Maps and Map Handicaps, the first scheduled Map must start for bets to stand.
The exception is for any Maps awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" and/or "Upper" bracket.
In such cases, said Maps will be taken into consideration for settlement purposes.
2. For Total Maps, Map handicap, Correct Score and Map X offers, all parts of the map/scheduled maps must be completed for bets to stand. Should an event be abandoned before natural completion, those bets on over/unders on Total Maps and on Match Handicaps will be normally settled if a result fulfilling those bets offers has been reached, otherwise they will be declared void.
3. For Duration, First X/First to X and Kills/Kill-streak offers, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to, must be completed for bets to stand, unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play, and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
4. Any Map awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket will be considered as "0" (zero) minutes for settlement purposes for Duration offers.
5. First X/First to X offers, refer to which of the participants is the first to be credited as having accomplished/reached the listed amount of a predefined occurrence.
Unless a drawn outcome (aka neither team) has been offered, should neither of the participants reach the listed amount, stakes will be refunded.
6. Kills/Kill-streak offers, all bets related to Kills and/or Kill-streak will only take into account kills inflicted by opposing participants, as applicable.
Kills inflicted by anything not controlled by the opposing participants will not count for settlement purposes.
7. Game occurrences, items and NPCs: For settlement purposes, the offers related to the following items, game occurrences and NPCs require all parts of the match to which the offer refers to, to be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Objectives
Reaching the level capReaching the level cap
All bets related to objectives refer only to the map-specific objectives. Winning the actual map will not be considered as an objective for settlement purposes.
Unless a drawn outcome (aka neither team) has been offered, should neither of the participants reach the listed amount, stakes will be refunded.
We reserve the right to include alongside the above, other game occurrences, items and NPCs not listed above, provided they reasonably fit the same categories.
DOTA 2 + League of Legends (LoL)
8. For Rampage/Ultra-Kill, Ace, Assists and Buildings offers, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to, must be completed for bets to stand, unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play, and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
9. All events related to Rampage/Ultra-Kill offers will only be considered as having happened should they be announced in the match.(or the part of it, to which the bet refers to) via the on-screen banner.
10. League of Legends Ace offers, refer to whether a single participant is credited with killing the last living champion of the opposing team.
11. For Assists offers, any Map awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket will be considered as "0" (zero) assists for settlement purposes.
12. For Building offers in DOTA 2, the following are classified as "Buildings" in the game: Barracks, Shrines and Towers. "Denied" destruction of any of the aforementioned buildings will also be considered for settlement purposes.
For Building offers in League of Legends, the following are classified as "Buildings" in the game: Turrets and Inhibitors, and destruction of said buildings will always be considered as having been inflicted by the opponents.
13. For settlement purposes, the offers related to the following items, game occurrences and NPCs require all parts of the match to which the offer refers to, to be completed for bets to stand, unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
DOTA 2:
Aegis
Buyback
Courier
Divine Rapier
Mega-creeps
Reaching the level cap
Roshans
Towers
Barracks
League of Legends:
Barons
Dragons
Reaching the level cap
Rift Herald
Turrets
Inhibitors
We reserve the right to include alongside the above, other game occurrences, items and NPCs not listed above, provided they reasonably fit the same categories.
C. Fighting Games
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of a fighting game genre. These include, but are not limited to Dragonball, Street Fighter, Super Smash Bros and Tekken. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. For Match odds, Series Outcome,Total Games and Game Handicaps, the first scheduled game must start for bets to stand.
The exception is for any games awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" and/or "Upper" bracket.
In such cases, those games will be included for settlement purposes.
2. For Total Games, Games handicap, Correct Score and Game X/Round X, all parts of the scheduled games must be completed for bets to stand. Should an event be abandoned before natural completion, those bets on over/unders on Total Games and on Game Handicaps will be normally settled if a result fulfilling those bets offers has been reached, otherwise they will be declared void.
3. For Duration and Total Rounds, All parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Any Game/Rounds awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket, will be considered as "0" (zero) rounds for settlement purposes.
4. For Total Rounds and Round Handicap, All scheduled Rounds must be completed for bets to stand. In case the match is abandoned before its natural completion and regardless of any eventual decision by the governing association, bets will be settled as void unless the Over/Under line upon which the bet has been placed has been surpassed already at the time of the match abandonment. Should that be the case, bets will be settled according to the outcomes obtained prior to the time of abandonment.
D. Battle Royale
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of a Battle Royale genre. These include, but are not limited to PUBG and Fortnite. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. For Match Winner settlement purposes, the last man/duo/squad standing will be considered the Match Winner.
In Series Outcome, the man/duo/squad who have accumulated most points during the series matches will be considered as the series winner.
Settlement will also include any extra Maps, 1 vs 1 and/or any additional play, should the governing association use a tiebreaker.
Should after any additional tiebreaker, the offer ends in a drawn outcome, with the draw not having been offered for betting, stakes will be refunded.
2. For Duration, Kills/Eliminations and First X/First to X, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
For First X/First to X, the offer refers to which of the participants is the first to be credited as having accomplished/reached the listed amount of a predefined occurrence.
Unless a drawn outcome (aka neither team) has been offered, should neither of the participants reach the listed amount, stakes will be refunded.
3. For Kills and Eliminations, only kills/eliminations inflicted or controlled by opposing particpants will count for bet settlement.
Kills/eliminations happening in the "red zone" will not count for settlement purposes, whilst kills inflicted by any vehicle, will be attributed to the participant who was using the said vehicle.
E. RTS
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of a RTS (Real Time Strategy) genre. These include, but are not limited to Starcraft 2 and Warcraft. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. For Match odds, Series Outcome, Total Maps and Map Handicaps, the first scheduled map must start for bets to stand.
The exception is for any maps awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" and/or "Upper" bracket.
In such cases, those maps will be included for settlement purposes.
2. Series Outcome refers to the aggregate result deriving from any combination of consecutive matches/series valid for the same round/stage played between the same participants within the same tournament.
3. Should any Map be replayed due to a stalemate, the result from the initial Map will be discarded and the result from the replayed Map will count for settlement purposes.
For Total Maps, any Map which is replayed due to a stalemate will count as 1 Map only.
4. For Total Maps and Maps Handicap, all scheduled Maps must be completed for bets to stand. If the match is abandoned before its natural completion and regardless of any eventual decision by the governing association, bets will be settled as void unless the Over/Under line upon which the bet has been placed has been surpassed already at the time of the match abandonment. In that case, bets will be settled according to the outcomes obtained prior to the time of the match abandonment.
5. For Correct Score, Duration and Map X, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand, unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play, and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
For Duration, any Map awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket will be considered as "0" (zero) minutes for settlement purposes.
For Map X, the listed Map must be completed for bets to stand.
6. First X/First to X refers to which of the participants is the first to be credited as having accomplished/reached the listed amount of a predefined occurrence.
Unless a drawn outcome (aka neither team) has been offered, should neither of the participants reach the listed amount, stakes will be refunded.
F. Card Games
The following rules apply to any games which are categorized as being of a card game genre. These include, but are not limited to Artifact, Hearthstone and Magic: The Gathering. In cases where rules specific to any game which is also generally considered as forming part of the same genre are separately listed, these will complement, and supersede (if applicable), the genre-specific rules. We reserve the right to apply the settlement rules of this genre to any games not listed above which are generally acknowledged as such.
1. For Match Odds and Games Handicap, should any Game be replayed due to a draw, the result from the initial Game will be discarded and the result from the replayed Game will count for settlement purposes.
For Total Games, any game which is replayed due to a draw will count as 1 game only.
2. For Total Games and Games Handicap, the first scheduled Game must start for bets to stand, with the exception of any Games awarded via the event rules to participants originating from the so-called "Winners" bracket. In such cases, said Games will be taken into consideration for settlement purposes.
All scheduled Games must be completed for bets to stand. In case the match is abandoned before its natural completion and regardless of any eventual decision by the governing association, bets will be settled as void unless the Over/Under line upon which the bet has been placed has been surpassed already at the time of the match abandonment. Should that be the case, bets will be settled according to the outcomes obtained until the time of the match abandonment.
3. In Game X, the listed Game must be completed for bets to stand.
G. FIFA and Rocket League
FIFA:
1. For Match Odds, Total Goals and Game Handicap, results will be settled based on the outcomes achieved during Regular Time.
Unless otherwise stated within the offer, outcomes obtained during Extra Time will not be considered settlement purposes.
Should a game be drawn, with no odds having been offered on the draw, then stakes will be refunded.
2. For Team to go Through offers, should Extra Time be required, to decide the offer, (unless otherwise stated within the offer), the outcomes deriving from the added play will be included for settlement purposes.
3. For Correct Score offers, results will be settled based on the outcomes achieved during Regular Time. Unless otherwise stated within the offer, outcomes obtained during Extra Time will not be considered settlement purposes.
4. For Total Goal offers, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Rocket League:
1. For Match Odds, Series Outcome, Handicap, Correct Score and Total Goals, should Overtime be needed to decide the outcome of the match (or any part of it), and unless otherwise stated within the offer, the outcome deriving from the added play will be included for settlement purposes.
Should a game be drawn, with no odds having been offered on the draw, then stakes will be refunded.
2. For Total Goals and Handicap offers, all parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
H. NBA 2K
1. For Match Odds and Team to go Through offers, should Overtime be needed to decide the outcome of the offer, and unless otherwise stated within the offer, the outcomes deriving from the added play will be taken into account for settlement purposes.
Should a game be drawn, with no odds having been offered on the draw, then stakes will be refunded.
2. For Total Points offers, results will be settled based on the total points scored by the listed participants during the applicable timeframe.
For settlement purposes, and unless otherwise specified, points scored during Overtime will be considered for settlement purposes of markets related to Full Time.
All parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
3. For Handicap offers, results will be settled based on the outcome achieved once the listed handicap/spread is added/subtracted (as applicable) to the match/period/total score to which the bet refers to.
In those circumstances where the result after the adjustment of the handicap/spread line is exactly equal to the betting line, then all bets on this offer will be declared void.
For settlement purposes, and unless otherwise specified, points scored during Overtime will be considered for settlement purposes of markets related to Full Time.
All parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand.
4. For Partial, intervals, First/Next to X offers, Bets on specific timeframes/intervals (example: Quarter/Half X result, match result between minute X and minute Y or "Rest of the Match "odds), will consider only outcomes and occurrences accumulated during the specified timeframe/interval, as applicable. Settlement will not take into account any other occurrences tallied from other parts of the event/match outside the specified timeframe/interval, unless specified.
Bets on offers referring to a specific score in the match (example: Next team to score or Race to X points), refer to the participants scoring/reaching first the listed objective. Should the offer list a timeframe (or any other period restriction) settlement will not consider any occurrences from other parts of the event/match which are not related to the mentioned timeframe. Should the listed score not be reached/scored within the stipulated timeframe (if any) by neither of the participants, all bets will be declared void, unless a draw/tie outcome has been made offered for betting. All parts of the match to which the offer refers to must be completed for bets to stand unless the outcome has already been determined before the interruption of play and any further continuation of play could not possibly produce a different outcome.
Virtual Sports Rules
1. General rules
1.1. Virtual betting events are a computer-generated presentation of a totally random number draw result where the outcomes are decided by numbers selected by a Random Number Generator (RNG).
1.2. The RNG has been independently tested and certified by eCOGRA in compliance with the British Gambling Commission’s Technical Standards Document (TSD): Remote Gambling and Software Technical Standards, June 2017.
1.3. Results provided by the official virtual betting provider will be used to settle wagers on all virtual betting events.
1.4. The results of these virtual betting events are determined on an independent server that is not accessible to the betting operator.
1.5. A virtual betting event takes place every three minutes for football, tennis and basketball, and every two minutes for horse racing and greyhounds.
1.6. When the event is not specified by the customer, bets are registered on the next event.
1.7. Bets on the next event are accepted until the ‘bets closed’ message appears on the screen, after which the bet will be allocated to the successive event.
1.8. Winnings can be collected once the result of an event is displayed on the results screen.
1.9. No horses or greyhounds are scratched from virtual races.
1.10. In case of event cancellation, outstanding bets are deemed void and settled as 'cancelled'. The bet stake is fully reinstated.
1.11. Bet types offered may be altered from time to time.
2. Virtual Football
2.1. Virtual football matches are scheduled to happen every three minutes and consist of two halves. The following markets may be available:
2.2. Full time result: Predict the final result of the match.
2.3. Correct score: Predict the correct score of the match.
2.4. Double chance: Predict whether a match ends in one of the two displayed outcomes.
2.4.1. Example 1: Home team/draw. You predict the outcome of the specified period will either be the home team winning or the match ending in a draw.
2.4.2. Example 2: Away team/draw. You predict the outcome of the specified period will either be the away team winning or the match ending in a draw.
2.4.3. Example 3: Home team/away team. You predict the outcome of the specified period will either be the home team or the away team winning.
2.5. First goal: Predict which team will score the first goal in the match. (Draw = no goals).
2.6. Half-time/full-time: Predict the result of a match at half-time and at the end of regular time.
2.7. Example 1: If you select 1/X, you bet on the home team to lead in the first half and the match to end in a draw.
2.8. Over/under two-way: Predict whether the total number of goals in a match will be over or under a specified figure.
2.9. Penalty: Select the penalty option if you think a penalty will be awarded in the game.
2.10. Time of first goal: Select the time range in which the first goal will be scored.
2.11. Total goals: Predict the exact number of goals scored during the match.
2.12. Yellow card: Select the yellow card option if you think a yellow card will be shown during the game.
3. Virtual horse racing/greyhounds
3.1. Virtual racing events are scheduled to happen every two minutes. The following markets may be available:
3.2. Combination forecast: Select three or more horses/greyhounds, with any of them to finish first and second in either order.
3.3. Combination tricast: A customer can have the option of picking three or more selections to bet that every possible combination of three of the selections may finish first, second and third in order in an event.
3.3.1. Example 1: On three selections there are six bets (1-2-3, 1-3-2, 2-1-3, 2-3-1, 3-1-2, 3-2- 1). On four selections there are 24 bets. On five selections there are 60 bets and on six selections there are 120 bets.
3.4. Each way: Predict a runner to win or place. This bet consists of two bets on one selection in one event, with the first bet on the runner to win and the second bet on the runner to place. The place bet pays at a fraction of the win odds as specified on the event data.
3.5. Forecast: Predict which horses/greyhounds will finish first and second in the correct order.
3.6. Reverse forecast: Predict two horses/greyhounds to come first and second in either order.
3.7. Tricast: Predict which horses/greyhounds will finish first, second and third in the correct order.
3.8. Reverse tricast: Predict three horses to come first, second and third in any order.
3.9. To place: Predict the horse/greyhound that will finish within the place terms of the race.
3.10. To win: Predict the horse/greyhound that will win the race.
4. Virtual Tennis
4.1. Virtual tennis events are scheduled to happen every three minutes and consist of a single tie-break. The following markets may be available:
4.2. Match winner: Predict which player will emerge victorious at the end of the match.
4.3. Correct score: This market requires you to forecast the exact score by the end of the match.
4.4. Total points: In this market, you predict the total number of points scored during the match.
4.5. Handicap: The Player to win after adding or subtracting a specified number of points from the player’s final score.
4.6. Winning margin: The number of points that the winning Player wins the Tie Break by with the options grouped. For example, if Player 1 wins by 2 points, then Player 1 to win by 3 or less; is the winning selection.
5. Virtual Basketball
5.1. Virtual basketball events are scheduled to happen every three minutes and consist of four quarters The following markets may be available:
5.2. Money line: Predict the outright winner of the match. This straightforward market allows you to choose which team will come out on top.
5.3. Total points: Bet on the total number of points scored in a game. This market lets you speculate whether the combined score will be over or under a set number.
5.4. Handicap: Bet on the margin of victory. This market involves predicting whether a team will win by more or less than the specified points handicap.
5.5. Money line and totals: Combine your bet on the match winner with the total points scored. This market offers a more complex challenge, requiring accurate predictions on both aspects.
5.6. Handicap and totals: Bet on both the points spread and the total score. This combined market tests your predictive skills on multiple levels.
5.7. Totals group (5 point bands): Predict the total points scored within specific 5-point bands. This market allows for more granular predictions based on your analysis of the teams.
5.8. Totals group (10 point bands): Predict the total points scored within specific 10-point bands. This market allows for more granular predictions based on your analysis of the teams.
5.9. Winning margin (5 points): Bet on the margin of victory within 5-point bands. This market offers the chance to pinpoint the exact spread of the final score.
5.10. Winning margin (7 points): Bet on the margin of victory within 7-point bands. This market offers the chance to pinpoint the exact spread of the final score.
5.11. Winning margin (7 points) & total points: A combination of Winning Margin (7 points) and Total, where both outcomes need to be correct in order to win.
5.12. Winning margin (5 points) & total points: A combination of Winning Margin (5 points) and Total, where both outcomes need to be correct in order to win.
5.13. Alternative Game Total points: Alternative Over/Under market on the total amount of points scored in the match.
5.14. Alternative handicap: Alternative handicaps for the team to win after adding or subtracting a specified number of points from the team's final score.
5.15. Team totals: Over/Under market on the total points scored by a selected team.
5.16. Double result: A combination of selecting the correct outcome at the end of the first half (including Tie), and the end of the match, where both outcomes need to be correct in order to win.
5.17. Highest scoring quarter: The quarter of the game that has the most points scored by both teams combined.
5.18. Game total - odd/even: Whether the total number of points scored by both teams combined at the end of the game is an odd or an even number.
5.19. 1st half money line 3-way: The team that scores the most points in the first half, including the option for a Tie.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://play.monopolycasino.com/privacypolicy:
Back
Move Left
Move Right
Move Left
Move Right
Move Right
More Info
More Info
Close More Info
Menu
Menu
Menu
Menu
Menu
Menu
Menu
Close
More
My Personal Space
Pay Table
Home
Volume On
Volume Off
Help
Close
Help
Help
Help
Close
Clear
Clear
TBD
TBD
Safe and secure
Safe and secure
Home
Login
Join Now
Promotions
Help & FAQ
Terms and Privacy
Terms and Privacy
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Reward Rules
Play Responsibly
Play Responsibly
Play Responsibly
For Help - Be Gamble Aware
National Gambling Helpline 
(0808 8020 133)
Game in Good Hands
Our site uses cookies to offer you a better browsing experience. Some cookies are necessary to allow the site to function.
Read here and find out more on how and why we use cookies.
Click "Allow all cookies", to consent to the use of cookies for analytical and marketing purposes. If you'd prefer not to consent to this, you can click "Necessary cookies only". Click "Manage" to adjust your preferences.
Manage
Necessary cookies only
Allow all cookies